
Villain stuff
    Villain Motivation
        Betrayal - the person feels that they have been wronged and deeply desire revenge, thinking it will make them feel better. We all know that it rarely does. This leads to feelings of injustice and that can spiral out of control and lead to all sorts of damaging thoughts that can escalate into treating others as if they have no value.
        Disenfranchisement - Someone who feels that they have no place in society can become deeply bitter and that can escalate to any number of emotional outlooks - anger, hatred, rage, rape, murder, terrorism, zealotry, and nationalism.
        Trauma - life events that have shattered someone's psyche are probably the most common reason people "go bad". They might have been abused as children or adults - physically, sexually or psychologically. This sets up a cycle of depression and anger that can sometimes spiral out of control and the next thing you know they are walking the streets with a rifle.
        Envy/Greed - when people are denied the things they feel they deserve, they can sometimes feel deeply resentful and start to make bad decisions in an effort to get what they want. This always leads to a grab for power, and as we all know, absolute power corrupts absolutely.


        Goal
        Get revenge
        Steal an item
        Murder an NPC/PC
        Become the Boss of a Company/Guild/Whatever
        Become Wealthy
        Raise an Army to Conquer an Area
        Murder a Particular Species/People
        Enslave a Particular Species/People
        Start a Rebellion Against Whatever
        Build/Steal an artefact
        Become the King/Queen/Whatever
        Take over the Empire(s)
        Raise a Dead/Sleeping/Banished God
        Become a Deity/Lich/Whatever
        Destroy/Remake the World
    why did BBEG become BBEG
        Praise from Husband/Wife
        Land
        Title
        God hood
        Fun(?)
        Creature who believes that wars are bad, and that convictions cause wars, so it is kidnapping and brainwashing all people who sworned total convictions (double-edged as it means both evil warlocks and paladins the same).
        Leader of a radical rebel group doing whatever to advance their cause
        Desperate Lord of the enemy kingom trying to save his people from ruin no matter the cost
        Had to choose between two horrible course of actions. Chose the one that interfere with the PCs objectives.
        Power!
        Revenge
        Adventures murdered their family and now devote their lives to killing adventurers
        Believes the gods are corrupt and seeks to gain godhood to help others ascend, overthrowing the old order by turning everyone into a god. Surprisingly polite about it all.
        Completely unaware that they are a BBEG, just thinks they are running experiments and schemes to further Science!/Magic!/Magience!/Scimagic! which go bad due to bad luck, incompetent minions, malicious lieutenants, and other shenanigans. Once they find out, will be horrified.
        An ancient city of pacifists was destroyed by outside forces, ending a millennia old reign. The BBEG's kin had a Pact with the city since time immemorial, to defend each other against all enemies. But when life loses it's value and is taken for naught, then the Pact is to Avenge.
        -An eldritch being that believes itself the creator of the universe. It is sickened with its creation and wants all life to return to its hive mind so that it may restart old testament style.
        A queen obsessed with beauty. She was a kind ruler until, in the hopes of catching her affection, her faithful servant gifted her an ancient magical mirror. The woman in the mirror staring back at the queen began to whisper dark, twisted desires. Now she is a shell of her former self, her servant still aiding her in a vain hope of reaching the queen. Every day, she grows more and more vain, viewing total tyranny as the only way of assuring the rest of the world becomes as beautiful as her.
        A tyrannical president of a company. Prosperity is their ultimate goal, and your planet is just another pool of resources to gather.
        They saw an ill omen in Divination class which led them to obsess over gaining power so he could defeat any threat.
        One of the PC's parents/siblings murdered the BBEG's significant other/child and they have spent their lives plotting revenge.
        The brutal tactics employed by both sides in a recent war caused this BBEG to go from hardened sergeant trying to survive to sadistic maniac who kills at the first sign of disobedience.
        The BBEG ate too many magic mushrooms and believes the PCs are assassins from the future, so naturally he tries to kill them.
        The BBEG got bored with bullying people and joined a mercenary group, then went AWOL deep in the jungle. He emerged with strange powers and several loyal, deadly followers who now serve his his dark agenda.
        She was an actress, well-known for going to extremes for roles. She was captured by slavers but escaped and became an advocate for slaves. She is also incredibly brutal and uses her political stature to influence events without getting her hands dirty.
        Ex-cop whose son was killed by criminals. The cop killed the criminals and their whole gang, then killed himself in grief. His angry spirit survived on the Material Plane with its intelligence intact and seeks to destroy anyone who it sees as a criminal, including those who adventure haphazardly.
        A crazed old Druid who learned how to Wild Shape into an Aboleth and went mad with old eldritch dreams of planar domination.
        A Beholder who had their mind magically altered to remove the paranoia without curbing psychopathy. They have a globe-spanning agenda with agents in every major settlement.
        Leader of the Kobra Kai Dojo of evil Monks and Fighters. Just hates that which is good.
        Started as a terrorist who hated their government, found a taste for mass violence, has been building weapons ever since.
        Is trying to do enough evil acts to be declared worthy of the lichdom ceremonial rites by the death god they worship.
        A mad archmage who accidentally sent his mind back in time, so he is in his 10 year old self's body. Had a tantrum about eating broccoli for dinner and decided to destroy anyone who eats, sells, or grows broccoli.
        They told an old flame that they wanted to rule the world but would never be able to do it, and they responded with why not try starting small, like ruling the entire tri-state area. And thus an EVIL dream was born.
        The BBEG wants revenge on either a major faction, race, or organization for effectively ruining their lives via the killing of loved ones, the destabilization/destruction of their homeland, etc. If its a specific race, like elves for instance, the reason could become even more chaotic due to how the faewilds and its people act.
        hey were once heroes, but in time saw enemies everywhere
        they ran out of coffee
        their parents always said they would never amount to much, and they want their name burned into the history books.
        they just wanted to raise baby dragons in peace, but some villagers got uppity
        Wants to become some form of Lich or transcend their form in some sense. Makes for a fun battle.
        Complex social factors.
        Fetishizes the concept they are trying to force over the world to the point of madness
        Made a bad bet with eldritch/fae
        One bad day
        Cursed - Acquired a cursed artifact that set them on the path to become the BBEG
        Cursed - Cursed by a god to become become the BBEG
        Cursed - Family curse
        Never really planed to become the BBEG, it just sorta turned out that way
        Power - BBEG seeks power for the sake of being more powerful
        Power - BBEG seeks power to defeat a (greater evil / world ending evil)
        Power - BBEG seeks power so that no one can ever push them around again
        Revenge on those who have disrespected him or her
        Revenge on those who have harmed him or her
        Revenge on those who have harmed the BBEG's (clan, family, friends, people, race, school, tribe)
        They are just following the path their god set for them
        To destroy it all
        To destroy something that they hate
        To find a way out of their contract with a (devil, demon, god, greater old one, outsider, etc)
        To find the heroes capable of saving the world from a greater evil
        To fulfill their contract with a (devil, demon, god, greater old one, outsider, etc)
        To fulfill a prophesy
        To make a mark on history
        To put their (clan, family, people, race, tribe) at the top of society
        To rebuild an empire
        To remake the world, in their view they can make it better than it is now
        Wealth
        Fearing mortality, they wish for Lichdom
        They actually believe they are the force for good and those opposing them are the BBEGs...
        Just tried to get it's race saved. They are about 50 of his Kind left and he/she is the leader trying to get enough Land and Power to not go extinct.
        Current BBEG sold his soul to the Undying to save his son, now he’s trapped in an endless loop of raising more dead to please the Undying unaware that in the town he’s had to flee from it left his son to die after he was gone.
        Their friend dared them to, and they’re not one to turn down a dare.
        Who has two thumbs and wants to live forever? (Points thumbs at self) This guy!
        He was attempting to find a cure for some world problem (plague, world hunger, etc.), but was discredited as he was coming up with a possible solution.
        He had a hard life and saw many horrible things. Now, he wants to make things right. Unfortunately, it's in the worst possible way imaginable.
        He was 12th in the line of succession to be king in his kingdom, so he thought he'd jump ahead in line.
        He was 11th in the line of succession to be king of his kingdom, so he decided to be first in line in another kingdom.
        Money
        For the lolz
        for the evulz
        Lived long enough to become the villain
        thought the government was shitty and he could do a better job (lawful bent)
        thought the government should have less influence (chaotic bent)
        boredom
        to get laid
        used to be an adventurer, got tired of people asking them to fix everything
        Town guard that snapped after adventurers kept murderhoboing everything
        Wizard who after a long enough time reached the bounds of the research they could do via ethical means, resorted to unethical means
        Wizard who stumbled upon dark magic and was corrupted by it
        Goblin warboss who got tired of everyone thinking they could just push goblins around, gets 20 levels in fighter and organizes goblin hoard
        druid who became tired of society destroying nature decides to have nature destroy society
        Their patron told them to
        barbarian who thinks the weak should serve the strong (evil conan?)
        the party killed a family member in the last campaign
        Noble who thinks peasants should serve the rich
        He realised to be a hero you needed a villan, and after he killed his bbeg there was too strong a shift in the natural balance, demons were breaking free from hell as the natural order tried to balance itself and the only way he could save the world is to try to destroy it, because for every bbeg there is a true hero. For extra the pc's can find this out after they kill the bbeg and have to balance the universe somehow
        Librarian who snapped after years of being told paper cuts were not "that bad"
        Chronic splinters, nuff said
        cursed to never sleep, and driven mad by it
        crones disease/celiac disease, why shouldn't i be evil in a world where everything gives horrible intestinal problems.
        allergy to alcohol or precious metals, forever barred from the finer things
        traumatized by sock puppets as a child
        A hero drew balance from the deck of many things
        Someone killed their dog
        Just a kid playing games, not realizing the adults playing with him are actually following orders and doing things he said to do to real people
        Trying to avenge a family member
        Some wandering adventurers wrongly ruined his life and now he’s been plotting to end theirs
        The BBEG is a time agent who failed to protect the original BBEG, and since the original BBEG's reign (and the actions taken to bring them down) include a number of critical fixed points, the agent needs to fill in.
        Someone shoved a Helm of Reverse Alignment on the sweetest kid at the magic college as a prank. Having successfully faked a cure, the now-evil student took power over the college through deception and murder, and uses it for their own wicked ends under a veneer of sweetness and light.
        Informed of an ancient prophecy that he'd tear down his own kingdom and unmake his entire line, a noble warrior prince leaves on campaign... not knowing that he had been abandoned by his royal parents, rulers of the kingdom he's invading, because of the prophecy, and adopted by the rulers of his current homeland.
        Mistakenly diagnosed as terminally ill by an incompetent cleric, a paladin suffered a psychotic break, turned Oathbreaker, and is now lashing out at the world
        Revenge
        Vast treasure
        Magic powers from a divine being he's aiding
        Control over idiots
        Because they think humanity was a mistake and only XYZ should be in charge
        Population control
        Fight pollution and colonization
        Trigger revolution from a corrupt system
        I feel like our campaign our characters are going to become the bbeg. It started with a drink night a misunderstanding pride and then revenge. What started as 300 lost is now the party working on a plan to destroy a whole town.
        Denied their birthright to rule because they were banished for being too dangerous/cruel.
        Alien perspective: a curse has twisted their vision so they see all humanoids as demonic apes who seem to have taken over the world.
        Eco-terrorism: a druid driven mad when their grove was desecrated is indiscriminately clawing back land for nature.
        Unity: after numerous other attempts at rousing action have failed, a noble has become a BBEG to make themself into a common foe for multiple factions in an effort to get them to band together.
        He's just a cunt. He's a bad person because its fun for him.
        Don’t forget hate and revenge
        Reshaping the implicit caste system of society.
        Only way to save the world
        An already powerful being became insane
        "Sometimes the only way to stop something terrible, is to become terrible yourself."
        His/her family was a casualty from the last adventurers adventure.
        BB"E"G lich isn't really evil, just wanted to resurrect friends.
        He or she was chosen by a dark entity, slowly corrupting them from the inside out.
        Started just to gain pact power, but slowly realized that he/she enjoyed causing destruction, and now thrives in it.
        You killed the person they were honor bound to protect, and are now honor bound to avenge.
        He just wants to forget.
        To cure a seemingly incurable disease
        He is the spawn of a Great Old one, just trying to fulfill dad's legacy.
        My bbeg accidently killed his family. Then went mad trying to bring them back to life with hundreds of failed attempts, now hes trying to steal the power of a gid to recreate them.
        In hopes to find someone who can end his immortality
        Who you think is the BBEG is actually possessed by something that's the real BBEG
        He’s trying to “fix” the world
        A goblin said he couldn’t gain domain over the nearby city.
        A dog who was once asked who the good boy was and received no answer, devoting the rest of his life searching to acquire that knowledge so his mind may finally be at peace, no matter the cost, but in his pursuit of this forbidden knowledge has fallen down a dark path, willing to destroy the whole world just so he’ll be the only boy left, making him the only and by extension THE good boy. The irony of all of this was that it was in fact he that was the good boy all along. But a lack of affirmation for this led him to fall to his own hubris and now must be stopped at any cost.
        Amnesia
        Religious Fanatic
        A cursed overconfident do-gooder. Everything positive he does to save or help someone has an opposite destructive reaction elsewhere in the realm. If approached about it, him and his followers immediately claim its a hoax.
        Due to a series of unfortunate events and dyslexia, all of the spells he knows are one letter off which has caused some big problems in the area and the folks have had enough.
        Is lonely and only knows how to get negative attention by being a BBEG
        Is the evil twin of one of the party members
        Is from an alternate dimension and thinks it's all a game because he is OP compared to the rest of the world
        Got there by accident due to bluffs and cons that got out of hand and now he can't leave without getting killed
        Random crazy dude(t) who accidentally got gifted powers
        A bunch of patrons are competing to see whose warlock can become the most powerful and this guy is currently winning
        Unifying warring states to end interminable wars
        Religious fervor
        Unwittingly controlled by bigger badder eviler something
        Imprisoned in this reality and trying to destroy it to escape
        BBEG is a literal toddler of their race who was given this world/universe/plane as a toy by their parent
        A series of well-intentioned mishaps gone awry.
        Honest misunderstanding.
        Disgust.
        High market prices.
        Fell for a con.
        Couldn’t find the exit; destroyed city trying to leave.
        Curiosity/ambition.
        Needed fuel for a powerful spell.
        Dog told them to.
        Genocide of phobia (spiders, snakes, commitment, etc).
        Accident; isn’t even aware of trouble caused.
        Corrupted by an extra-planar influence
        Possessed by an abyssal entity
        Controlled by an artifact or powerful sentient magic item
        To finally teach that bully from their childhood a lesson
        To compensate for an extreme physical disability
        By accident/luck. They started having some success with what they were doing at a small scale and things escalated quickly.
        They truly believe that they are the only person who can make the world a better place. From their perspective they're the only one with the vision, resources, and will to do what they believe needs to be done. They are aware of the atrocities they commit and the horrific acts they orchestrate, and they regret them, but they view them as necessary for the greater good and perform them anyway. Because once they've won, once the world is completely under their control, they can bring an end to all war, they can ensure equality for everyone, they can achieve world peace. But it has to be them, anyone else could be corrupted by the power or loose sight of their goals. Anyone else would do something wrong. They do what they do not because they want to, but because they believe someone has to and everyone else is too afraid to try.
        To bring fortune to their country
        So that they can live a quiet life
        To make their vampire father proud
        To amass enough strength to kill their brother/sister
        In preparation of facing a great future threat to all of life, an ancient race of superbeings that will soon return
        different groups of adventurers keep coming into his town and murderhoboing people. It's all he can do to keep back the tide.
        All of life is suffering. Only death and rebirth into The Oblivion can end suffering.
        Doing something bad with good intentions, such as bringing back the dead
        Some people just want to watch the world burn.
        Boredom
        In order to bring his dead wife back to life, the orc warlord seeks the crown of a lich that was long ago defeated. His shaman has had visions and divinations of the crown being in the Emperor’s treasure room in the capital city. The warlord seeks to unite the goblinoid clans into a great war-band that can destroy the Emperor’s armies and lay siege to the city, so that he may claim the lich’s power source and be reunited with his departed love.
        They wanted to provide for their family, and got caught up in the thrill of violence.
        They were enamoured with an [other] and were rejected by that [other]. Rejection led to resentment, resentment led to revenge.
        Power overwhelming.
        They aren't the BBEG to their people. They are the savior bringing hope to [oppressed other].
        Boredom
        Revenge
        Has some really cool toys but no one to play with
        Hates everyone including self
        Just wants to see what will happen if_____
        Sibling got all the love
        A deal made with a powerful being
        In search of knowledge
        Was a hero who realized heros solve nothing
        Thinks hes the good guy( like MCU thanos in infinity war)
        Someone killed his dog
    evil monologue
        01	"Before Me you are a slug in the sun. You are privy to a great Becoming and you recognize nothing. You are an ant in the after-birth. It is in your nature to do one thing correctly: before Me you rightly tremble. Fear is not what you owe Me, you and the other pismires. You owe Me awe."
        02	"You are strong, child, but I am beyond strength. I am the end."
        03	"Lay down your arms...or I will lay them down for you"
        04	"Why don't you understand that I'm just trying to fix all these problems? Whenever you try to help you make things worse, but I make things better. So many things are flawed and I'm just tidying things up."
        05	"So you made it. What do you want? applause? curses? Perhaps a theatrical monologue expressing my certain victory or inevitable ascension? no. You may believe me the villain, but villains only exist in history books written by those whose will triumphs over others. If you defeat me today I won't give you the pleasure of killing a proud man. My path has cost everyone much I know that. Too much now to stop. This never was some children's game. It always was war. and I intend to finish the fight."
        06	"You are weak. Undisciplined. Cowering behind walls. You're not brave. You've merely forgotten the fear of death. Allow me to reacquaint you."
        07	Well, here we are. I ask you, hero, did a single of my skeletons wander forth from my home to harm you? To harm anyone dear to you? Have I, hero, with a thousand years of arcane mysteries laid like treasures in my mind, stolen but a single coin from you? Is not my wealth my own? And yet, hero, you have broken my home, slain my friends and servants, stolen my rightful goods. What do you have that you did not take? All you have learned, hero, all of your experiences, are built on the destruction of others. What, tell me hero, have you ever gained that someone else has not lost by your "righteous" hand? It is true that I sold my soul for power, but have you not done the same piecemeal? And do you not seek yet yet more power at my demise? I cannot fault your intentions, hero, we are kindred in a sense, but now it is time you learn the harsh reality of the inheritance of power. To the eldest goes all.
        08	"So here we are. You know my reasons, and I know yours. I understand, I truly do - and it will not stop me. If that is what you wish, you will need to bring me down yourselves. Come then, let us find the winner of this game once and for all!"
        09	Ohoho, you're approaching me?
        10	“Mercy? You dare ask me for mercy? What mercy was extended to me, broken and bleeding in the snow? What mercy was given to my men, frozen and starving in those long winter nights? … What mercy was given to my wife, whom I left and thought safe in the company of traitors? And of my child, of only three years...? What was given to us but death and befoulment? We were good people… We were good people… And now I am all that is left.”
        11	“Do you think I enjoy this? Being a monster? It is a hell worse than death. But I exist in it. Do you think I like looking at the faces of my brothers-in-arms, knowing that what they once were was robbed from them, never to return? I have told them they are blessed, because without it they are damned. They believe me because they have no one else. They need me as much as I need them. Together we will find our vengeance. We will find our rest.”
        12	“Know that I hold no malice towards you, mortals. You are simply acting on what you perceive to be the right thing to do. You may walk away, leave in peace, if you so choose. I offer that to you now. But I will have my vengeance this day, and I will destroy anything that dares try and stop me. You do what you feel you have to do, mortals. And so will I.”
        13	"This is the best part of the story. The part where you think the hero just might not triumph. That this will be their final journey... fear not, in the end I will prevail."
        14	what? Did you expect a long monologue?
        15	I don't even know who you are / “Do I know you?”
        16	I am...tired. .... I have worked without a will for sleep or rest. Repose was lost to me the minute you people walked into the Court. I had everything within the palm of my hand until you killed the King and seduced the Dragon I had laying in wait in the crypts....HOW DID YOU DO THAT?! ... No...do not answer that question. Don't even strum that cursed lute you utter buffoon. ... I can only rest with your heads on spikes...maybe I'll repaint my chambers in your blood as a grim reminder of what it means to have a good work ethic, which is more than I can say for you sorry lot of purposeless vagabonds!
        17	"God's gift. Your violence. When I came downstairs in my home, and I saw that tree in my living room, it reached out for me... a divine hand. God loves violence. Why else would there be so much of it? It's in us. It's what we are. We wage war, we burn sacrifices, and pillage and plunder and tear at the flesh of our brothers. And why? Because God gave us violence to wage in his honor. There's no moral order as pure as this storm. There's no moral order at all. There's just this: can my violence conquer yours?"
        18	In response to threat by party indicating they will defeat the boss: The boss, looks them up and down, squints, and smirks "How?"
        19	My name is Yoshikage Kira. I'm 33 years old. My house is in the northeast section of Morioh, where all the villas are, and I am not married. I work as an employee for the Kame Yu department stores, and I get home every day by 8 PM at the latest. I don't smoke, but I occasionally drink. I'm in bed by 11 PM, and make sure I get eight hours of sleep, no matter what. After having a glass of warm milk and doing about twenty minutes of stretches before going to bed, I usually have no problems sleeping until morning. Just like a baby, I wake up without any fatigue or stress in the morning. I was told there were no issues at my last check-up. I'm trying to explain that I'm a person who wishes to live a very quiet life. I take care not to trouble myself with any enemies, like winning and losing, that would cause me to lose sleep at night. That is how I deal with society, and I know that is what brings me happiness. Although, if I were to fight I wouldn't lose to anyone. (tailor to suit your setting)
        20	"Rudimentary creatures of blood and flesh, you touch my mind, fumbling in ignorance, incapable of understanding....There is a realm of existence so far beyond your own you cannot even imagine it. I am beyond your comprehension. I am Sovereign...Reaper? A label created by the Protheans to give voice to their destruction. In the end, what they chose to call us is irrelevant. We simply... are...Organic life is nothing but a genetic mutation, an accident. Your lives are measured in years and decades. You wither and die. We are eternal, the pinnacle of evolution and existence. Before us, you are nothing. Your extinction is inevitable. We are the end of everything... You exist because we allow it, and you will end because we demand it... My kind transcends your very understanding. We are each a nation - independent, free of all weakness. You cannot grasp the nature of our existence....We have no beginning. We have no end. We are infinite. Millions of years after your civilization has been eradicated and forgotten, we will endure... We are legion. The time of our return is coming. Our numbers will darken the sky of every world. You cannot escape your doom... Your words are as empty as your future. I am the Vanguard of your destruction. This exchange is over..."
        21	"I will grow, know my name. I am hope, I am the 'Frame. I advance up from the deep. A new chance, the march of the machines"
        22	"Twelve. There were twelve other groups just like yours. Comrades in arms, just like you. Prodigious fighters, just like you. Armed to the teeth with weapons and potions and spells, just like you. Twelve groups of fools who believed that they could band together and defeat me. Twelve groups of fools who believed they wouldn't make the same mistakes as those who came before them. Twelve sets of shallow graves left unmarked. What precisely makes you think that you will be anything other than Group Thirteen?"
        23	For you, the day <BBEG>[graced/attacked/decimtate] your [village/home/realm] was the most important day of your life. But for me, it was Tuesday.
        24	"So you've answered the call, and dug deep into your soul. Did you really believe that this was your legend unfolding? Think again, for now it is my turn to roll!"
        25	"Where there is a God, there must be a Devil. [turns dramatically and bows towards the party] Please, allow me to introduce myself..."
        26	"All I wanted was to provide order to this world. All I wanted was to unite this world under one undisputed rule. All I wanted was a world were everyone knew their place in life. I was this close to creating this utopia... but then you came, blinded by tales of heroics, and branded me a villain. You... idiots... came, and you fucked it all up! Well, if you believe that this world doesn't deserve order... [opens up a portal to a Blood War battlefield]... THEN LET ANARCHY REIGN!!!"
        27	‘You heroes are all the same, frantically running from fight to fight with nary a concern for the consequences you leave in your wake. How many towns did you save, only to move on while farmers try to figure out how to grow crops and feed their family when their farms were burned down? How many did you save from oncoming hordes only to demand their life savings as ‘just reward’. Here is a better question, how many children did you leave to die in this crumbling city, as you chased after me, all in the name of grand heroics? Heroes? Ha! Don’t make me laugh! For all my deeds at least I am under no illusions as to who and what I am.’
        28	“All your adventures, all your efforts and all your hard work. For what? To be defeated my me? How many must You kill just the get a shot at me? All these dead... there would’ve been less casualties without your interventions and intrusions! And what will you have to show for it? Nothing. Nothing at all. I will end you and your self righteousness right now!”
        29	“I know what it’s like to lose. To feel so desperately that you are right, yet to fail nonetheless. Dread it, run from it? Destiny arrives all the same. And now it is here... or should I say, I am.”
        30	Oh that? That was just business.
        31	"It is a strange fate that we should suffer so much fear and doubt over so small a thing. Such a little thing."
        32	"You know, i was actually regarded as a hero once, people would all hail my name. Its funny back then it seemed important but when you arent adventuring anymore people will forget you. They will exclude you. I never stopped being a hero you know. My goals have just shifted, perhaps if you win you will follow my footsteps." -- former hero
        32	Sigh "while i am flattered by your presence i would prefer if you go home, i know you are all astonished by me and such but honestly? heroes arent my type, too preachy. Go home and live another day, i even buy first round at the tavern" -- charmer
        33	"Did you know most small skirmishes last between 6 seconds and a minute, my own statistics says they never last more than 18 seconds" -- bookeeper type
        34	"Have you ever thought about the gods? Like really thought about them? What if the gods arent mercifull, what if they decieve us? What if they just chug us into a great divine incinerstor to power the devine magic they grant their clerics? I decided not to take the risk but if you do find out tell me" --undead
        35	Party indicates some foul deed BBEG has done: "Do you have any idea how little that narrows it down?"
        36	"For someone within range of my magics, you are awfully arrogant. Perhaps this is some kind of depressive death wish. Fear not, once you die I'll raise you and give you something that approaches a purpose."
        37	Darkness and death are all that remains for you here at the end... Your lands, your people, your loved ones will be little more than kindling to my inferno. Gods and devils rightly fear me yet you fools fight on to the last breath... Did you really think there was any other ending? I am infinite... I am inevitable... [1/3]
        38	I'll let you live just long enough to see every light extinguished, when darkness swallows all you shall be last. [2/3]
        39	You may be strong, but I am beyond strength... [3/3]
        40	Bold words for someone in crushing range."
        41	"Ho? You're approaching me? Instead of running away, you're approaching me?"
        50	I understand how you could think what I have done is irredeemable. However, my heart and my actions are utterly unclouded. They are all taken in the name of justice. I am the only one that can save this wretched world, and I'll do whatever it takes to do just that.
        51	"I am frankly embarrassed to have allowed you to get this far, and will be rectifying that oversight with extreme prejudice immediately.
        52	"It doesn't matter who wins, really. The crowds will cheer on the victors, regardless of whether they are motivated by fear, or by adulation. Although, in your case, I suppose it'll just be relief that you didn't fuck up one more time."
        53	"Mercy is not a luxury either of us have anymore. If I slay you, rest assured that your families will follow you soon. It would be wise of you to accept this as a gift."
        54	"When you set off on your tottering quest into the unknown, did you ever expect it to end crushed under the booted heel of the god of the new world?"
        55	You lack of imagination is insulting. Generation after generation you mortals try to hurt me, using the same old methods. Fire and metal? Blood, violence and fury? Pain? Sacrifice? SELF RIGHTEOUS MEAT? Try and try again, you still believe these things make me... weaker?
        56	"Who did you think was behind all of this? The gods? Perhaps the Devils? No... Just me!"
        57	"My child, why do you point that weapon at me? Do you not recognize the one the prophets have predicted? The one destined to put an end to all strife in this world? The one to usher a new age of harmony? The price may be great, but it is all part of the Holy One's plan. The suffering of those you fight for is just a means to that end....."I know that the youngest of my apostles betrayed me, and that is okay. When his corpse hits the soil, all will be forgiven. And I forgive you too, my child....."Of course, you will have to die in order to truly repent."
        58	“So... you finally found me.”
        59	“I’ve been waiting for you to arrive.”
        60	“Just you [insert number of pcs]? That’s it?”
        61	“While you’ve been chasing kobolds and goblins all over the place, I’ve been swinging this big dick in the halls of power. Now, step aside, necro-fodder.”
        62	“Ooh. Lunch has arrived.”
        63	“Minions... bring me my torture kit.”
        64	"Adventurers a lot like toys. When you break them, it makes children cry. Which is, obviously, desirable.”
        65	"It is such an odd thing, seeing others willingly run towards their own death. One would think I would be used to such futile gestures bye now, but it never fails to intrigue me."
        66	“TALKING MAKE KRAG MAD!” (obviously a BBDEG, D for dumb :-) )
        67	”It took hundreds to kill me...but I’ve killed humans by the thousands! I am sublime! I am the true face of evil!”
        68	"It's about legacy. You see, when I have children, I'm going to leave them the world as my legacy. They will wish for nothing. You can't make a comfy nest without spilling a few liters of blood."
        69	You've meddled one too many times. Those idiots I sent to dispatch you were nothing compared to me.
        70	I've watched. I've waited. And now you've made your way to your doom. To me.
        71	I can smell you. The fear. The tension. The rage. It will be an honor to add you and your friends to my collection finally.
        72	"Suppose that you were sitting down at this table. The napkins are in front of you, which napkin would you take? The one on your ‘left’? Or the one on your ‘right’? The one on your left side? Or the one on your right side? Usually you would take the one on your left side. That is ‘correct’ too. But in a larger sense on society, that is wrong. Perhaps I could even substitute ‘society’ with the ‘Universe’. The correct answer is that ‘It is determined by the one who takes his or her own napkin first.’ …Yes? If the first one takes the napkin to their right, then there’s no choice but for others to also take the ‘right’ napkin. The same goes for the left. Everyone else will take the napkin to their left, because they have no other option. This is ‘society’… Who are the ones that determine the price of land first? There must have been someone who determined the value of money, first. The size of the rails on a train track? The magnitude of electricity? Laws and Regulations? Who was the first to determine these things? Did we all do it, because this is a Republic? Or was it Arbitrary? NO! The one who took the napkin first determined all of these things! The rules of this world are determined by that same principle of ‘right or left?’! In a Society like this table, a state of equilibrium, once one makes the first move, everyone must follow! In every era, this World has been operating by this napkin principle. And the one who ‘takes the napkin first’ must be someone who is respected by all. It’s not that anyone can fulfill this role… Those that are despotic or unworthy will be scorned. And those are the ‘losers’. In the case of this table, the ‘eldest’ or the ‘Master of the party’ will take the napkin first… Because everyone ‘respects’ those individuals."
        73	“All your adventures, all your efforts and all your hard work. For what? To be defeated my me? How many must You kill just the get a shot at me? All these dead... there would’ve been less casualties without your interventions and intrusions! And what will you have to show for it? Nothing. Nothing at all. I will end you and your self righteousness right now!”...“I know what it’s like to lose. To feel so desperately that you are right, yet to fail nonetheless. Dread it, run from it? Destiny arrives all the same. And now it is here... or should I say, I am.
        74	You've meddled one too many times. Those idiots I sent to dispatch you were nothing compared to me.
        75	I've watched. I've waited. And now you've made your way to your doom. To me.
        76	Behold true glory! Behold true power! Behold! I am your reckoning!
        77	I can smell you. The fear. The tension. The rage. It will be an honor to add you and your friends to my collection finally.
        78	The Wheel of Time moves forward. Progress moves with it. You are no longer needed for this divine mechanism. 79
        80	It's amusing how hard you tried just to get here. This should be simple.
        81	You've gathered your friends. You've gathered your arms. Yet you did not gather the only thing that matters. 82
        83	Ah. Arrival at last. I was beginning to wonder when you would show. I need your souls please.
        84	I am gifting you relief from the strife and struggle you continue to find yourself in. Why fight this beautiful gift?
        85	You think yourselves clever? Allow me to show you true intellectual prowess.
        86	I am TIRED of you GETTING in MY way! Shut up and DIE ALREADY!
        87	You've fought your way through entire armies. You've solved countless ageless puzzles. And for what? Some sense of righteousness? Some sense of heroism? Fame? Come. I will give you final rest.
        88	I win. Not even all of you working together can stop me. I have thought of every possibility, every move you can make. No matter what you do, you will fail. My master will rise. And this pathetic little world will be brought to its knees by his power. Enjoy your last few days of freedom.
        89	Well, it appears that I am outnumbered seven to one. Heh. You should have brought more people.
        90	Here’s the deal. Your group and I will fight, should I defeat you, I win. Should defeat me, the ancient dragon I am controlling with this staff will break free. Being the hero’s you are, you will go to stop it. I’ll flee and I’ll win. If you chose to kill me before focusing on the dragon, well, I’ll give it one last command to devour you. I win. If you kill me and destroy the staff the dragon will rampage, once again giving you two options. If you don’t fight the dragon, my army will kill it making me a martyr and you the villains who let it lose. If you do fight it my army will kill you in your weakened state. My son will then take over in my stead and take over the world. You have no options. I am Xanatos and you cannot beat me.
        91	You have been tricked. I was never on your side. The items you have been helping me with? They are used to permanently seal the gods away from this world. No. More. Gods. No more magic. It’s ironic really, the power they brought to this world will soon seal them out. If it makes you feel any better, I did enjoy our travels
        92	"Now I judge you. To the charge of betraying your own flesh, guilty. To the charge of being human, when we could have been gods, guilty! The sentence is death.
        93	"Really? That's it? You are the cause of my troubles? This is, this is pathetic! Where are my real nemesis? This ridiculous group of, of nothings!? Of ants?!?! increasing in loudness: This has TO BE A JOKE!!! ARGH! Deep breath, whispering: Keep it together. Normal voice: Who sent you? Nevermind, I'll get it from you in all sorts of ways."
        94	"So, adventurers, you have cut a bloody swath through my home and finally come to me. How many of my servants lie dead at your hands?"
        95	"Hah, evil? I am merely running experiments in my home and you pot smashing murder hobos have come to kill me for glory and gold, not for good or justice."
        96	“You wish to stop me? And yet I could not have accomplished all of this without you. Who sowed the seeds of doubt among the dwarfkin? Who rid the caves of those troublesome abominations? Who deposed the regent, the only one standing between me and the fateful scrolls?
        97	“We are not enemies, you and I. Quite the opposite—you have been my most faithful servants.”
        98	"I started my plans centuries before any of you were born. I fought dragons, enslaved giants and killed hundreds of thousands of people of all races. Why, you ask?... All you need to know is that he will be sent to a circle in Hell especially made for him. And if you don't leave this place right now, you annoyances might just be there to greet the bastard."
        99	Well, I tried.
        100	One step left now, it's almost time, Show you what my determination has still left for you to get back to. You should prepare to just die like all your friends, you'll have a really good time. But guys like you are always just fools. Come at me, try to kill me with your fancy tools. Let's go, now the room gets chiller. Let's go, just another killer."

strange shops
    Imp Imporium - This store is small and boxy, and entirely made of redwood. A tall devil stands behind the counter wearing a suit and tie, and imps are chained to the walls. He offers you the services of one of his imps for a small price- the rights to the imp's memories of what they did when you're done. He requires a much larger material collateral for if you don't return the imp or it dies/is irreparably maimed in your service.
    Coagulation Station - A seemingly normal (if ugly) old woman runs this roadside popup store. It is nothing more than a cart with a sign next to it reading "Coagulation Station" painted roughly in red over a lime background. She offers healing supplies, potions, and rations in return for a small vial of your blood. (Feel free to come up with consequences for buying from her, such as her being a hag or using it for a strange ritual, etc.)
    Elemental Extras - An air, earth, fire and water elemental stand in the four corners of this (entirely brick) shop. Unfortunately, the "shopkeepers" only speak primordial, so good luck if you don't. They each offer to put special elemental effects on whatever you own, such as a fire effect on your sword, an ice effect on your armor to freeze whatever hits you, or an earth effect on an arrow to have surrounding dirt swallow whoever it hits. Everything here is understandably very expensive.
    Vraug aks stor - A very tall, older orc hero enthusiastically tries to sell his weapons in this shop in order to retire. They're hung up on the walls, all showing varying signs of use. Some appear to be magical. Vraug also tries to tell his customers stories about each weapon before they buy (and especially before they ask.) The weapon most prominently displayed is a +4 Great Axe, with obsidian blades, a dragon-scale tip on the end and golden threads running down the handle. There are a few chinks in it, and the tip somehow has a dent in it, but the damage only seems to add to the charm. He charges an extraordinary price for this axe.
    Angel Bazaar - Apparently recently the churches haven't been generating enough coin to keep the local deity fiscally afloat, and some angels have taken it upon themselves to raise that extra money. Some are selling more regular items for cheaper prices, such as healing items, some are selling more extravagant magical items, and even others are offering "miracles." They're all set up in a series of stands in a small square that you swear wasn't here before.
    Betsie's Black Cauldron- everything is black, especially Betsie. From black oak ethanol to black licorice she has ingredients and potions unique to her gimmick. u/LateLolth96
    The Fleeting Flyer's Fast Findings- if the item floats, flies, or is otherwise airborne this shop might have it. Limited time only and has (randomized) a rare three uncommons and six commons but the more you travel the more likely you are to come across it because it's on a one man spell jammer with two carnival cars behind it. u/LateLolth96
    The Kyuss Kasino- a worm themed casino where the main attraction is the purple tunnel which is a purple worm in a metal harness designed to prevent it from moving and to keep its mouth open. The wager, and incidentally, the show is if you can make it out the other end alive you [win]. There are scrying orbs that display a live feed of the current "adventurer" in the worm for 5 silver lasting 30 min before the next five silver (no refunds). Quest hook? u/LateLolth96
    Djinni Gin Jamboree- a once a month festival celebrating a moon cycle of the dm's choosing. Marids sell their distilled saliva as well as various forms of never-before-seen-by-man fish dishes, and water elementals play live music which more or less sounds like the rhythmic gurgling of a muddy brook. u/LateLolth96
    The Crossroads Corridor - An invite only shop, given to adventures who have a number of their own magical items. When the invitation is slid under any closed doorway, said doorway will become the doorway to the shop. Operated by The Masked Man, it is a magical item shop that trades magical items for magical items of similar value. Leaving will exit out the door you originally put the invitation under. u/Hacknslaasher
    Bottom's Bottomless Meatpies - It's cheap, delicious (although a bit gamey and hard to chew) and the servings are enormous. The shop is run by an old goblin with an enormous smile, his name is Toothy Bottom, less so because of his bum, and more so because of a secret that he isn't telling any one, the secret that has made his Meatpie-shop the most well visited in the entire area, at least by those not able to afford fine dining in the upper districts.For you see, underneath this humble shopped, staffed every hour of every day with more goblins than you can count on one hand, or two hands if you have taken ABM (Advanced Barbarian Maths), lies a large, cavernous mining operation.You enter it through a set of large trap-doors found in the cold-store basement where you find the literal wheelbarrows of meat that allow every customer to order however much meat they want in (or on) their pies, as long as the Goblins can lift it up to the counter (the largest order so far was, according to the Goblins managing the front of the house, "the weight of a small baby wrapped in a nasty hunting dog." they have made no comment as to how they know that specific measurement).Once you are through the trap-doors, you'll find a rail-system rivaling that of the largest Dwarven mines, with rail-master goblins timing and directing all the in- and out- going traffic, and every cart that comes in is absolutely and utterly loaded with meat, which is then loaded on wheelbarrows and carted up through the trapdoor.If you were to follow the rails as deep as they go, through all of the winding tunnels, across chasms, past various cave-dwelling monsters that try to snack on the meat or goblins or, well, you, then you'll eventually find yourself at the namesake of mr. Toothy Bottom.A large, mass of rock-hard skin, covered in spines and horns and other sharp shapes, it has been split open, and the dark flesh underneath is mined ceaselessly by a small army of Goblins. They aren't violent, in fact, they are quite cowardly, but they are as professional as any Goblin can be, and they are also fighting a continuous fight against the flesh with their pickaxes.For you see, the open wound is constantly trying to close itself, regenerating at a blinding speed that the Goblins have learned to keep up with after opening the wound large enough to allow for their massive excavation progress.This may be the toothy bottom of the pits and chasms.But it is also a small area of the sleeping Tarrasque, regenerating fast enough that it does not notice the harm being done to it, and with a large enough Goblin Workforce to drive the economy of what is, essentially, a small Goblin Kingdom in these tunnels, complete with blacksmiths making new Meat-axes and monster-hide-leathercrafters making workboots and pants for the Goblins working down in that caustic blood.And let's not forget, that the entire lower class of the city has eaten Tarrasque meat at least once, some of them for years.But it's only two silver pieces for as much pie as you want (or can carry), so who cares to ask where it's all coming from? u/Neknoh
    Sarah’s sewing shop, “World class Seamstress.” - She means world class! She can repair even magical fabric to like new condition. Everything she makes alterations to gives them a +1 to charisma for 24hrs or until dirtied. Bonus returns after being thoroughly washed and dried (some items are dry clean only)She’s also a dry cleaners. u/rab-byte
    The Philosopher’s Time Shop - Sundials, watches, windup clocks, candle clocks, hourglasses the size of mites up to the size of your average goliath, the Philosopher has a range to suit almost any buyer in need of a way to measure time. Be careful, the hours you spend there fly away like seconds! u/ElZoof
    Oakshot Saddliery - Gwinnett Oakshot caters to a select clientele, those looking for clothes, armour, weapons and equipment specifically designed to suit those who spend at least part of their days in a different body shape. Minor magic at most, it’s mostly just very well designed to suit your Druid on the go or werebeing out for a night on the town. u/ElZoof
    Jasper, Goldhand, Bloodstrangler and Smith - What does “‘til death us do part” mean if your wife is now a lich? Does a lifetime guarantee still stand if the object in question broke before the manufacturers were born? What exactly is an annuity? The firm of JGB&S is on hand to assist with non-devilish contracts of any kind. u/ElZoof
    Morogh's "Pet's" - This pet shelter is run by an older halfling named Morogh. He's kindhearted and only wants the best for his little animal companions he sells. From apes over hawks to wolfs, he just has every animal companion you could think of, but his store also has a back area. Not everyone is welcomed there as he also sells abandoned monster hatchlings, like griffons, owlbears, pseudodragons and even a red dragon wyrmling. Those monsters are all tamed so no danger there, Morogh just wants to know his customers better before trying to sell one of his more 'exotic' assets.The adventurers maybe can persuade him or do a favor for him (possible quest), like acquiring some exotic food for the more demanding beasts and monsters he houses. After this Morogh decides to sell them one of his monsters as a companion. u/Th3Banzaii
    Plane Ole' Butcher - A butcher shop that sells meat from an unknown plane of origin. One day a small portal opened up from the ground and strange-smelling exotic meats have been extruding from the portal. A shop was built around the portal which has been active and pumping for 50 years. People come to see the wonder firsthand but they stay for the dirt-cheap meats. The meats are char-grilled and heavily spiced to soften the meat's naturally pungent flavor. u/HeyShipmate
    Looters Late Return (aka LooLaRe)- A seedy smelling store run by an androgynous goblin who wears overly fancy clothes. This goblin sells in bulk only, and at discounted prices. The catch is that if you make a purchase, you must sign a contract guaranteeing repeated weekly purchases. Your bulk discount increases the more product you are able to move, but if you are unable to maintain your weekly purchases, the goblin’s secret network of enforcers comes for it’s dues. Or your life. u/pikkl_rikk
    Sandman Fisheries - This tightly packed stall smells or marine air and salty nets. It has all the sea can offer to the gourmet with a striking emphasis on huge fish: tuna, spadefish, and the occasional gargantuan squid. The product is impeccably fresh. Always. Sandman (a desert dweller and camel race aficionado) doesn't seem to understand what you're asking about the supply chain and how come his shop ever exists at hundred of miles from the nearest sea! u/Banuken
    T'zargo's fine wares - This shop can be mysteriously seen in any plane, but always appears as an identical modern convenience store looking building. Inside is a tabaxi named T'zargo, always advertising his "fine wares at reasonable prices." He sells extremely rare and powerful items for millions of gold, along with random everyday items. Some of these rare items include an axe once wielded by Baphomet, and draws from a deck of many things. His mundane items he always pulls out of a box on his counter, and they include a full rowboat and 30 chairs. u/Kellen1013
    The Magic Commoner - A basic magic item shop owned by a young elf wizard named Tavon Ilidan. He sells all sorts of magical things from armor to weapons and rings an such.The thing about his shop even though on the outside it looked like a regular building despite being one solid color; purple, orange, green ect. But when you walk inside it's much larger than its outward appearance.The shop also travels via a magical door. Tavon has a set of different keys he keeps with him representing the different cities of the land/world. He first closes the front door, locks it, then unlocks it with a new city key and when he opens it, it opens to the new city.Tavon's appearance reflects on which city he is in and what color his shop is. If is shop is blue his robes are blue as well. Tavon also has a secret. Even though he looks like a young elf he is actually an ancient gold dragon that simply likes to travel and meet new people without the stigma of being a dragon. He likes to play tricks on people and test them to see if they are worthy of specific items in his shop, (IE a wand of fireballs he made himself.) u/nota_person
    Mallard Maladies - A veterinary clinic for ducks. The shop keeper is an old blind man who refuses to heal non duck creatures, but can be tricked into healing non ducks with a high enough deception ability. Despite the name, the clinic services male and female ducks. u/El_Jewbacabra
    The Exploding Wand Shop- A shop that is characterized by an explosion that lifts the roof of the building off the walls and expelled black smoke every few hours - followed by the owner shouting from inside "I'M FINE, EVERYTHING'S OKAY!"The owner is a young Eladrin Artificer named Seyf Melorathian who experiments on new wands and other magical wonders. His face is a black charcoal from the soot of the explosions but otherwise would be a light brown. He has a pair of glasses that protects his eyes from being covered in soot. He has blond hair and wears a Smith's apron. He sells common rarity wands, up to rare rarity wonderous items, and has been working on an experimental wand of fireballs. You can only purchase an experimental wand if you do a material gathering quest for him.If you buy one of his wand of fireballs (2000gp and a waiver signed to not sue) there's a 10% chance that when used the wand will cast a second fireball centered on you during the spell.He also offers enchanting services at various speeds depending on the rarity of the requested enchantment. He will also willingly take on apprentices or teach enchantment to anyone. u/xBramStokerx
    Fishman’s Man Fry – A Triton, named Vamras Vogalath, with broken Common serves delectable seafood dishes. If asked about the name, he explains that it is food FOR men, not for fishes.Side note- this is shop is not anywhere near any large body of water. Nobody in town is sure exactly where the fish come from. u/Unprincipled
    Shwarma Tent - delicious herb infused fried flatbread with cured meats and shredded carrot and cucumber. The tent has small tripod tables and stools of worn wood. Patrons carve their names and other messages into the tabletops. Among the mundane names can be found the names of previous characters and NPCs that the party met, BBEGs they defeated, dated long ago, the current ruler of the land and the name of an old lover with a heart around it, Ash Ketchum, Drizzt, The Doctor, and the original Avengers. Searching carefully can also reveal a cryptic message to the party, seemingly carved years prior, but naming the PCs. u/bluecor
    Threads of Fate - three old sisters weave spidersilk and mundane silk into beautiful garments with embroidery that sometimes changes its image. For instance, a nightrobe has the moon and a starry sky embroidered, and the moon changes its phase with the real moon. On another, a dragon slowly chases its own tail, with its wingtips pointing to the time, as a clock. Yet another displays an hourglass which constantly drains, and runs out when the wearer dies. Other images might show great moving battles, gently waving flags that slowly fade and dilapidate as the empire becomes more corrupt, or ruins that become progressively overgrown with vines. The theme of the garments deal with the passage of time and the inevitable end of life. u/bluecor
    Salty's - the owner Saltamancia sells salt of differing coarseness and colors, and is an expert on which textures best compliment which purposes, from baking fine rolls to soaking one's feet after a days march. He has certain rare salts from distant lands with rare properties. For abjuring circles, he has a blessed salt that cannot be dispersed by gusts of wind. For healing, he has a fine blue salt that, when mixed with honey and packed into a wound, prevents infection and scarring. Another salt taken with hot peppermint tea can remove an additional level of exhaustion with a rest. True to his name, Saltamancia is old and curmudgeonly u/bluecor
    Bestboots - Bestboots sells custom footwear of exceeding quality, made from rare materials. The footwear can be light for nimble moves or heavy for kicking doors. With the right materials (possibly a quest) minor advantages can be built into the footwear. For example, a sole of felted yeti hair can give normal traction on ice, and a sole of gummed soapwood sap can allow the wearer to ignore a casting of grease underfoot. u/bluecor
    Hap's Microbrews - Hap claims to have perfected the means of beer portability, in that his brews are bottled and sealed under pressure in containers of lightweight spun cellulose which dont shatter when dropped. Opening his bottled beer releases a small localized burst of cold, chilling the beer just shy of freezing. The locals generally ignore his cart and "ice cold beer" sign, as ales are meant to be drunk at room temperature so that they don't unsettle the stomach. A discouraged Hap sits by his cart of beer bemoaning his own foolishness at sinking his fortune into such a folly. u/bluecor
    Indelible - this quiet dusty alcove sells the magical inks, parchment, paper, vellum, papyrus, and delicate quills needed to prepare arcane and divine scrolls. Also sketch artistry, heraldry, and calligraphy supplies. Blank spellbooks, charcoal, pastels, and a few unique items are sold. Glowing chalk leaves marks that remain luminous for several hours. A special lightly waxed paper is waterproof and can be written on underwater with a special pencil. A waterproof scrollcase holds six tightly rolled papers in individual tubes, designed so you can immediately draw out the scroll you desire without searching through a sheaf of papers. The proprietor Abagnale is a gifted forger, and can make needed documents for the right fee, but only those skilled in thieve's cant would be able to recognize this based on a small glyph carved above the lintel. u/bluecor
    The Magical Arts - this is a totally mundane shop which sells shaved and marked decks of cards, scarves for pulling from your sleeves, salted nuts cans that shoot a confetti burst when opened, squirting lapel flowers, palm buzzers, chewing gum that turns your teeth black, whoopie cushions, and stink spray. The guy working there isn't the owner, but is happy to teach you how to use his goods. While distracting you with a card trick, he will also attempt to shortchange you or pickpocket something (minus 4 to notice his ledgerdemain). If caught, he will only say "check your pocket" and there you will find the item you thought he pickpocketed. "Its all part of the trick, man," he will say, as he pulls a coin from your ear. u/bluecor
    The Bee's Knees - honey from different types of flowers with exceptional flavors. Meads of each type are also sold, as well as bee pollen and honey candies. A honey from frostclover will quickly dispell a hangover. Phasebee royal jelly can allow an additional use of misty step for a character with that feature, but the cost is exorbitant. The affogatto with honeycomb, coffee, and ice cream is delicious, and gives the benefits of a short rest when consumed in the shop over the course of an hour. u/bluecor
    Wacky Backy - Mr. C. Marin runs this fine tobacconist. House blends of pipe and cigarette tobacco can have classic Gandolf effects: controllable luminous smoke rings of various colors, and custom flavors and scents. The halfling weed is also sold. A self-lighting pipe is available, as well as a "peace pipe," which is a heavy iron pipe useable as a club (but you can also smoke out of it). Mr. Marin can craft custom peace pipes of nearly any light weapon. u/bluecor
    Wild Bill's Skins - Bill buys and sells tanned and untanned hides of all types. All. Types. Bill can craft armor and other leather goods from nearly any type of hide. Custom saddles can be made for any beast. A saddle on display is embossed "ride me hard and put me away wet." It isn't for sale, and it looks like it would fit Bill. He can craft a skin-tight custom leather armor that is concealable under clothing, but the customer must go into the back of the shop for a very long and invasive fitting. Rumor has it that some customers never emerge. u/bluecor
    Yellow Dancer - This is a musical instrument store run by a purple-haired elf named Lancer who was a freedom fighter in the past. His sister, Yellow Dancer herself, a famous concert performer who is a recognized star, is sometimes there in his place. Instruments of high quality and beginner pieces are sold. On commission, Lancer can craft an instrument which contains a secret sheath for a hidden weapon or wand. Also sold is "the Axe," a battleaxe/guitar combo, with a magical property of sound amplification that allows it to be heard in the largest venue, and allows for unique distortion effects. At DM Option, the Axe can also be used for ranged sonic attacks, mimicking the effects of Eldritch Blast. u/bluecor
    The Titty Twister: an adult entertainment venue, mostly for merchants and caravan guards. A goblin barker in a tophat and coattails out front gives a spirited pitch about the feminine wonders to be found within. Inside is a seedy establishment styled to look like an ancient temple. Billiards and darts games line the walls, and a poker game is playing out at a table near the center. Its a rough crowd, and fights that break out are settled with the loser being dragged away by the bouncers and the winner buying a round for the house. Beautiful dancers take turns on stage and mingle with clients between songs. Private shows are available. During the day the massive door is barred and the place is eerily silent, but from dusk til dawn raucous action is there for the taking. Locals stay well clear and pray for protection if they must pass near this den of sin. u/bluecor
    The Campus Martius: This strange storefront is a place for games of strategy, including draughts and card games, as well as sandtable war strategy matches involving miniature army figurines, played out with dice and measuring sticks. Arguments over rules are common, and are arbitrated by a robed and wigged judge on a low dias at one end, who often consults an enormous tome of rules which only he is allowed to read from. 1sp per game, per player, but by convention, the loser pays the fees of his opponents. A sweet green drink called mountain brew is popular here. It enhances focus, adding +1 to concentration saves for an hour, but leaves one tired, -1 to all saves for an hour thereafter. u/bluecor
    Millenium Sustainable Armory: run by an elvish druid, Millenium sells "murder free" armor made from silk, giant leaves, sustainably harvested ironwood and similar materials. The armor otherwise has the properties of normal light and medium armors, but contains no leather, bone, or metal. Cost is about double. Heavy armor is not available. The leaves making up the armor do not wilt or turn brown. u/bluecor
    The Meat Market: run by a shadowy figure in torn robes, this odd shop gives permanent magical effects in exchange for body parts. The more important the organ or body part, the better the effect. The effect goes to whoever the part comes from, so don’t get greedy!
    Fernado's Fish Frenzy - in a village where magic and fishing collide, you might run into a man who can be at multiple places at a time, Fernado. He is a mystical fisherman who sets up booths in town squares, where the fish fight to the death in gladiator-style combat. The loser, is placed on his selling slab and the victor becomes larger in size. He has a 'leaderboard' that updates magically after every battle, accounting for all of the places Fernado is at in your world. u/BEZERK0xD
    A rickety old shop plastered with the title of some famous adventuring party / adventurer on it. The entire shop is run by a near delusional fan of the party/individual, and sells merchandise about them, as well as weirdly specific information that you aren't sure how they know. (If your party is famous enough, the store might be dedicated to them) u/bladeraptor3
    1 Rats store - In an alley, there is a large pack of rats. Stories said that if you give them gold, they will bring you interesting items in exchange. They seem highly intelligent, and will also take shiny items, food and booze. It's hard to ask them for any specific item, without a druid or ranger that can communicate properly, but not impossible. Nobody knows where they get the things they sell.
    2 The treant - You enter the store, it's a mess: some shelves are broken, their content crashed on the ground, the floor is covered in leaves and branches. Behind the counter, an enormous tree. It's too tall for the room, so its upper part is bent in a really odd way against the ceiling, covering the entire room with its branches. You notice there is a face in the wood, a mouth opens, and with a deep voice that makes the whole building shake, it speaks "Welcome, how can I.... uh... help you lil' saplings... ye?" This treant always liked humans, for some reason, and dreamed of experiencing their life. One day, he stopped some wolves attacking a merchant that was going through the forest, in exchange the merchant hired the treant in his shop. He's pretty terrible: goofy, slow and destructive, often breaking things when he moves his branches around, but he's trying and slowly improving.
    3 the alley - There is a back alley in the shadiest part of town, in it, you'll find an even smaller alley, barely large enough for one person, nestled between tall houses. It's dark and damp, hard to breath. Go there at midnight, place a bag full of god at the very end of the alley, with a note saying what you item you need. Then, take a knife, cut yourself and drop some blood on the street stones. At midday the next day, if the gold was enough, you will find what you wanted in the same place. If it wasn't, you'll find a severed pig head, with a similar but not-quite-the-same item in its mouth. 
    4 The cleric of the god of lies - Apparently a normal shop with a very friendly and generous owner, this place is built above a temple to the trickster god, and the shopkeeper its cleric. Every item sold here has a drawback: potions are mislabelled, many items are cursed, armours have holes or missing parts. Their rope is too short, their lanterns give out bright pink light, their thieves tools always break, their backpack is always wet and ruins what's in it. Their blankets make you itch etc. They do it just to fuck with people, for fun. If caught, they will say they have been cursed and send the players on a fool's errand to remove it, while they run away. 
    5 The barbarian - This store is owned by a violent barbarian that wants gold to buy food and booze. He has no concept of personal space and is very touchy, if a client asks for a "lame" item he'll laugh and offer something else, if the client looks like a nerd (mage) he'll make fun of them. He likes bartering, but has no interest in items that seem weak or unworthy of a warrior, and will handle them very roughly. Don't sell anything made of glass to him, he'll just throw it at you laughing. 
    6 The pit - In the middle of town is a strange pit, throw something in it and a pale, long tentacle will emerge from the darkness, giving you something of equal value in exchange, sometimes. Some have tried going inside, they all came back but couldn't remember what was there. 
    7 The bog - There is an isolated bog, not too far from town. Make the correct signal at night and from the tar a whole shop will emerge. It's a black market store, with many rare and illegal items, that magically hides inside the bog for safety. The people working in it are all slender humanoid frogs with a lucid black skin.
    8 The paranoid - There is a store hidden by a 3 meters tall wall, it has no visible windows, only a steel door. Inside, you'll find yourself in a completely empty room with only a chair and another metal door with a hole in it. The owner is extremely paranoic and mysterious. Only one person can go in the store at once, has to sit on the chair and ask what they want. The shopkeeper will talk to them from behind the door, and procure the item they want. The gold must be put on a tray that goes under the door, and the item will be dropped from the slit in the door. The buyer never sees the owner, any attempt to enter or spy on them with magic will find it's extremely hard. The room with the chair can be flooded with toxic gas if clients aren't following the rules. The owner is always there, always the same person, but if you listen very well, you may notice he's often whispering to someone else behind the door, and there are multiple voices.
    9 The space-shifted - This store exists in a dozen locations at once. The same shopkeeper has the same inventory and works in all the stores at the same time. Clients will see strange, evanescent figures moving around: those are reflections of people in the other stores. They will see a haze around the owner, he will look blurry and stretched. That's because he's dealing with someone else somewhere else. The store can be used to move things to distant places rapidly (give a coin to the owner, he can give it instantly to any person in any of the other stores), but not living creatures. 
    10 Yourself - The players enter the store and behind the counter is... the players. They will be very friendly with themselves, but refuse to answer any question: all they can say is that time-travel is involved, they'll see in the future, it's fine, no need to worry. Saying anything could cause a paradox, so they can't, but they can still sell them things. And they already know what they will buy, because they already bought them in their past, the players present. bonus points if you can imitate your player's voices.
    11 The involuntary shopkeeper - This guy hates his own job more than anything, all he really wants is to sit behind the counter with his bottle of wine and smoke his pipe, not being bothered by anyone, especially not customers. He runs a shop with adventuring gear; winter clothes, magical trinkets, potions, rope and stuff like that. More focus on the magical stuff than anything else. The fact that the shop specializes in adventuring gear isn't by chance, our dear shopkeeper chose the business he guessed had the least amount of customers, so he wouldn't be bothered so much. He can abide what he considers "real" adventurers as customers, but only just. Selling stuff means he has to restock, and that is such a pain. When the party first meet him, his shop is almost empty, and the few items that are still on the shelves are strewn about in a rather disorderly fashion. He's exhausted and annoyed, and almost chases them out again the moment they step in the door. The problem is that the nobles in the city has decided that adventuring, and especially adventuring gear(less danger than real adventuring), is all the rage at the moment. As the only shop that specializes in this kind of stuff, everyone who thinks they are something in town has been by and emptied him out. He might even consider giving the party some serious discounts in the future, if they could get adventuring firmly out of fashion again...
    12 The Prancing Kobold - When entering the shop, it quickly becomes apparent that half of this shop is a gigantic steel cage. In the middle of that cage is a relatively large pile of gold (knee high on a regular human). On top of that gold is a Red Scaled Kobold. Fiercely protective of his horde and possessions, he had the shop built around his horde so that no one could ever steal it. There's a person sized area where a series of complicated doors can allow the exchange of large items. To open the doors, the kobold must disable several traps using levers on his side of the of the room. He will never allow anyone into the cage and tries to never leave it. He will attempt to get the players to bring him a live chicken by paying them up to 10 gold. He will then ravenously consume the chicken.
    13 She's everyones grandmother - The big asshole barbarian? "Sweety I really wish you would chew with your mouth closed, you know better" The angsty rogue? "Oh deary, why do you wear so much black? I really wish you would wear more color, you have such a lovely smile" (Maybe she's knitted him a scarf next time they show up). The Wizard? "Oh my, that was a lovely trick" or maybe he tries to show her some magic that will help around the house, and it's like teaching your grandmother how to use her computer. The drunk in the group? "Its not my place to say, but I feel you're letting yourself down. I'll put the kettle on, you sit by the fire and try to rest" She wants to feed them, and won't take no for an answer. She will subtly suggest that areas of her property are in disrepair, and that they should assist her with chores, which invites more interaction. The idea here is to disarm your players, so no matter how much of a dick they are, they treat her like they would their grandmother. (No swearing, wipe their feet, make her proud, etc.)
    14 The Alchemist - Every alchemy shop in the world leads into a pocket dimension run by a gnome alchemist. If pressed for his name he just says "Al" or "The Alchemist." The players are the only people who get sent to the pocket dimension when they enter an alchemy shop--for the rest of the world this place doesn't exist. Al is prescient and likes to tease the players, they're close friends who have been to his shop on many occasions, after all, even if it's the first visit for the players themselves. He doesn't really sell anything so much as he gives out free samples, of which he always has exactly one ready. Al's potions are a bit weird. They have a label and always do exactly what the label says. Unfortunately, as they're experimental samples, the labels are a bit vague. An example: The Red Potion, *if you drink it, something will die. * Basically it gives my players some fun wacky items to use that I don't even know what they'll do until they get consumed. I usually have them do specific things based on the context of the situation they're getting used in and try to favor word play as much as practical effects.
    15 Pit fiends plaza - When the players ask for directions to a store, they all get directed to a building that looks like it got bombed in the blitz, and only the door is standing. Opening the door reveals a circular room with racks and shelves packed full with oddities and magic items galore. At the counter is a cheery imp who serves the devil lord mammon and a lesser devil who works as his intern. When the players purchase anything from the store, the imp will tell them the fate of the last adventurer to wield the item and what they paid to get it. He will then offer to trade the item for a contract: he gets all your things when you die and your soul works for mammon in the afterlife. Very few people take this offer, but there are some immensely powerful artifacts in his possession that he will only part ways with if you make the deal
    16 The Shop that Sells Itself - A store of mundane gear with no shopkeeper to be found. A sign on the front door says "Back In A Few Days, Come Right In!", and the place is apparently open 24/7. The owner is a wizard who takes long forays into adventuring (maybe he's just gone right now and will be back later, or maybe gone for good). Either way, the shop is magically enchanted to grant a sort of semi-sentience to the objects for sale so that they can sell themselves. Signs underneath each item list a price and instructions to leave the money in the object's place. Coils of rope will go on long spiels about how durable and plaint they are. Earthenware pots make strong appeals about the beauty in their own symmetry. Candles describe the exact amount of time they'll burn, and offer helpful snuffing advice. If an item is bought and paid for, the money placed in its stead is swallowed up by a mysterious void, and the item becomes inert/mundane. If an item is taken without paying, well let's just say that the objects in the store make very accurate witnesses for the local magistrate's prosecution case.
    17 The teleporting shack - This shack will seem to appear in the most random places. Sometimes it will be in the middle of a field, a dungeon or delicately balanced on the statue in the city centre. The shop keeper is constantly preoccupied; frantically running around the shop gathering all sorts of magical items from piles of unorganised goods, and taking them into the next room. He comes across a little loony and obsessed, this is perhaps because he is. He’s busy trying to perfect his homemade teleportation device, and it’s all he can think of... As he’s so busy, getting the shop keepers attention for more than a minute can prove challenging. It’s easier to just take what you came for, if you can find it that is. Unless you have to go digging through junk to find it he probably won’t notice, but if he does I hope you’ve always secretly dreamed of being a pig.
    18 A warlock multi-level marketing scheme - Some extraplanar being made a deal with a warlock, and told them to extend the pack for others. They use abilities given by their patron to provide some good or service that is harder to get otherwise. Maybe the fey MLM provides a supply of rare feywild fruits, or they offer to guide people through a forest faster than usual using fey shortcuts. Maybe the great old one warlocks are booksellers. Their primary goal is collecting knowledge from people, but they make their money by making and copying books. They deal in knowledge and secrets. These different groups of warlocks make deals with normal humans. The person sells their soul/energy to the warlocks above them. Those above keep gaining power. Their patron gains the most, of course.
    19 Okail and Halite's Enchantments - A magic items shop run by a female kobold (Halite) and a male gnome (Okail). Halite's the sort that acts gruff to cover her caring streak, and wants things done "properly" (again, because she cares that it's done right.). Think "the one halfway nice and helpful lady at the DMV" and you're on the right track. Okail's the quietly cranky guy that lights up like a little kid when you get him talking about his interests, and is constantly trying to find "better" ways to do things without explaining to anyone else what he's doing or why until Halite yells at him for it. The two put up a clearly forced front of polite friendliness to potential customers while bickering and snarking at each other...when they aren't finishing each other's sentences, that is. They also agree on the fact that getting to work on interesting orders is fun and making money is even better. The shop has a huge selection of items in the back room, retrieving any of them involves much yelling back and forth about where things are located and why, sounds of large objects being moved around, and occasional personal injuries. (Halite subtly resents when they go through this process and have to put things back.) It is gradually hinted that the two are married ("My mother warned me about mammals, but no, I was in love..." etc) and that hatchlings are involved. Neither will acknowledge any questions on this matter, further pursuit of such inquiry might find one's enchanted items displaying unusual quirks.
    20 The catfolk archivist with insanely high stealth skill who tolerates exactly zero shenanigans in her spell shop. (*clears throat behind barbarian*)
    21 The grizzled bowyer singlehandedly attempting to negate every "pretty boy elf" trope.
    22 The super-sketchy back alley shop with an illegible sign trading in "exotic goods". (party wanted to sell a monster they captured alive).
    23 Gaiman Nancy's Always Open book shop and supplies - I made a shop where there is one in many towns and all big cities. The shops are even in unlikely places like Skullport. They are small book shops with amazing amounts of lore. They also sell some spell casting supplies like incense, foci, and paper. Each shop is small and filled with piled books. The shops are open 24 hours a day, 10 days a week. On entry, the shopkeeper is never there, but if they ring a bell the shopkeeper comes. The shopkeeper never leaves the store and often asks for the PCs to run errands for them outside the bookstore. Each shopkeeper is different, and quirky, and they all claim to work for Gaima Nancy. In truth, there is only one shop and only one shopkeeper. Their name is Gaima Nancy and they are a very powerful wizard Changeling. They attempted to use Wish to allow them to have Mordekainen's Magnificent Mansion with doors opening in multiple locations. The spell worked, but had side effects. The Mansion doors can be opened in multiple locations via a ritual spell cast in that location. However Gaima Nancy can no longer leave and he can't close the doors. If the players can convince him, he can let them use the store to travel from place to place, but only if they get to a high level.
    24 The dragon shop keeper - A clever dragon realized that they could make more money running a shop then from terrorizing the kingdom. They sell magic items from their horde to adventurers for a considerable profit. They are highly charismatic and will persuade adventurers to spend as much as their gold as possible. Wise adventurers know not to steal from the dragon or they might end up as lunch and their gear sold to other adventurers.
    25 Ren's In all of my open ended games, I have a wealthy and powerful family with the surname of Ren who own a string of franchises shops across the world in major cities and some large villages. Think like a Home Depot or a UHaul or whatever. All the shop types have different suffixes. Renoo’s Potions, Renai’s Horse Rentals, Renah’s Tavern and Beds, etc. Horse rentals have been pretty convenient. Rent a horse for a one way trip and return it to any Renai’s but make sure to feed them first before you return them or face a hefty fine. I sometimes have fun with this. When the players reach a high enough level, then Ren family uses the players as marketing material, kind of like Coca Cola sponsoring a race car — “these guys trust Ren’s to get it done!” You could also make quests around the family. Maybe it turns out they are not as benevolent as they seem up front. Make a whole series of quests around how they use their influence to influence kingdom policy to their benefit to the detriment of the lower class, or whatever else. Or maybe their best items are actually stolen or looted from graveyards. Or maybe they want you to discreetly take out the competition.
    26 Although Shiny can't speak, she understands the concept of barter very well. A player may present a magic item they wish to trade, and if Shiny likes it she will rummage through her nest and produce a magic item that she is willing to give in return. If the player finds the offer acceptable, they can give their item to Shiny and she will let them take the other item. If the player doesn't like Shiny's offer, she might produce another item, or perhaps even offer an additional item if she really likes the player's item. However, after a couple of failed barter attempts Shiny will give up and stop bartering. Don't be afraid to have Shiny offer the players a bad deal at first, she is a magpie after all - they are cunning birds. Did the paladin fall down a bottomless pit? Did the entire party die while carrying the McGuffin? It's quite likely that the lost magic items wound up with Shiny somehow! Even if the characters don't know it, the players might find it cool that Shiny has the exact same Holy Avenger that the party's late paladin had carried. And it's a way for the players to retrieve lost useful items, even if it's a little bit videogamey.
    27 The Many - At the edge of town lies a door in a doorframe, nothing else around. Inside is a room made of deep purple bricks and braziers with green flames. At the center of the room lies a jar full of blackness and glowing yellow eyes. When you open the jar, the creatures fly about, eventually settling, creating the illusion of a humanoid cloaked in turquoise. If you tell them what you want, they will respond with an ominous chorus of voices saying the required gold amount. They take them gold, put it in the jar, and produce said item from within the cloak. They be Many. (Inspired by Shovel Knight: Specter of Torment)
    28 Helcynth the Traveling Hag Merchant - Helcynth is a traveling night hag and magic item creator, who can strangely appear in different cities or locations the party ends up in, no matter whether the party left ahead of her from the last location or not. The players will often find her in marketplaces in her small tent, though the interior is about two to three times the size it should be. She of course sells a plethora of magical items that she has bought to resell or created herself. She deals in gold as with most merchants, but some items can only be paid for with souls (or one can offer to trade a soul for other items). The player can sell theirs for her to collect upon their death, but ideally they will agree to a deal she offers: when they have subdued someone and are willing to use their soul to pay Helcynth, they only need read a fiendish word written on a small ticket she will give the players, and she will appear to finish off and collect the soul from the subdued person. The offering will need to be wholly defeated but not dead (unconscious or captured at very low HP), and she will not fight with the party for a soul. This character bends the rules a bit and takes some liberties with night hag lore because it’s from a homebrew setting, but hey, she worked great for my game, even if my players ended up reneging on their deal with her and started a whole tangential arc where they had to invade her pocket dimension and kill her.
    29 The Imprisoned Shopkeeper - He/she was a powerful sorcerer/wizard who brought the ruling empire to its knees long ago. Fortunately, the empire was able to rise up and defeat the wizard. Now, the wizard is kept prisoner in his ancient tower, kept in check by arcane magic and the fortress built around the tower, not to keep people out, but to keep him in. As per terms to his imprisonment, he must sell all of his scrolls, magic items, and potions. His prices are extremely high, of course, as it is quite expensive to keep this powerful arcane user's magic in check. Oh, and he is quite insane from centuries of isolation. Sidebar: It is fun to role-play animosity between the now insane shopkeeper and the warden. Also interesting to watch how the players interact with one who once performed evil acts, but is now on the path to redemption... or is he?
    30 Izzet Shopenator 3000 (prototype) - An izzet inventor has tried to make an automated shop. At the counter there are several tubes, speak the desired item into one of these tubes and they will fly down the tube to the customer, sometimes breaking the tube, making the item fly out of the side, and sometimes delivering the wrong item that almost sounds alike. When the item has been delivered the amount of money written on the item must be put into the tube, where it will suck up the cash, sometimes getting the customers arm caught as well. If the item is removed from the tube without delivery of payment, the item will explode. When payment is recieved, the exploding agent is automatically removed.
    31 Gnal's Shop - There's this dusty, old looking shop downtonw. You can read Gnal's Shop on a sign. Lights are aways out, so no one ever knows when it's actually open, but you can aways try the door. Inside, it's a rather well kept shop, and everything looks normal at First glance - except there's a Gnoll behind the balcony. The Gnoll is old and snorts while talking. He gives players discounts for bringing in more people, and is quite gulliable. The nice thing about him is that he is aways hungry, and new food makes him REALLY happy. He also makes remarks now and them about How tasty players look, and tells them about his memories eating members from the player's race. Apparently he got tired of killing to satiate his god's hunger, and is trying to do It by raising money.
    32 The Quest Hook - The party comes across a kid running a store. He’s very eager and enthusiastic, happy to show the party all the quirky magical items he has for sale. He apologizes that there’s only so much he can sell because Daddy told him he can’t sell the more dangerous/powerful items. When probed for more information, the party learns that Daddy has been missing for over a month. The kid and his dad usually scout/adventure together and bring the loot back to the store, but this time Daddy heard of a high-risk, high-reward place, so he went ahead and told the kid to run the shop. Only, the kid is getting worried about Daddy... This works great as 1) a way to tell adventurers about where to find loot 2) a way to explain why the party can’t yet get powerful magic items 3) a motivation to get loot (from the place and from the shop) and 4) an emotional/protective motivation for characters not solely motivated by greed. I used it as a quest hook into The Hidden Shrine of Tamoachan, and it worked pretty well. Also worth noting, I made the characters a kid and his dad, but gender isn’t important here so feel free to switch that up if you like.
    33 Discount Magic Goods Store - The store is run by an extremely aloof, airheaded wizard. He talks as if he's in a dreamy haze and moves with grand flourishes. If you ask him for a magic item he has it in every size, shape, colour or material you could dream of. Want Boots of Jumping? He's got it. Don't like that one? How about this one? How about this one? Maybe this one? If you ask he assures you yes, they are all Boots of Jumping. And they're all at 75% off too! Artifacts? Oh boy he's got artifacts. He's even got all 30 Eyes of Vecna! The joke is the guy got his hands on a staff that allows him to enchant any item, however he wants, 5 times per day but there's a 95% chance the item's going to become cursed and it puts a drain on his sanity. There's various odds of how badly cursed the items end up being and it's all a gamble for what the players are going to get if they buy anything. The Boots of Jumping could be anywhere from making Mario jump sound effects to making it so you can only move by jumping to making it so you can't jump at all. Always fun to watch the players debate if it's really worth it.

interesting taverns
    The Salty Seafarer - Found moored up at ports around the lands, this floating tavern is always busy, but only for a week or so before it sails off to it's next destination. Who knows when you'll bump into it again! Famed for the owner's stories and fables they have collected on their travels from the tavern's many patrons, as well as world famous bards who often travel along with it. Of course we can't forget to mention the exotic drinks and food they have picked up on the way!
    Nobody's Inn - Entering this tavern, you find that there doesn't seem to be an owner, although there are many patrons, pouring their own drinks and leaving coins in collection trays.
    The Boney Bar - The Boney bar is, if anything, creepier than it sounds. Not only are there skeletons serving you, nearly everything is made out of bones. The tables and chairs, a massive chandelier hanging in the centre of the room... even the mugs are skulls with the holes plugged up! Luckily, the food and drink is exquisite!
    The Dapper Dragon - A fancy restaurant that uses tiny dragons and other creatures to help cook food. Basically Ratatouille but with monsters! If I were you, unless you like your food black, I wouldn't ask for my steak to be "Well done."
    Hunter's Rest - Situated in the head of a huge dragon, this extravagant tavern is a place for hunters to show off their kills and share stories of their hunts. They also hold competitions here, as well as hosting a market and trade shows for meats, furs and other materials extracted from their kills. Adorning the walls of the three floors are the heads of all sorts of beasts, ranging from stags and boar to more exotic creatures like Owlbears and Displacer Beasts. There is a leaderboard filled with the top 20 hunter's names and how many points they have for the season.
    The Weather House - The weather inside this place is always different to what it is outside, offering respite if it is particularly hot or cold. Unfortunately the owners were not very specific with the wizard that they got to enchant their tavern, causing it to rain, snow or even hail inside when the weather outside is warm, which isn't great for business, although they do keep a few umbrellas by the front door, so you can stay mostly dry if you decide to stay here.
    Tinsy Winsy Tavern - Sandwiched between two large buildings is a small door leading to a tiny room with one stool in front of a short bar, leaving just enough room behind it for a halfling barkeep.
    The Drunken Dummy - Every night the owner is on stage with his wooden ventriloquist dummy. This thing looks creepy as hell, but they are telling some great jokes and the crowd is eating it all up! The act seems to show they have a complicated relationship, with the dummy regularly shouting down the owner and slapping him. It's a fantastic routine... or so it seems.
    The King's Armistice - This tavern has been untouched by many wars over the years. Said to have been blessed by a mighty wizards final words as he sacrificed himself to end a long and gory war, it is a place to go for some respite during warring times. Upon entering all equipment disappears, including clothing. No magic seems to work either. Of course upon exiting, many people instantly break any truce they previously had, making the surrounding area of this tavern a bit of a wreck.
    The Tinker Inn - As you push the door you hear a mechanical whirring. Looking up you see a clockwork soldier with a big hammer run out of a house and strike a bell, alerting the owner to a new visitor. Dotted around the tavern are all sorts of interesting toys and contraptions. Some are just for aesthetics, like a small hot air balloon flying around the room, but others are actually useful. Little trains run along tracks around the room delivering food and drinks and music is playing from a strange box at the back of the room.
    The Nibbly Fish - Opening the door you realise that nearly the whole floor is lowered and covered in a pool of water about a foot deep. A sign on the door says, "No shoes!" You take your boots off and step inside, noticing there are tiny colourful goldfish swimming around and nibbling the dead skin off your feet. There's nothing like a free foot pedicure whilst you enjoy a good drink!
    The Cat's Whiskers - Ran by a lovely Tabaxi family, this inn is full of cats of all different breeds. You'll find them napping on beams, weaving in and out of the patrons legs and mewing whilst they wait to be fed. It's a great place to visit if you like milk on tap! (But awful if you're allergic to cats)
    The Costumer's Always Right - There is a bouncer at the door dressed up like a bugbear. He says, "Hey, no coming in without a costume." Once dressed up sufficiently you are let inside. You see people dressed up as famous heroes from stories and also as monsters, some of which are real and some are made up. They are all chatting and laughing, pretending to fight and posing for portraits.
    Gravity Falls Tavern - Situated at the base of a waterfall that is actually flowing up the cliff instead of down it, the Gravity Falls Tavern is a sight to behold. It's upside down. Drunk people are exiting, stumbling around as they navigate the stone steps. Entering, you see a chandelier standing upright, 'hanging' from a chain set in the floor. The most amazing thing is that you see people walking and sitting on every single face of this room. Each side of the room seems to have it's own gravity field, including the bar, which is at 90 degrees to what you currently see as the floor. You realise that those people probably weren't drunk, just disorientated from dealing with all the changes in gravity!
    The Roasting Duck - Every night is roast night here at The Roasting Duck! We're not just talking about the food either. Come on in for you and your friends to get a good ol' roasting from our in-house roasters and you can even get up on stage and give it a go. The best roaster every night wins 30gp! Do you have what it takes?
    Firebeard Tavern - At the end of every night the magnificently bearded owner stands up on a table in the middle of the tavern to the cheers of the patrons and sets his beard on fire, keeping it going for as long as he can. During this time drinks are free so the patrons swig as much as they can before he has to pat it out. His record is 4 minutes!
    The Tower - Unlike any tavern you've seen before, this place is about 6 times taller than it is round! Apparently this place used to be connected to a massive castle, but it got destroyed in a great war. With a spiral staircase round the edge and a pole in the middle to slide down, this tavern is certainly a novelty. You notice all the staff members have incredibly strong calf muscles from walking up the steps so much. At the top of the tower is an open top terrace, offering an amazing view out across the surrounding valleys.
    The Grape Escape - An underground winery that stretches for longer than any tavern you've seen before. Like a wine cellar, this place has thousands of bottles in racks and shelves that make up the walls. What sets this apart from other wine cellars is that it is also a maze! Without a guide you are sure to get lost in its winding walls. 
    The Peace & Quiet - A haven for writers and readers alike, this is the quietest tavern/library you've ever seen. Although to be fair, it is the only tavern/library you've ever seen. With three floors of books, comfy seats and desks, this is a great place to relax, or even come for a quick nap... as long as you don't snore. If you're looking for a good book, this is the place to go. There are books on every wall, shelves upon shelves of ordered books and not to mention the staircases with books under every single step! You will be spoilt for choice! However, if you aren't keen on this scene you aren't going to have too much fun. There are alcoholic bevereges, but they are all cocktails themed around book names... (Tequila Mockingbird, Lord of the Gins, etc.) and there is a limit of one per customer to avoid anyone getting too loud.
    The Knife & Pork - With its very own in-house abattoir, feel free to select your favourite from a wide selection of pigs to chow down on this evening. It's the perfect place to be swined and dined! This place is really fancy and looks great from the outside. Everyone is dressed to the nines and are pretty posh. As soon as you enter you hear the squealing of pigs out the back. Likely to be a pretty harrowing experience for you and your party...
    The Amen Arms - The Amen Arms is a multi-use building, being a church and also a bar. The only problem is that they only sell communion wine on tap. Unfortunately this has left the members of the clergy with pretty severe drinking problems, which does liven up Sunday prayers, but isn't so great when the priest is loudly weeping at funerals and weddings.
    Rick Ade Bar - This bar has some of the trippiest drinks you've ever seen! Fizzing potions and steaming cauldrons are on every table and everything is so cheap! As you've had your fill and you go to leave you realise the door has been barricaded and there is no way out. You're told that all the drinks need to go before anyone can leave. Looking around you see there are creatures like Bugbears and Gnolls as well as people of all different races (and classes) around the bar, some not looking overly thrilled that they have to spend the night in this place. You see a fight break out between two clerics, shouting "Die demon scum! Go back to whence you came!" That's when you feel it start to kick in... What on earth is in these drinks?
    The Stray Fey Inn - This beautiful inn originated from the Feywild. Due to an accident many years ago, this inn and all of its patrons got transported to your plane. Apparently this was a pretty rough area before the inn turned up and they attracted some higher class visitors. No one is quite sure what happened with the inn that was here before, but it is common legend that it was taken to the Feywild with its less-than-savoury patrons so they could try and redeem themselves in a different land.
    The Playhouse - This grand theater has been converted into a dining establishment with live acts. Once a month the Queen visits and judges a talent competition, with the winner taking a spot in the Royal Talent Guild. Members of this guild go to live in the castle grounds, entertaining guests and earning a great salary before being kicked back out into the real world once the Queen has had enough of you. Past members all seem desperate to get back, but most of them fail.
    The Boar Inn - This tavern seems really standard. Just a really old sweet couple who are like 90 years old. Offer tea and coffee and cakes rather than booze. There are those white lacy doilies on the tables and it's just proper classic old person vibe. However, you do notice a dull repetitive thudding through the floorboards. With some investigation you find a bright neon, seizure-inducing underground club. Everyone is covered in glow in the dark patterns. Drink and drugs are in high supply. If you decide to stay you're soon joined by the old couple who properly rave it up. They ask that you do not tell anyone else of their secret club because the nobles wouldn't approve it. In return you get half price food and drink, either upstairs or downstairs.
    Twilight Tussle Inn - Every night at sunset a huge brawl breaks out over the tavern. Once there are x people left, everyone that lost must buy them a drink at some point during the evening. (Replace 'x' with the party size -1 person.) Naturally, the owners have long since stopped buying new glasses, tending to just use stone mugs because they are so much harder to break. They have also had to bolt down all of the tables and chairs to stop them being used as weapons every night. other than that is is pretty much no holds barred, although there will be a severe penalty if you actually kill someone during the tussle.
    The Brushstroke Bed & Breakfast - (BSB&B for short) is an idyllic and luscious establishment with a very special hook. Each rooms door is replaced by a large enchanted painting that creates different scenes to sleep in. Ranging from snugly tropical treehouses and luxurious campsites in the woods to frozen igloos and rocking boats on the sea. This place is sure to have a room for anyone to enjoy... if they have the coin to afford it.
    Fire and Ice Alehouse - This tavern features dueling bars on opposite sides of the room. One side icy and blue tones the other billowing flames and red tones. The two sides come together across the ceiling every hour to make “fire water” that falls from a swirling cloud in the middle of the room. Fire Water is a delicious drink that also provides its drinker resistance to fire and ice for 24 hours.
    The Toil & Trouble - Ran by a Neutral Witch, this place is filled with bad guys nearly 24/7. She doesn't seem to notice or care about anyone's alignments or what they get up to, unless there is any violence. If anyone causes a scene she descends on them, leaves them within an inch of their lives and bans them for life. If anyone tries to return, even in disguise, she knows and instantly kills them. She has no time for people that want to cause problems in her domain.
    The Rickety Witch - There aren't actually any witches in this bar, but the servers float around on brooms and are dressed up as them. The food is all themed around ingredients in potions. Rat tails, eyes of creatures, etc. Surprisingly tasty!
    The Dark Horse - This tavern is in complete darkness and any attempt to create a light either by magical or non-magical methods will fail. The staff all wear special goggles that allow them to see whilst serving tables and dealing with customers. It is billed as a unique experience to tantalise your senses, but in reality the owner is a once beautiful sorceress that has been horrifically disfigured by a curse and she hates being seen. She may employ the party to help lift the curse and in return offer them the tavern, which they can design however they wish.
    The Bam & Booze - The best way to describe this place is... confusing. The first thing you need to do is figure out how to get in! The door doesn't seem to open in the normal way. Do you try and go through a window? Down the chimney? Maybe there's a key hidden somewhere? It gets even more confusing once you get inside. All of the drinks are FREE! (As long as you can solve the puzzles the owner puts before you. Some may be in a different room of the tavern, whereas others could be simple riddles. Now you've had your fill and are ready to leave, how do you get out? Uh oh. It's a huge escape room! (I feel like this one will be really fun to flesh out for a DM!)
    Oasis - Stumbling through the desert you happen upon a large tent with camels tied up outside. Inside is a luxury bar with expensive drinks and attractive women. People are sitting around in beanbags, smoking who knows what from hookahs. Smells of delicious exotic foods are wafting through the air. It's very inviting. I'll let you DMs decide how real this place is! It could either be a mirage and not exist at all, a crappy little tent with horrible drinks under a major illusion or exactly as described. How evil are you feeling?
    The Meteorite Meat Shack - Located at the bottom of a huge impact crater from a meteorite, this self sustaining tavern is attached to a huge farm. Apparently the soil in the bottom of the crater is particularly fertile, leading to stronger crops and livestock! If your players do some investigating they will find out that the meteorite is still around, with a barn built around it in the dead centre of the crater. Of course it is the source of the mysteriously good crops and livestock. All it needs is a human blood sacrifice once a week...
    Cheep & Cheerful - A tavern filled with colourful birds of all different species flying around and perching on beams above you. You can buy seeds to feed the birds if you are so inclined. (They are also less likely to try and eat your dinner if you feed them!). No Cats or Tabaxi allowed.
    Hear Here! - Live music, 24/7, featuring all your favourite artists and bands; Coldflay, Goblin Manuel Miranda, Armour Class/Difficulty Class, Owlbear City, Bulette Zeppelin and more! (5gp entry)
    Muscles & Cockles - The only restaurant where you can pump iron and pump beer, from a tap. The beer, not the iron. The stronger you are, the heavier your discount. Upon entering you must perform a feat of strength, such as hitting a button with a mallet to try and ding the bell at the top or lifting something heavy, like barrels of beer or a rotund gentleman.
    The Holey Grail - Named after a grail that has been pierced hundreds of times, be it from arrows, explosions or a multitude of other things. Every night the tavern owners hold a contest to see who can create the most holes when it is tossed in the air. After 12 hours the grail has mysteriously repaired itself. (You could make this a magical item or simply have the owners replace it with a new one every day)
    Love Me Knot - This tavern is placed right there on the beach. But, oh no, the tides coming in! Never fear, the Love Me Knot floats and is tied down to heavy anchors beneath the sea floor to stop it from drifting away. Of course it still seems to move around the beach every other week to find a nice spot in the sun.
    Grogchamp - Winner of finest Grog 3 years straight, you'd be hard pressed to find a finer drink. However, the brewer is letting all the fame get to his head and is getting rather arrogant, challenging all around to try and create a better beverage. Are your party up to the task?
    The Leeky Crockpot - Everything is... leeky. Like, based on leeks. Leeks on your food, leeks used as stirrers in your drinks. There are even leeks on the beds! Where are all these leeks coming from? Now you smell like leeks. You scrub and you scrub, but still, the leeky reek remains. If your adventurers get a bed here for the night they take a charisma hit to all except those who love leeks, in which case they get a bonus.
    The Troll Booth - Simply pay your fee to cross the bridge and there surely won't be any trouble. They'll even throw in a hot cup of tea or coffee to make it worth your while. The trolls found that they were getting a lot higher return when they moved over to the service industry instead of the... ambush industry?
    Rise and Shine - You arrive at the tavern after a hard day's dungeon diving, just to find it is shut. Looking at the opening hours you see it is open from 6AM-7AM. Who on earth is drinking at 6 in the morning?? If they go during open hours they find it is absolutely heaving with customers, drunkards stumbling out after being in there for just a few minutes. Whilst inside you notice time is so much slower too. It will feel like hours pass whilst inside, even if you're only in there for 10 minutes of real time. (Maximum 12 hours in the 1 hour it's open, so 10 minutes real time would be 2 hours drinking time, for example)
    Above Par - Err, drinking and mini-golf? Yes please! A hole-in-one on the final hole wins you a free drink at the bar. Just be careful though, the more you drink, the harder it is to aim! (You may also refer to this place as "The Golf Club")
    Beat it - As you enter you must play a tune on a drum kit. If you play it well everyone cheers, but if it's bad they will boo and jeer. If you refuse to play or roll a nat 1, you can't enter. If you roll a nat 20 you get a free beer or some other prize.
    Climber's Paradise - The only thing between you and a cold glass of ale is this 100-foot climbing wall.
    Paradice - Yes, Paradice. This club is so exclusive, you can only get in if you hit a DC20 Charisma check.
    Rambler's Gamble - Among the hills and slopes of this region rests an inn. An inn owned by a being addicted to gambling. Any travelers passing by may be tempted to enter for a refreshing drink and a hot meal, but they will find no prices on the menu. Maybe they would like to wager something for it instead?
    Gob Site - A wooden construct, stuck together with mud and held up with thin ropes, this absolute dive of a bar isn't somewhere you would choose to go, even in a pinch. A Goblin ran establishment, serving Goblins and ONLY Goblins... Unless you have something to make it worth their while.

sorcerer plot hooks
    (All) The Sorcerer feels a mental "tug" in their mind of another person who has the same Source of magic as they do. They don't know how far away they are, but they will know when they get closer.
    (All) The Source of the sorcerer's magic has died. They can feel their powers draining away. They must find a new Source (within 30 days).
    (All) A friend of the PC has written a letter, full of frantic pleas for help - it appears that the friend has just had their Source awakened.
    (All) A long lost magical object, once in possession of the PC's family (and attuned specifically for Sorcerers), has been found. The consequences for its discovery (in this day and age) could be catastrophic. The PC receives a message to return home.
    (All) A new cabal of Spellhunters have been persecuting magic-users in the area. Word has reached the PC that they are being targeted next.
    (All) The PC is haunted by dreams where they are being stripped of their magical abilities, and the ones who are doing it are the PC's family members. DM's choice if its true or not.
    (All) Creatures from the Feywild have been drawn to the PC's "font of power" and want to steal it for themselves.
    (All) The next Beholder the party encounters will be friendly to the PC and claim to know them from "a past life".
    (All) The PC is haunted by the ghost of a recently-deceased ally/family member/friend. The ghost brings a warning about a Astral Parasite that is targeting Sorcerers.
    (All) The PC is invited to the "Soulbrangle", a competition between Sorcerers held in a secret location. The prize is extremely tempting to the PC.
    (All) A small child begins following the PC and wants their power. They beg to be taught, not understanding that the power Source is not up to the PC and it cannot just be given. The child will throw a tantrum and publicly accuse the PC of some crime (theft works well).
    (All) A crow is sitting on the PC's belongings after the next camp. It is friendly and wants to serve as a familiar. It has the stats of a regular crow and is totally normal in every other way except it has been Awakened, and can speak the PC's language, crudely.
    (All) A rival Sorcerer has started a campaign to ruin the PC's reputation. The next population center the PC enters will reveal a bunch of "wanted" posters accusing the PC of some crime. The rival is the same level as the PC, and will level with them, in the long term.
    (All) The PC wakes up with a tattoo in the form of an incomplete magical sigil. If the sigil is completed, a planar gate opens. Beyond the gate is a creature that needs the PCs help.
    (All) The child of a creature or person that the PC has killed comes looking for revenge. They are now a Sorcerer at the same level of the PC.
    (All) An Unseen Servant (magicked with Permanency) becomes attached to the PC. It will only do tasks when the PC is asleep. It likes to clean, fold, neaten, and organize.
    (All) The PC comes across a hole in the ground where voices from his past beckon him to jump in. DM's choice if the voices are benign or malevolent.
    (All) The PC gets an angry letter from a mentor/teacher/superior/someone-of-importance berating them for "missing the Sorcerer's Conference." The PC knows nothing about this, and the letter has a location. There is no conference. It is a trap.
    (All) The PC starts to see the "spirit world" - where the restless (but harmless) shades of those who've died are forced to linger until they move on. The PC sees a friend/ally/relative and that shade pleads for release.
    (All) All of the local beasts have vanished and the locals are baffled. 3 days later they return, changed into undead versions of themselves and cause chaos as they attack anyone nearby. This is the work of a necromancer with a grudge.
    (All) The PC wakes up one morning with the absolute certainty that they are now a conduit, and can awaken the innate magic in one other person, one time. The choice must be made within 30 days or the PC's Source abandons them.
    (All) A disease affecting only Sorcerers has been reported sweeping through the region. It causes melancholy and an overwhelming desire to lay down and surrender.
    (All) A Wizard visits the PC and says that they have discovered a way to enhance the Sorcerer's abilities, but the quest will be very difficult.
    (Draconic Bloodline) A messenger from a wealthy family sends a message to the PC and offers a king's fortune if they reveal the location of their Source, so that the family can introduce magic into their bloodline, thus protecting them from their many enemies.
    (Draconic Bloodline) The PC's Source has been killed or disappeared. A different type of Dragon agrees to become the PC's Source.
    (Draconic Bloodline) A group of assassins, bent on destroying all Dragons, have plans to kidnap the PC and force them to reveal the location of their Source.
    (Divine Soul) An ancient prophecy involving the PC has come to pass, and the PC finds themselves the target of adoration and worship the next time they enter a large population center.
    (Divine Soul) The local religions (all of them, in a rare show of unity) have deemed the PC's abilities heresy and branded them a liar. The group does everything in their power to see that the PC is captured or killed.
    (Divine Soul) The PC is visited every night (while sleeping) for a month by a Celestial being. The being is trying to convey information, but can only relay one word per dream.
    (Shadow) The PC begins seeing into the Shadowfell, as an "overlay" to what they see in the Prime Material Plane. This vision is of the future, and something is coming.
    (Shadow) Whenever the PC casts a spell above the Cantrip level, they see a being made of pure shadow watching them from a distance. The being is benign or malevolent. DM's choice.
    (Shadow) Wherever the PC goes, undead starts to rise and menace the locals.
    (Storm) The PC finds themselves at odds with those who worship the Elementals, and this hostility increases with each passing day. The PC may discover that they have been branded a blasphemer.
    (Storm) The PC loses the ability to speak Primordial and instead understands Celestial, Abyssal and Infernal. Soon a creature appears and demands that the PC translate a long and complicated piece of writing written in all 3 of the new languages. If the PC refuses, the creature removes the new languages, but the ability to speak, write, and understand Primordial is gone. If the PC accepts, the new languages may be kept.
    (Storm) The next storm the PC encounters swells in power until is a tornado/hurricane.
    (Wild) A Wand of Wonder appears in your hand. Once per day, you can re-roll for a different result, but must live with the new choice. This wand will never run out of charges, but it can be discarded (or broken). Soon the owner of the wand comes looking for it, but the wand does not want to go back.
    (Wild) For the next 7 days, the level at which spells are cast by the PC is random. After the 7 days, the PC gains 1 spell from a level they cannot cast yet, except they can for this spell. A week later another Wild Sorcerer finds the PC and explains that they are now infected with a magical disease. The gained spell is just one of 4 possible symptoms.
    (Wild) Evil creatures stop attacking the PC in combat, and some may even help the PC if they are wounded or with a negative status effect. This continues for 5 combats, and then the PC is approached by a Devil who wants to know if the PC would like to extend their "free trial".
    (Aberrant Mind) The next time the PC uses Detect Thoughts, the spell doesn't end for 30 days. After that time, if the PC is still sane, they can choose 1 person to "link" to, and be able to detect their thoughts all the time. The other person will gain the same ability.
    (Aberrant Mind) The PC finds themselves slowly being transformed into a creature other than humanoid. The Source has decided that the PC is worth noticing, and this transformation can be stopped by a Remove Curse cast by a 15th level (or higher) Cleric, but this will sever the connection between the PC and the Source, and a new, powerful aberration steps in to make a new deal.
    (Aberrant Mind) A group of aberrations have come looking for the PC, asking for the PC's help, but this is a lie. The group wants to extract the PC's soul and use it for a ritual.
    (Clockwork Soul) The PC finds themselves embroiled in chaotic activity (brawls, riots, arguments, etc...) wherever they go, and they see Modrons appearing and disappearing at random around them. The PC has been trapped inside a pocket of Elemental Chaos, and their Source is trying to get them out, but the Modrons keep being repelled by the magical field.
    (Clockwork Soul) The PC is approached by a Minoi (Tinker Gnome) who wants to write the PC's biography. The Minoi is sincere and completely enthralled by the PC (fanboi).
    (Clockwork Soul) The PC is approached by a group of creatures who call the PC "The Lawgiver" and want the PC to adjudicate a bunch of legal issues that plague their society.
    (Giant Soul) The PC finds themselves being transformed into a giant-sized version of themselves and for 10 seconds a day (at random) they become 20' tall. Their Cantrips sometimes work, and sometimes fizzle, and this continues for 3 days. The PC then dreams of their Source embroiled in a fight to the death with a creature the PC has never seen before.
    (Giant Soul) Every day for 6 days their "Giant Type" Source changes to one of the other "Giant Types". At the end, they PC may choose to switch their Source permanently. If they choose not to, their Source is so pleased that a magic item gift finds its way into the PCs belongings. If they do choose to switch, that type of Giant, from now on, is the sworn enemy of the PC and will attack them on sight.
    (Giant Soul) The PC is approached by a large group of Dwarves who treat the PC as divinity and no amount of persuasion will make them leave. They plead for the PC to show them a "miracle". More show up every day. If the PC does a "miracle", the Dwarven people, as a race, will always treat the PC favorably. If the PC does not perform one, or tries to get away, the group will become angry and declare the PC a false god.
    (Psionic Soul) The PC starts to feel the presence of another Psionic Soul nearby. If they investigate, they soon find that there are over a dozen of these presences in the area. Soon after the PC is attacked by one of these other Sorcerers. All of them are trying to kill one another. "There can be only one!" If the PC does nothing, they are attacked anyway, but without knowing the number of Sorcerers opposing them.
    (Psionic Soul) The PC's Source grants them a new power in exchange for doing a task that the PC finds repulsive and horrifying. If the PC refuses, they lose spell access for 7 days, and then it is restored.
    (Psionic Soul) A Githyanki Sorcerer, also a Psionic Soul, approaches the PC and asks for their help in completing a ritual that requires 7 Psionic Souls. The ritual's purpose is to permanently seal a planar gate from the Shadowfell to the Astral Plane, due to the constant incursions. If the PC agrees, they find themselves with 6 new allies. If they do not, they find themselves with 6 new enemies.

nonmagical shops
    Artificial Artifice - sells miscellaneous good luck charms and baubles without any enchantments
    Harroc's Fresh Kill - a lizard folk that sells the meat he hunts/catches for a reasonable price
    The Dragon's Hammer - smithy manned by two jovial dragonborn brothers
    Charmed - very high end clothing store owned and operated by an old halfling and his apprentices
    Fleukh agh Mounavuks (Meat and Mounts)- A well off butchery and livery stable ran by a half-orc and several of their full orc half-siblings. u/Th3R3493r
    Cat's Resting Blanket- a quilting and knitting shop ran by a few old tabaxi women who all lived long and varied lives. An thief is bound to be spotted and have a near death with a few expertly thrown knitting needle. u/Th3R3493r
    McClanny's Forge-Forge that was ran by an amnesic dwarf who does not know how he got there. He forgot almost everything about his life but how to forge and about metallurgy. He set up shop in a town's meager forge which expanded over time by the dwarf and the former mayor. u/Th3R3493r
    Dormin & Hormin & 01000101 (069 or E) - Two gnomes and a warforged who make contraptions and do more complex or simple repair jobs. Dormin wants the business to thrive. Hormin wants to invent something that will make him rich. 01000101 (069 or E) wants to win the "war on prices" without causality and capture "most of the repair and technical support contracts" without restrainment or extortion after Dormin and Hormin repair him to functioning order. u/Th3R3493r
    The One Armed Bandit- A tavern with a slot machine in the corner ran by a halfling. The tavern is the run of the mill pub and bed place but the dwarven themed slot machine is what is marvelous. It blinks, it drinks, it wisecracks a win or lose, dare i say it thinks. Everyone seems to win but, always loses more than they won if they do not walk away. (the slot machine is ran by a gnome and kenku bard who can make his voice sound like a warforged). u/Th3R3493r
    Xildi's Herbiary and Nature Education Grove- Xildi is a figborg who took a odd habit of socializing with humanoids after taking a group of lumberjacks to not cut down the new trees and go for the dying side of the forest where the sprites left. As she saw with teaching the humanoids to respect the forest, she made a greenhouse to reduce incidences of humanoids explore or exploiting the forest. She is commonly found with a group of children following her and a flock of songbirds on her robe and back. u/Th3R3493r
    Pedro's Puzzles - Pedro is a wood carver who specializes is puzzle boxes and children's toys. He also makes furniture that can double as puzzle boxes. u/briocheRose123
    Eldrannen Elixirs: a vineyard that bottles its wine in flasks that resemble large potion bottles, run by a high elf who combines the local grape varieties with his homeland's winemaking process. u/fomorianking
    The Crawling Vine; Naturopath, sells hallucinogens, healing kits, etc. u/Boney137
    He Who Smelt It; Blacksmith, sells armor, weapons, etc. will repair armor, weapons, etc. u/Boney137
    The Delirious Adventurer; Tavern/Inn, popular among locals, fairly unknown for outsiders, mid price range. u/Boney137
    The Golden Spider; Tavern/inn, popular among outsiders, locals stay away, scam-y, high price range. u/Boney137
    The Early Owl; Tavern, unpopular, run-down, front for the underground/black market. u/Boney137
    Donuts and Dragons: A pastry shop run by a group of kobolds and a kind elderly dragonborn lady. u/Dragon_Overlord
    Siritharm's herbs: a half-elf is selling assorted herbs, salts, and other seasonings for food. The only thing that could be considered magic is an enchanted lamp with a flame that changes color to keep the area lit and to attract attention, but it's not for sale. u/Tgaghammerstrike
    Grolaina's Inn: A small cozy tavern and inn, owned by an incredibly friendly (and surprisingly attractive) half-orc. u/Tgaghammerstrike
    Deepforest Goods: A human druid and her awakened shrub friend are selling assorted teas, edible mushrooms and berries, and also finely-carved wooden figurines. u/Tgaghammerstrike

city entertainment options
    A zoo that showcases famous monsters instead of regular animals.
    A tavern that has a small river running through it. People try balancing on logs and knocking each other off to settle arguments.
    A giant arena filled with water that allows for naval battles to occur.
    A man dressed up as a tree, jumping out to scare passers by. Locals watch him get the tourists. u/jheiner227
    A wizard using his magic to play pranks on people, similar to Just for Laughs Gags. u/jheiner227
    A kenku orchestra. A kenku "plays" their individual part with their mimicry ability. They all come together My Singing Monsters style. u/imthebeaniegenie
    A massive cookout. u/greatGoD67
    Once a year upon invitation, 3 villages within three miles converge at a gnomes wizard tower. (Leaving their homes unprotected) There are premade alchemical cooking pits, bonfires. u/greatGoD67
    Strength contests (wrestling, melees) u/greatGoD67
    Dex contests (darts, knife juggling) u/greatGoD67
    Constitution contests (Eating the spiciest of peppers, holding your breath underwater) u/greatGoD67
    Wis contests (riddle solving) u/greatGoD67
    Int contests (Trivia) u/greatGoD67
    Cha contests (music, comedy and team sports) u/greatGoD67
    A cookout where everyone brings a monster u/greatGoD67
    Watching monsters hunt people.
    Feeding a gelatinous cube. u/greatGoD67
    An all orc gladitorial games. These are captured orcs and trained to fight one another.
    A centaur entering a jousting tournament but some scandalous actions taken with a mare behind closed doors led to him being removed. u/greatGoD67
    A tavern-ship which launches from the top of a large but shallow hill in early evening, meanders down a long and winding river, and crashes over a waterfall into a lake at 2am. At 1:55am, the great iron-bound casks of ale and wine are stoppered, and everybody leaves the tavern to watch from the shore. The tavern's walls and roof are deliberately built flimsy, so they smash upon landing at the bottom of the waterfall, to a chorus of cheers. Afterwards, hundreds of laborers fish the casks, the tavern's hull, and the remnants of its walls and roof out of the lake, and haul them up the hill to rebuild the tavern for the next day. u/camtarn
    A bardic song contest. Most of the bards are using Dancing Lights or Prestidigitation to create minor magical effects for particularly dramatic parts of their songs. u/camtarn
    A cheese-rolling contest, where participants hurl wheels of cheese down a steep hill and chase them to the bottom. Broken ankles or wrists are common. u/camtarn
    Night-fire archery, where participants compete to light small hay-filled lanterns suspended over a lake, using fire arrows. u/camtarn
    A young copper dragon who has taken up residence in a fire-gutted warehouse, and tells fantastical stories to the children of the town in return for something shiny. Her hoard is mostly made up of curiously sparkly pebbles, flakes of mica, and pieces of broken glass. u/camtarn
    A giant musical instrument made of long ropes, tied to huge hollow trees which act as resonators. A local half-ogre bard (chaotic good) plays the instrument by plucking the ropes with a long hooked rod, creating ground-shaking bass tones. u/camtarn
    A pie eating contest. The village is poor, and having good meat pies be devoured in seconds seems like a horrible waste, so the pies are filled with gristle, skin and meat trimmings. They're surprisingly tasty, as long as you don't mind a bit of a crunch. u/camtarn
    A century-old widely-played game of Assassin, where anybody 'killed' by their assassin must enact the most dramatic death scene they can think of, regardless of where they are. The assassin holds a large white flag to avoid alarming passers-by. Locals welcome the regular impromptu street theatre. u/camtarn
    A wine tasting, featuring wines aged in high magic areas. Some of them are quite unusual, and every bottle is unique. u/camtarn
    A face-slapping contest. u/camtarn
    A cave full of delicate purple-and-white crystals, which make a quiet musical tone when touched. Concentrating hard when touching makes the tone louder, and can induce vibrato or change the tone's pitch and timbre. Regular concerts are held here by musicians trained in the use of the crystals. u/camtarn
    A limerick competition. The more obscene the better. u/camtarn
    A miniature elevated railway with a circular track three miles in length, populated by tiny constantly-moving metal golems on wheels. The golems are ancient and need no maintenance; if stolen, they will invariably escape and find their way back to the track. Messages can be clipped onto the golems to be delivered to locations near the railway. At sunset each day, the golems stop in little groups of seven and perform group acrobatics for one minute before resuming scooting along the track. u/camtarn
    A contest to see who can leave the deepest tooth imprints on a chunk of wood. u/camtarn
    A very elaborate derivation of rock paper scissors, featuring 101 different gestures and 5050 different outcomes. u/camtarn
    A tiny zoo with only a single cage, containing an invisible monster. The owner sits on a stool in front, and purports to be able to see the monster, describing its long dripping fangs, its seventeen eyes, its surprisingly plush dense fur which it grooms regularly. If a patron gets too close, there's an almighty roar and the cage shakes violently. Locals' opinions are divided over whether the monster is real. u/camtarm
    A moustache, beard and hair festival. Some of the competitions allow magical assistance, and the results are variously spectacular and hilarious. u/camtarn
    A long downhill race on small wooden carts. Each cart is crewed by two people - one to steer, and the other to constantly drip melted grease onto the wooden axles to keep them from burning up due to friction. u/camtarn
    A ceremony where, once a year, a randomly chosen building is emptied, set on fire, then rebuilt by the entire town. For this reason, no buildings in the town have fixed interior decor above the most basic, but ornate tapestries and wall/ceiling hangings are common. u/camtarn
    An actual non-creepy circus with friendly clowns and happy carnies and non-abused animals and a jolly, gregarious ringmaster in a top hat, coat with long tails, and a waxed mustache. The ringmaster is obviously a woman wearing a fake mustache, but that’s about the most “unusual” thing about this circus. Come have a genuinely good time! u/saro13
    A clowder of friendly, curious stray cats that crave attention. They are basically a public fixture in the town by this point. At worst, they may trip you by standing behind your legs or cover your cloak with stray hairs. u/saro13
    Traveling caravan with an artistic flair and colorful covered wagons. They’re traveling minstrels and playwrights and love putting on a show, even around a simple campfire. They love bawdy jokes and new stories of heroism and adventure. u/saro13
    A local illusionist (who some think has gone a little soft in the head) likes to read heroic fantasy in the local park/commons. While he silently reads, little ethereal illusions of knights on horseback, kidnapped princesses, and snarling dragons materialize around him. Small crowds will gather quietly at a respectful distance to watch. Disturbing the wizard causes him to leave in a huff, and ends the show. It’s not clear if the illusionist is aware he is creating these images. u/saro13
    A magical labyrinth with a lot of traps and monsters. Nobody can die inside, instead they are portet back to the entrance and have to pay again. A grand price waits for the first who will succeed. There is also a magical "leaderboard" with the name and the meters without dying of the top 20 adventurers. A local competition is running and nearly any young adventurer tries to become the one who successfully makes it a little bit deeper into the complex. u/jyscwFirestarter
    Gnome-ball: American football but you use a gnome. The time honored adventuring tradition of throwing gnomes where you need them to be has turned into a sport. (Gnomes are equipped with some way to featherfall for safety.) u/tacuku
    A legendary path of an old war battle, and a measum host doing a talking tour. u/TheGreenJedi
    Shaved ice stand made from ice shaving off ice sculptures. They offer classes in sculpture, syrup making, and frost magics. u/xDarkLlama
    Giant bug racing. Like huge horse sized beetles. u/josh61980
    Cockroach racing. When players enter random tavern they will see crowd cheering up particular cockroach with hilarious name. As soon as race ends player will be able to place bets for next race. (Also you can swap cockroaches with rats or snails) u/knifekillgoeshere
    A once-a-year gala for wealthy nobles, hosted by the thieves guild. Rules are simple, all guests are safe from any type of harm, but thieves must attempt to steal the jewelry and not get caught. The noble with the least stolen from/highest worn wealth gets prestige and fame. The thief with the largest haul, gets a title in the guild. u/Gyrosummers
    A druid convention u/Astr0C4t
    A Thai Ping Pong competition u/ma3thr33x
    Jester Hunt, drunk locals listen to jokes and hurl rocks at individuals who tell bad jokes. Goal is to stay conscious till morning. u/Steamnach
    An insult contest u/Pavoazul
    Criminals displayed publicly, prominently, and perspicuously. Buckets below them raise money to keep both them there and the guard funded. Guard focuses effort on profitable offences only. No taxes exist. u/afourthfool
    Open Mic Night at the tavern. u/NeoMegaRyuMKII
    In an imperial city, there is chariot racing with ferocious and fast beasts out of the monster manual as steeds. u/battleshipryan479
    An insect fighting ring. The current champion is a 10 year old that somehow caught a stag beetle the size of a dog. u/zapzoroath
    One man band. u/shadow-124
    Knife throwing contests. The two contestants face each other and throw the same knife back and forth at each other. The last one standing wins a prize. u/PutridMeatPuppet
    Museum of cursed (or silly) magic items, with a gift shop at the end of course. u/animestory99
    Traveling Hall of Mirrors, it's a wagon that resembles a Traveling Medicine Show that it's entrance is actually a little pocket dimension, people pay 5 silver to enter this pocket dimension that has various mirrors that are warped and make silly reflections back at them. u/DeathBySuplex
    A jail that doubles as a public-shaming petting zoo. u/ThreeAndTwentyChars
    Badger races. Gnomes, goblins, and halflings race around an amusingly small circuit while riding large badgers, while spectators place bets. u/Evisiron
    Religious grounds of an information based god, has trivia based games. u/davidm27
    A puppetry theater that re-enacts historical battles in gory detail. Blood everywhere. u/Gian_Key
    A tavern with only one wine that induces strong hallucinations. u/Gian_Key
    A public pool that no one uses anymore because their is something in the water. u/Gian_Key
    A ghost train that uses actual zombies. u/Gian_Key
    A ferris wheel powered by a friendly giant. u/Gian_Key
    A free fall attraction in which a wizard teleports you into the stratosphere. u/Gian_Key
    A daily fireworks show by a few of wizards trying to outdo one another. (Its getting dangerous) u/Gian_Key
    A pub quiz at a local tavern. Winners get a prize, losers get beat up. u/Gian_Key
    A desert settlement that holds a festival once a year where the hunters track down the largest scorpions they can find and harvest the stingers; the largest one winning. Afterwards, they roast and eat the scorpions. u/Tehwipez
    A town built around a gimp cart that has not been moved in at least 20 or 30 years from the looks of it. Plants have expanded over it and it seems to have become an important piece of it. Every year a lot of people come to this cart, trying to meet the owner, who is the most acclaimed fortuneteller in the country. When asked, they all say (amongst other things): “she will fulfill your needs, winter, spring or fall”like a jingle, it’s wrote on ads on walls and inns. u/Oscaretto
    A dungeon cleared out by previous adventurers made into a tourist trap or theme park. u/FirstChAoS
    plays
        The Paladin wore Gold Armour: A straightforward tale of loyalty about a noble sword who is picked from rank and file to become a regents guard. They are involved in some light political intrigue but remain faithful and join the regent on an unnecessary campaign where they die heroically defending the regent from a faceless enemy. Some retellings have the Paladin be in love with the Regent consorts handmaiden, she is devastated to learn of the death but gives the story an uplifting ending as we learn they carry the paladins child. Some critics decry this as an perversion of a classic tragedy for modern audiences.
        Kero Fin: A coming of age tale in three parts, a young adult named Braden seeks praise from their peers as they all brag about what they will do with their lives by declaring they will ascend the mountain of Kero Fin and slay the giant that lives atop it and claim its treasure. All agree this the best idea and say they are coming along, everyone is caught up in the excitement. Act 2 is the struggle to climb the mountain and we see Braden is terrified that they are now pressured into going through with their boast. Act 3 the party summits the mountain and encounter the Giant, noone has the will or skill to slay the brute and all scatter about to flee, Braden equal parts leader and fearful, jumps off a waterfall, shortly followed by the others. They quickly decend the mountain as the Giant bellows from above. They discover the true treasure is adventure and friendship made along the way. This has inspired many a young braggadocio to take up an adventuring life.
        Who doth knocks. A short comedy often put on with minimal actors about closing time at the tavern and who will pay for drinks. There is a running gag about sailors.
        Marduke and the shifting sands. A comedy with a sad undercurrent about Marduke, an engineer, who is tasked with building a grand statue/obelisk/temple/monolith to the leader. The leader wants something absurdly huge or complicated and Marduke tries to communicate the difficulty of the task while the leader is surrounded by sycophants who tell them it can. The task changes regularly to become ever more absurdly impossible until finally it is a teetering edifice that crumbles to a pile of stones when the leader is ousted. A new leader takes their place, the sycophants switch sides and the new leader bemoans the vanity of the person they replaced in a long speech, finally tasking the tired and old engineer to rebuild it in the new leaders image. All laugh.
        Caoutl. Primarily told through dance, the tale is about a feathery winged drake tending to their garden that becomes unruly due to a mischievous sprite. Costuming and colours are very important. Large scale productions are accompanied by a full band of strings and horns. Some performances feature a narrator.
        Wind, Wish and Wine. A life tale of the son/daughter of a vineyard owner. Act1. As a young child they speak to their parents as they tend the yards about birds and how birds can fly anywhere they want, free of responsibility like picking grapes. The parents say they have a good life and should be happy with their responsibilities. The father is called to go on campaign with the lords alliance, the father teaches the child about duty. Act 2 is short with mostly conversations with the mother and other children about duty and responsibility, knowing your place in the world. The child still longs to be a bird and fly away. Act 3. the father returns, sword and shield worn. Returns to being a farmer but appears less interested in responsibility and duty. The father tells the child, now adult, of the wide world beyond and how exciting it was to leave all the responsibilities behind. The mother is displeased and discourages them. Act 4. much older, the protagonist has inherited the vineyard and has a spouse and children. They awaken to the fact they are old and have not seen the world and only been responsible. They take up their fathers sword and shield and bequeath the vineyard to their own children. There is a short discussion about duty to family but the protagonist leaves, and the play ends with them watching birds fly.The play suffers from mixed messaging and the prose is often turgid.
        True Loyalty. Based on a true incident where after a noble was goaded into drawing a sword in front of the king and was executed for it, the noble's retainers waited a while, then murdered the other noble who goaded their lord, cut his head off and put it on their noble's tomb.
        The Queen is No Lady. Raunchy.
        The Ballad of East and West - The princess of an occupied kingdom is being forced to marry the general who conquered her land. On the eve of their wedding her childhood friends a band of rebels to save her. Then, in the middle of the climactic battle...OCTOPUS
        The Toymaker - A half orc rejects the life of barbarism his tribe leads and leaves to join the big city. On the way she befriends a gnomish toymaker and learns their craft.
        The Hills are Alive - This dwarven horror story tells the story of a small clan that emigrates to an unclaimed stretch of land. The Hills are rich in ore but the sounds of music echo in the tunnels the clan finds already dug.
        Sebastian the Sorcerer - A situation comedy with many episodes. Sebastian has come home from wizards academy during a break and has to deal with his delightfully ignorant but proud parents. "It was not my intention to levitate the cat!"

loot/ rp
    new cards
        The Maiden- A random person you have met throughout your adventure becomes hopelessly, obsessively in love with you
        The Wizard- You may choose a spell from the first level list of wizard spells and once per day that spell may be cast without expending a spell slot. Using it at higher tiers still uses higher tier spell slots.
        The Mountain- You permanently grow by one size class. The only way to undo this is a wish spell.
        Sloth (As in the Sin)- You fall into a deep sleep and will not wake by any normal method. You are magically sustained and your body does not age while this effect is active.
        The Mime - You lose the ability to speak. Can only be cured by a wish spell (By TheDirtyDeal)
        The Sun - You glow brilliantly like the sun and shed bright light in a 60 foot radius around you, and dim light up to 180 feet. (By TheDirtyDeal)
        The Comedian - +2 To charisma skill checks and saving throws. -1 to all others. (By QuintTheWarlock)
        Wrath: You gain the flaw "I am quick to anger, driven to extract vengeance from those who have wronged me and a real bear first thing in the morning." (By oddtwang)
        Greed: all non-magical coins, trade goods and other currency, gemstones and art objects on your person, held in your containers (including e.g. a bag of holding), stored within your legal property or held on your behalf in a bank or other institution under your name are instantly replicated 10 times. The copies are identical and indistinguishable, including any identifying features, flaws or serial numbers. If there is insufficient space for them to be held, the objects spill out, rupture or otherwise force their way into the world. (By oddtwang)
        Gluttony: You develop an insatiable hunger. Your normal requirements for sustenance are doubled and you find it difficult to stop consuming. If you do not currently require sustenance, or if you are unable to satisfy your newly increased needs for 48 hours, you develop a need to consume something unusual, taboo or difficult to acquire. (By oddtwang)
        The Void- (opposite of the Sun) Light seems to dim when you are around. If you are in bright light, it becomes dim light for a 60 ft radius around you. If you are in dim light, it become dark for a 60 ft radius around you. Creatures can not see you, unless they have true sight, if you are in dim light. (Similar to the Darkness spell) (By CreepShowGirl666)
        Serpents: You immediately contract a poison that will kill you in 1d10 days. The only way to cure it is with a potato from a different continent. [Your character and party know this] (By LongIslandBall)
        The Orchard:You gain an apple, that, when bitten into, heals itself over time, effectively granting you infinite food. However, if another person were to bite the apple, it would become just a normal apple. [Your character does not know this.] (By LongIslandBall)
        4 Leaf Clover: the card turns into a 4 leaf clover that is unaffected by the use of force or magic and can only be destroyed by the use of the wish spell or Divine intervention. The creature in possession of this clover is imbued with great luck and gains the following abilities. You may pick one ability where any ability checks, skill checks, attack rolls, or saving throws that you make using that skill automatically succeed for 24 hours. Using this feature drains the available luck from the artifact for 1d4+1 days rendering it useless for that amount of time after the 24 hours expire. Once per day, you can change any dice roll you make excluding d100 to be equal to x-1 where x is the number of sides on the dice. This must be done prior to finding out the result of the action intended by the roll. Once per short or long rest, you have advantage on one ability check and one saving throw of your choice. (By Ed_Radley)
        Lust- Every person you meet of the opposite sex must make a dc10 wisdom saving throw or immediately try to seduce you from now on.
        The Orchestra: summons 20 unseen servants that repeat everything you say/sing. If you cast a spell with a verbal component, it counts as being one level higher if applicable. You also have advantage on performance checks. The Unseen servants do not obey your commands and last until killed. (By Capt_Bread_Beard)
        The Liar - you gain advantage on Deception checks but you are unable to tell the truth — your party has to roll Insight checks whenever you reveal to them information (By Researcher_Boi_314)
        The Crystal: Your skin crystallizes. Your speed decreases by 5 feet and you are put under the effect of a stoneskin spell. (By ThanosHeffley)
        Uno Reverse Card - Allows the user to hold up the card to deflect things back at the person who the card is facing, once per short or long rest. (By Abs0lutely_N0thing)
        The Cornicopia: you no longer need to eat, drink, sleep, or breathe, and you do not age. (By Clickclacktheblueguy)
        The Fates: You gain the Lucky feat, but you have also gained The Fates disdain. When you re-roll your dice using the Lucky feat roll an additional 1d4 and subtract it from your new roll. (By True_Empire91)
        The Smith: This card immediately transforms into a +3 Warhammer that deals an additional 1d8 fire damage on a hit. The person who drew this card becomes proficient with Warhammers and loses all other weapon proficiencies. (By True_Empire91)
        The Coin: Immediately after drawing this card the users hand is burned and takes 1d4 damage and drops the card as a reaction to the pain. As the card is falling to the floor it transforms into a coin. If the coin lands face up (Heads) the person who drew this card doubles the amount of currency they are carrying. If the coin lands face down (Tails) the person who drew this card has their currency vanish. The Coin itself is now worth 50gp. (By True_Empire91)
        The Beast: Once per day, you can Wildshape. Upon transforming back into your normal self you take 1 point of Exhaustion. (By True_Empire91)
        The Leviathan: A great beast has your scent. It will arrive in 1d10+5 days or at the DM’s choosing. Only you can slay the beast and all damage not caused by you directly or indirectly (such as through traps) is halved. (By Astr0C4t)
        The Casino: You are transported to the demiplane of luck. This demiplane consists of a silver road in a desert with extravagant casinos glowing with displays of light against the permanent night sky. The casinos themselves are owned by the permanent residents of the plane, known as the Casino Barons. Barons include everything from human crime bosses to powerful wealthy monsters such as cloud giants, red dragons, and genies. The casino's appearances match with the baron or baroness who owns it. (By Sporedian)
        The Blank: When you draw this blank card it begins to emit bright light and smoke, than dissapear along with whatever equipment you had on you. The card then drops to the floor. The next person to pick up the card sees a stylized image of you printed on it. They will recieve an item, ability, or personality trait from your character sheet at the GM's descretion. The effects can be reversed with a wish spell. (By Sporedian)
        The hermit: You gain disavantage on any charisma checks. You gain advantage on any wisdom checks. Can be undone by a wish spell. (By awesomemanswag)
        The Clock. You gain a small tattoo of an oddly-shaped arrow somewhere on your body. The tattoo is imbued with magical power, and will appear as a transmutation effect when viewed with Detect Magic. As an action, you may invoke this power to cast Time Stop. Once the spell ends, the power is lost forever. (By Ae3qe27u)
        Judgement - you forever feel sickened when in the presence of evil-aligned people, and forever anxious around those of chaotic alignment. (By ergotofwhy)
        Temperence - you can no longer feel intoxicated, no matter how much you drink. Furthermore, you are made immune to damage/drain of your int, wis, and cha, but also immune to effects that raise those abilities (By ergotofwhy)
        The world - you are teleported to a random location on the other side of the world (By ergotofwhy)\
        The Pack, 1d6 hell hounds come every 1d10 days to try and bring the person who drew the card down to the nine hells. The player can hear the howls, and is frightened for 1d4 rounds when they come. (By MeerkatArray)
        The Blind Man: your character is now permanently blinded, physically losing their eyes, and gains tremorsense up to 30 feet. (By Silverdragon701)
        The Artist: your character is now exceptionally skilled in a random art(painting, cooking, singing, etc.) and is known around the world for their talent. (By Silverdragon701)
        The Fib: your character is now a pathological liar and must make a Wisdom saving throw to tell the truth about anything their audience doesn’t already know(I.E, can state the obvious, but must roll to explain a plan or tell a secret truthfully). (By Silverdragon701)
        The goblin: Permanently gain +2 to dexterity and Constitution Permanently lose -2 to charisma and intelligence (By fwimmygoat)
        The Mirror- whoever draws this card immediately understands to an instinctual, spiritual, emotional, and/or philosophical degree why their most hated enemy/enemies are the way they are and are doing what they're doing. They are able to completely sympathise. (By AndrewRequiem)
        The behemoth- when next the character is slain in battle, they shall rise again with temporary hit points double that of the nearest healthy enemy. For the battle, they lose the ability to cast spells, but their Strength score temporarily increases to 30 (+10). When the last nearby enemy dies, they return to normal, and are rendered unconscious, but stable at 1 hit point. (By RollinThundaga)
        The Mask: You immediately, and permanently change races into a random race. You retain all of your memories of your previous life, but lose all ability score changes and abilities your previous race granted you. You gain all ability score increases and/or abilities that this new race grants you. (NoireGarde)
        Dead weight - a 5 ton steel cube appears with shackle welded onto it. you are shackled to it. you cant move five feet from the cube until its shackle is removed. if it is removed, the cube and shackle disappear. (By Tobymaxgames
        The fondler - you can cast mage hand if you couldn't before. this doesn't require a spell slot. (By Tobymaxgames)
        The substrate - a boulder, weighing 3d12 tons appears in above a random person around you, and promptly falls down. its made of some type of metal ore. it its in your possession, and you may do what you will with it. (By Tobymaxgames)
        The captain - if the drawer of the card owns some type of vehicle (cart, boat, etc.), they will physically merge with that vehicle. a wish spell is undo the merge. (By Tobymaxgames)
        The Holdout - after drawing, the location you take a long rest at is converted into some type of fortified structure. the structure takes a form that makes scene for its location. a forest will grow a great tree fort. fields become palisade camps. mountains spring forth castles to rock the heavens. caves dig themselves out and become elaborate dungeons. the one who draws the card is considered the owner of this structure. however, 3d10 days later, the structure is attacked by some force. it can be a powerful wizard, a dragon, an ork warband, etc. if the structure is not defended, that force will destroy it. (By Tobymaxgames)
        The Jinx - You are rendered mute until someone says your name three times. You cannot speak or cast any verbal spells during this time. (Your party does not know this). (By Jorster)
        Greater Balance - The next time you roll a d20 and roll a critical success or fail, you receive an outcome beyond all expectations. The impossible happens despite all likelihood. Example: On a success, the Queen not only agrees with your theories and plans for the coming battle but trusts you over her advisors. On a fail, the Queen looks disgusted at your sad attempt of sharing information and banishes you to the dungeon for your ignorance just to get you out of the way. Should a critical success happen during combat, the number of damage dice is multiplied by 4 instead of 2, but if a critical fail happens, you or an ally are damaged by double the dice. This affect is a one time use. (By WitchDearbhail)
        Null: The deck of many things vanishes. (By Sirvantis)
        Discord: For the next hour your character cannot speak common, elvish, gnomish, dwarven, etc.(By Sirvantis)
        Yes: For the next two weeks your character cannot decline any offers for samples, work, quests, magic items, etc. and cannot say the word "no" or similar. (By Sirvantis)
        Butterflies: A force of immense change you may use this card to change one small moment in the past. This will have rippling effects through time to the present day. Choose wisely. (By faerieunderfoot)
        The Damned- you are immediately teleported to one of the nine hells roll a D10 on the roll of a 10 you are trapped between two of the hells roll two more D10 and reroll all 10s. (By minecraftchickenman)
        Surface: Your body and soul are bound to a random humanoid within 60 feet, determined by the GM. Your appearance changes to match that of the chosen humanoid and neither of you may move more then 120 feet away from each other, and attempting to do so will result in running against an invisible wall. A Greater Restoration or Remove Curse spell cast at 5th level or higher on either one of you ends both effects. (By Cruye)
        Talking Head: You become incapable of saying, writing, or otherwise expressing a truthfull message instead, any attempt to do so will result in you telling a lie instead, usually the opposite of what you meant. You are not affected by the Zone of Truth spell, as these lies are not deliberate. A Greater Restoration or Remove Curse spell cast at 5th level or higher on either one of you ends the effect. (By Cruye)
        Father: A Will-o'-Wisp (MM 301) with the memories, mental ability scores and alignment of a deceased relative appears within 10 feet and is bound to you as a familliar. The Will-o'-Wisp acts independently of you, but it always obeys your commands. In combat, it rolls its own initiative and acts on its own turn. It can't attack and loses the Shock action, but it can take other actions as normal. As an action, you can temporarily dismiss your familiar. It disappears into a pocket dimension where it awaits your summons. As an action while it is temporarily dismissed, you can cause it to reappear in any unoccupied space within 30 feet of you. If the Will-o'-Wisp dies, it is gone forever. (By Cruye)
        Experience: Your mind speeds up, enhancing your senses and reflexes but leaving you more exposed to mental assault. You gain advantage on Dexterity saving throws and Wisdom (Perception) checks, but gain disadvantage on Wisdom saving throws and vulnerability to psychic damage. A Greater Restoration spell can end this effect. (By Cruye)
        Door: A magical book appears in your posession, containing the entirety of your memories written on it's pages, even ones you have forgotten through non-magical means. The book updates itself whenever you finish a long rest. Turning a page will always take you to the memory you'd like to see, and the book will always appear to be the same size, regardless of how many pages it has. You or a creature that has stolen the book can modify your memory by writing on the book, either writing fake memories or crossing or tearing out real ones. If the book is completely destroyed, you lose all your memories for 1 week, before getting them back, excluding fake memories from the book, and including memories that were removed from the book. (By Cruye)
        Diamond: You can cast the Creation, Greater Restoration, Mass Cure Wounds or Wall of Stone spells once per day. (By Cruye)
        Company: You gain the service of twelve Guards (MM 347) who appear in a space you choose within 30 feet of you. The guards are of the same race as you and serve you loyally until death, believing the fates have drawn them to you. (By Cruye)
        The Death Note- The first name that is written on this card immediately dies, no saving throw. (By warriornate)
        The infant- Your character immediately turns into a newborn baby. (By warriornate)
        The Mirror- An exact duplicate of the PC pulling this card is instantly created somewhere in the world. This copy has one purpose, to supplant the PC that pulled the card. The copy is indistinguishable from the PC in every visible way, and is physically in essence that PC. This copy differs only in that they believe that pulling the card sent them across the world and supplanted THEM with a copy located at the DOMT. This copy can accomplish supplanting the PC using any method (Violent, non violent, etc) that they wish as long as the final result is taking the place of the original PC. For rules purposes this created copy is the same level, class, and alignment as the PC that drew the card, and has access to all of the items that PC had on their person when drawing the Mirror. (By HimurasanX)
        The Fish - The character reeks of fish in a way that cannot be masked or removed. Additionally, any dead fish with the Beast creature type that the character touches, comes back to life as if had the True Resurrection spell cast on it. All Kuo-Toa are made aware of and believe in this effect on the character making it unremovable, even against the wish spell, except by the complete genocide of all Kuo-Toa. (By TheDrunkenMagi)
        Mystery - Something extraordinary has happened, but the players don't know what. The DM will roll randomly to determine if it is a good, bad, or neutral thing for the players and decide what it is in secret. Regardless of the roll the event will have a significant effect on the entire region (if not the whole world) and, upon encountering the event, the character who drew the card will be made aware drawing this card was the cause. (By TheDrunkenMagi)
        Wayfinder - A gate to another dimension appears before the character. This gate connects to the GM's choice of Sigil, The Outlands, The Astral Plane, or another Material Plane. Regardless of the GM's choice, the other side of this gate is guarded by both an Androsphinx and a Gynosphinx that the players will need to bypass in order to freely pass through the gate. (By TheDrunkenMagi)
        Destruction - 8 bolts of chaotic energy fly out of the card extremely fast and attack all creatures within a 120ft radius sphere centered on where the card was drawn. The bolts acquire targets randomly each round and make a single attack at initiative 20. The attack is a ranged spell attack with +7 to the attack roll and deal 2d8 + 6d6 damage. Each orb deals a different type of one these 8 damage types: Acid, Cold, Fire, Force, Lightning, Poison, Psychic, Thunder. The bolts cannot be harmed or dispelled, do not attack anything that leaves the sphere, and disappear after 1 minute. (By TheDrunkenMagi)
        Creation - Immediately after drawing this card the player who drew it chooses one item that they can create as if they had cast the Fabrication spell and it appears before them. No material components for the crafted item are required and the casting time is instant. Players who don't know how to make anything can create a single item of raw materials such a log or cube of gold. They must still meet the dimension requirements of the Fabrication spell. (By TheDrunkenMagi)
        Animosity - From now on all creatures the character encounters with intelligence 6 or greater are initially hostile towards the character. This effect does not change their opinion of the character's companions and does not necessarily mean they will attack on sight. (By TheDrunkenMagi)
        Friendship - From now on all creatures the character encounters with intelligence 6 or greater are initially friendly towards the character. This effect does not change their opinion of the character's companions and does not mean they will treat them as an equal. (By TheDrunkenMagi)
        The Dragon - The entire contents of the nearest dragon's horde is placed before you. Immediately after, the dragon is made aware of your name, appearance and current location. The dragon believes you culpable and cannot be convinced otherwise. (By rstarr13)
        The Rose- the card puller gains a +3 to all charisma skill tests for 24 hours (By infinitum3d)
        The Flood- a soft gentle rain slowly grows over the next hour into a torrential downpour that follows the card puller, centered over then the entire hour. (By infinitum3d)
        The Fop- for one hour, you fail every skill test, attack roll, and saving throw. You cannot succeed at anything. (By infinitum3d)
        The Reward- for one hour, you have the exact funds to purchase anything you want. Just reach into your backpack and the gold coins are there. (By infinitum3d)
        The Flumph - After 1d4 hours a Flumph painlessly grows from your body and detaches itself. The Flumph is completely loyal to you and you gain the ability to communicate with it and other Flumphs telepathically. If a Flumph dies two more Flumphs will grow from your body in 1d4 hours; this process continues until you have accumulated twelve Flumps. When the twelveth Flumph dies you magically transform into a Flumphp yourself, keeping all your statistics and abilities. (By clivedauthi)
        Granite skin: +2 AC, disadvantage on Dex saving throws as your skin becomes a hardy but unwieldy mottled grey colour (By sjeveburger)
        The Elder: There are no immediate effects to drawing the card until you attempt to sleep, the further you lull to sleep the more a sense of dread begins to build. This effect ends until you sleep or die from exhaustion. If you do sleep your consciousness is transported to a unknown realm outside the material plane, this realm appears to be a endless slab of carved mossy stone ground, floating above a dark abyssal ocean. The only sight within miles being the faint outline of a pillar. You can get closer to the pillar every night before waking up, each night you walk towards the pillar your character loses 5 max hp. It takes 10 nights to get to the pillar, which depicts a large tentacled being with its appendages wrapped around the planes of existence. If you choose not to touch the pillar or give up before reaching it, you awake with your hit points back and a forever lingering sense of dread. If you touch the pillar, the slab begins to sink and you are consumed by water before you glimpse at hundreds of orange beady eyes and tentacles, then you wake up,with your hp back and with the ability to see the world as it truly is, along with the knowledge that something terrible and older than the universe has been unleashed. (By Ford6Fingers)
        Open Chest: The image of an open box resting on the ground grants the person who drew the card a random magical item of random rarity determined by the DM using either the magic tables in the DMG or the DMs choice. (By equinox75)
        Insignificance- You are placed under a modified version of the Silence spell for 1d8 hours (By ControlledChaosJR)
        The Card - This card features the image of a card on it. It negates all effects of the next card you draw. (By The_Incredible_Thulk)
        Beast - next full moon you will transform into a werewolf. (By Dan-Han-Man)
        Self-Control: You gain resistance to psychic damage and are less impulsive overall. Barbarians temporary lose these effects when raging. (By Spearhartt)
        Gentleness: You take a permanent -2 to your AC. All non-hostile creatures with an intelligence greater than 6 now take a paternal affection towards you and are more likely to offer you assistance when possible. You gain advantage on persuasion checks against hostile creatures when the goal of your persuasion is to prevent conflict. If you witness someone close to you get killed you lose all effects of this card and gain +2 AC and +2 Strength for 1D4 hours afterwards. (By Spearhartt)
        Faithfulness: For the next 1D10 days, everything you do is motivated by your deity. If you do not follow a deity, one appears to you and anoints you as it’s new follower. The deity that appears is based on your alignment, race, and background, at the DM’s discretion. If you roll a 10, you gain the Channel Divinity feature at its lowest level, based on the domain associated with your deity. (By Spearhartt)
        Kindness: You find yourself drawn towards charity. For the next 1D6 days, anytime you see someone or something in need and you can assist in any way, you feel compelled to do so. This includes things such as healing, giving away your money, or assisting in a task that doesn’t take longer than the duration rolled earlier. (By Spearhartt)
        Patience: If you’re the last person to enter a room, speak in a conversation, or take your turn in combat, you gain advantage on your next skill check relevant to that scenario. If you are the first, you have disadvantage. (By Spearhartt)
        Peace: You gain the Calm Emotions spell and can cast it for free once per long rest. (By Spearhartt)
        Joy: You find yourself overcome with obnoxious optimism. No matter what happens you always feel like it’s going to turn out okay. You become immune to being frightened but gain disadvantage on insight checks. This can be dismissed by the wish spell or by being knocked unconscious by a hostile creature. (By Spearhartt)
        Love: You fall in love with the next non-hostile humanoid stranger you meet. You have disadvantage on any malicious skill checks against this person. This can be dismissed by the Wish spell or an act of true love by someone else towards you. (By Spearhartt)
        The Diminutive Tree: A random player character of the party is suddenly and unceremoniously turned into a bonsai tree. Only vocal communication is available while in the form of the bonsai. The bonsai speaks only Sylvan. The bonsai is otherwise an inanimate object. The PC retains their HP and is able to cast spells of vocal components or freecast. To revert from the bonsai, the tree must either be planted and grown for three days with plenty of water, or with a wish/miracle/etc. Otherwise the PC will remain a bonsai tree, incapable of thirst, hunger, aging, or sleep. (By RealRedditPerson)
        The Changeling: You immediately exchange powers and abilities with the nearest person or creature with an equivalent power level (as determined by level / challenge rating. (By Methuen)
        The Mind Reader - you gain the psychic abilities of an Illithid but also gain the face sucking tentacles. (By AllHailMackius)
        The Ghost - You immediately become semi-transparent, along with all clothing and equipment that you don (items lose this state if contact is lost). You are unable to change your opacity beyond this; you cannot turn invisible, or be made more visible (except by means of a wish spell). (By vysken)
        Platinum : All platinum you possess (wherever it is) is tripled, but teleported to the lair of a powerful monster or dragon. The name of the monster appears on the card before disappearing. (By Sunkain)
        Gold : You double all Gold coin you possess on this plane (so not in a bag of holding) (By Sunkain)
        Silver : You become vulnerable to silver weapons. When you touch silver at the end of your turn, you gain a level of exhaustion (By Sunkain)
        Bronze : You can always choose to be third in the Initiative Order in combat (By Sunkain)
        The Tolling Bell : Shows a tolling bell with the words of John Donne "Therefore, send not to know/For whom the bell tolls,/It tolls for thee." Throw 1d12. The one who holds the card will die at dawn in as much days. Each day they will here a bell ringing the number of days left. You can pass the card but only unbeknownst to the other person, you can't sell it. When the time is other, instead of waking up, the person will see a gigantic black bell with an eye in its center. It will toll one last time, and the soul of the person will be consumed by the bell. No resurection possible. A tatoo of a black bell will appear on the head of the dead. If it is a PC, the card will disappear. If the person is not the PC who drawed the card, the card will appear in their inventory at the very moment the bell had tolled. Throw 1d12. For whom will she toll now? (By TanhaAel)
        The Prophet - When this card is pulled, a projection of that players Deity forms in front of them, telling your player that they have been chosen as that deities prophet (DM role plays the Deity projection). The twist is that there is no actual affect that is granted to the player, but the DM should NEVER reveal this to the player. If the player has no religion or doesn't worship any deities, instead the card shouts at the player "You are not worthy, heretic!" in a deep booming voice, and then disappears in their hand and goes back into the deck randomly. (By metalzim)
        The changeling- your character dies and the spell reincarnation is cast on your character. (By Chopperuofl)
        Envy- Rather than sharing in their victory, your PC becomes saddened at the successes of those closest to them. Every time a party member besides the players rolls a natural 20 on a skill check, you have disadvantage on your next skill check. (By a combination of Spearhartt and Dan-Han-Man)
    Odd Items
        A cigarette lighter etched with symbols of the sea and whaling. its a large curved bone with a flint-wheel that pulls out to reveal the cotton packed into the hollowed out cavity. It never works reliably the first time its used, and then will burn through all its fuel on the second try, and will burn for 3 hours if fully fueled. The light from the lighter can reveal the presence of Abyssal writing (which is normally invisible).
        The diseased remains of the first king of the land. Died soon after he founded the land, patient zero of a potent plague - High Lord Rolnir's Remains.
        A fairly mundane looking knick-knack like a spinning wheel or a pot or something boring of slight historical significance. It's actually a lich's phylactery.
        A jar of a glue-like oozing substance. When fed bones it will produce a sticky glue, when hungry it turns acidic and vaporous. It can die.
        The claw of the first lycanthrope, preserved in a jar. It's said that a scratch from the preserved claw still harbours a more virulent, primordial strain of the curse. Best it stay in the jar.
        A muzzle, fitted to house four long appendages where a mouth would be on a normal person. There are legends of an ancient race that held the Mind Flayers under their heel, but nowhere else on Earth exists any evidence of such a people, save this.
        A single bottle of pink, fizzy liquid. There is a label affixed to it written in Celestial. It reads "Heaven's Cola" and is sealed with a white cork. A note it attached to it by a thick string and a handwritten note is attached, written in Abyssal, that says, "Happy Birthday Dad".
        A fist-sized gem of a deep red colour. Inside a shadow flicks and twitches like a tadpole in an egg. Rumour has it that this is the seed of a god.
        A pair of gloves that look like bear paws, complete with felt claws. They appear to be quite large, but always change size to fit the wearer perfectly. On full moons, the wearer of the gloves will change into a full-sized brown bear, but will have hands of the wearer. This lasts until sunrise, and will repeat on each night of the full moon. There is a 10% chance that the change is permanent.
        Mimirion- Three oddly shaped seeds, they seem to hate the sun. It grows during the night on moonlight, giving off an odorous scent, before developing a seed again at the end of its life cycle and the morning light.
        A longsword whose blade is split clean in half, with constant searing heat on both edges of the break. The pommel bears the crest of God.
        A tin cup with a bent handle and a dented rim. The base (flipped upside-down) has an inscription written in Common that says "Who Dat Moose?". There is nothing else remarkable about it's appearance. Whomever drinks from the cup, however, will demand to be called "Moose" instead of their real name and will do anything to retain ownership of the cup, including murderous violence.
        A small oil painting of a ferret. To many people it seems completely mundane. Anyone illiterate who views it will see the portrait animate. The ferret inside will speak and insult the onlooker before attempting to teach them how to read.
        A bag of seeds in a burlap sack. There are approximately 500 seeds in the bag. If planted, they will grow into full sized fence posts in approximately six weeks. The posts will never rot and never need painting.
        A young man. No, not a preserved one, a live human male aged about 23. He smells constantly of skunk spray and demands you keep a distance from his display. He is otherwise very inward.
        The Deurggometer - a small black box with an eye-hole in it. "DO NOT LOOK INTO THE BOX" is painted on a sign in big red letters. Inside the box are little clay figures that look like people you know. Ask the person looking into the box to name a failed love. That person is now in the box. Ask them if they like their mother more or their father more. Whichever one they pick is not present. Ask the other player's at the table to place one more person in the box (this can be anyone from the player's life). Then you, as the DM choose one more player at the table to be present in the box. Roll to determine what happens. Mark down each roll so you remember how many times you rolled, and after each roll ask the player if they want to keep looking. Continue to roll until they say they can't watch anymore. For each outcome, roll 2d4 to determine who does what. Then place a verb between them: (Loves, Kisses, Marries, Adventures with, Hides, Dines with, Has Sex with, Bites, Stabs, Betrays, Cries about, Buries, Ostracizes, Eats, Chases, Cleaves, Mocks, Executes, Owns, Comforts.) The number of times you roll equals the amount of days before one of these things comes true.
        A mask of a crow. If worn, the speaker will be attacked by phantom crows until the mask is removed. However, the mask does not want to be removed and will resist by psychically attacking the wearer. If the mask wins the struggle, the wearer will die of his imagined wounds in less than an hour. If the owner wins the struggle, the mask teleports 10-1000 miles in a random direction, but will always end up in a place of civilization, regardless of distance traveled.
        A gold coin minted in some long forgotten time. The face on the coin is of an old man with a short beard and a crown. When flipped the coin always lands heads up.
        A candle that burns in reverse, collecting material from the aether forming it into a water-rich waxy substance that can be eaten. Producing a cup-worth of water takes an hour of burning.
        A pair of sandals that always feel sandy, no matter how often they are washed. The sandals will change shape to fit any sized feet. The benefit of the sandals is the ability to walk on water for up to 1 hour.
        A stuffed skunk the size of a bull. The skunk's black and white fur is reversed, and it has 7 eyes and six legs. The stink gland has been surgically removed, with large unruly stitches in its wake.
        A magical crossbow that is completely ordinary in every regard, except for the fact that whenever the user misses a shot it loudly insults them and their lineage.
        A mockingbird that will appear as a beautiful piece of taxidermy, but will reveal itself to be haunted by the ghost of an angry spirit who mocks the owner relentlessly while in its presence. The mockingbird can never be sold, but can be given away.
        A dull green glass bottle, filled with transparent oil that rolls about like the sea's tides. Its label, written in Undercommon, reads "Immortality." It is sealed with a deep black cork, and if opened reeks of skunk spray.
        "What do you see?" -Whoever looks at this painting will see the room (or place) they grew up in. If you look at it alone, the painting will move and show you a moment from your past. If you crawl into the painting you will inhabit your child body for exactly 10 seconds of real time (long enough to say one thing that you do) before being ejected from the painting.
        A set of 6 jars of preserves in a calico-lined wooden basket. The jam will raise the dead, but requires the owner to give up something precious to them - this includes family members, property, and memories.
        A six sided die which will occasionally land on 7.
        A flintlock pistol/hand-crossbow (Depending on the setting) That will invariably shoot through the heart of the nearest living creature. It is important to remember that the user is usually the nearest living creature.
        Your childhood stuffed animal. The plaque under it reads "First stuffed animal of [insert PC] retrieved from his gravesite."
        A writing quill that when used, the words of the text will periodically change to synonyms of the original text while unobserved.
        A kid’s doll that seems to animate when no-one is looking. It is depressed or has other issues as it can nearly always be found attempting to kill itself (by impalement or in a fire). As it is magical it is not easily destroyed (it might actually be a phylactery).
        An umbilical cord in a neat wooden box, lined with velvet. The cord itself has small, glassy eyes over its surface.
        A wig that when put on makes your character look like you, the player.
        A living spell in a container. It presses its face on the glass, breathes, then writes cryptic messages in the form of incantations in the glass-fog.
        A set of dragon's teeth in a carved wooden box. On the bottom of the box the name "Ray" has been carved hastily and with an amateur hand. If the teeth are planted, a single skeleton will rise for each tooth and will obey the owner's commands to the best of their ability until destroyed.
        A viking who has no idea what he is doing in a museum. It's labeled "Perfect recreation of an ancient warrior. Totally not a real person."
        A set of utensils that allow the dead to eat food on the Prime Material Plane. They are made from bone and are ancient and yellowed with age. If a demon can be convinced to use them, it will be forever destroyed.
        A small wooden box with some silver markings on its surface. You can hear something shift inside, however it has neither a lock nor hinges, cutting it open by force reveals it to be solid wood.
        A flashlight. Most natives think its a weapon, or a portal to the Positive Energy Plane, or a trapped elemental. But its just a flashlight.
        A tattoo kit and an image of a door on parchment. If you tattoo that door on living flesh, you can open the door and enter a dungeon.
        A bird cage that will kill any living thing placed inside it, but if left alone, will slowly manifest an Infernal-equivalent over 30 days. This hell-pet will act like a real pet, unless its owner is ever alone with it, at which point, it will try and escape. Its ability to breed with creatures on the Prime Material Plane is unparalleled.
        A dried-up rose that will come to life when pure hatred is nearby.
        A mirror that reflects an image from .5 seconds in the future.
        A crystal tea kettle, with what looks like an ocean raging inside of it. If boiled, the temperature of the coasts will rise dramatically. If drunk, the tides will receed further and further back.
        A set of scrolls that will allow conversation between them, insofar that a message written on one will appear on the other, no matter the distance. However, the words always become twisted away from their original meaning, with the intention of doing as much harm to the receiver's life or situation as it can.
        An archaic videogame controller. If plugged into the brain of a living creature (figure that one out) you can control them in a very robotic and simplistic way. Oh, and the cord is only 30ft.
        A chess set of all Queens and 2 Kings. If a game is played, the loser is Banished to the Demi-Plane of Chess.
        A pair of sunglasses that reverses everything the wearer sees. Friends become rivals, enemies charging become friends running with open arms.
        A pair of shoes that grant the ability to jump at great height. Was sold to the museum by a Djinn who claims to have found them floating above the atmosphere.
        An egg-shaped cage made of willow branches. Its craft seems simple, however it can hold magical creatures as if it had anti-magical properties.
        A red pill that takes you to the Modron Plane, and a blue pill that takes you to the PMP
        A set of armor, each piece a different type, e.g., chain chestplate, plate gauntlets, leather greaves, etc.... When in combat, the wearer can sacrifice a piece of the armor to completely avoid a successful hit, but their AC decreases a small amount. If the armor is completely sacrificed, it will return, whole, in 7 days.
        A book on sewing, knitting, and weaving problems and their solutions. Anyone who reads this book will encounter these issues when they next attempt to sew, knit, or weave. Some of these problems should not be possible in a 3 dimensional plane.
        A hookah that, when smoked, gradually transports the smoker into the ethereal plane. If not smoked to completion, the smoker becomes semi-impermeable, randomly phasing from solid to gaseous.
        A sundial that shows the correct time regardless to whether the sun is in the correct orientation or even present.
        A helmet with a mouth where your forehead is. If you say the word "Delicious" the mouth will open up and eat 1 thing in front of you and give you one of it's powers for 10 minutes. Example, you can eat a deck of cards and split into 52 tiny versions of yourself.
        A copper heron statue that, if placed near water, will act as if alive and life-like. Its copper belly is often found full of rotten and fermented fish.
        A set of glass playing cards, with symbols and numerals unknown to scholars. If shuffled, the deck will transport the owner to the 450TH ANNUAL RYL'AKS'HOOM TOURNAMENT and be automatically registered for the Final Death Match.
        A boardgame that requires the players to travel through the planes to complete the game. its called "FUN WITH SCIENCE"
        A set of faerie fire lanterns that only show the dead and obscure the living as if they were invisible. Once per month the effect can be made permanent in a location if the lantern is left behind and blessed by a cleric of at least 3rd level.
        A paintbrush that paint will never ever stick to.
        A stuffed lion's head that will devour any lich's phylactery permanently. The lion's name is Bernard.
        A candle that will grant a wish if blown out on your birthday.
        A tiny doll version of yourself that you can embody, but your regular body will become a doll in the meantime
        A whistle that only dragons can hear
        A normal sized carrot that weighs 300lbs.
        Two gold coins that when rubbed together reproduce.
        A birthday cake that will feed a group of 8. Once a piece is consumed, the owner drops into a deep sleep for 24 hours, but will awaken fully refreshed and healed of all diseases, curse or afflictions. However, an astral parasite now feeds on the victim and will permanently drain 1 HP per day until the host is dead. The parasite can be removed by a cleric of at least 9th level. The cake only ever appears in dungeons
        A crab cracker that only works when operated by dwarves.
        A life-sized unicorn that claims the gods are false and the true meaning of life can only be found in the old ways. The unicorn refuses all saddles, bridles, or hats.
        A wool blanket that will occasionally ‘’bleat’’ as a sheep.
        A tiny statue of Hastur. If the statue is rubbed, and Hastur's name is spoken, there is a 75% chance that the user's wish will come true, and a 25% chance that Hastur will manifest and punish the offender.
        A single rusted scale from a piece of scalemail. It seems to attract rust, and when in contact with other metals it will let them gleam and shine (collecting all rust already present and preventing new). When it disintegrated (due to collecting too much rust, or otherwise) the magic is released and all the collected rust will affect the nearest metal things instantly.
        A toy otyugh that vomits cloth garbage when you pull the string on its back
        A harpoon that will spear a fish from any liquid it is thrust into. If asked the curator will demonstrate by spearing a tuna from a glass of milk.
        A brass hippopotamus. Life sized. When its snout is rubbed there is a 50% chance the hippo will transform into a real hippopotamus, and a 50% chance that the victim is turned into a life-sized brass hippopotamus.
        A fake beard that changes your gender.
        A 10' foot pole made of wood that is incapable of displacing any object.
        A Skeleton Key. You can use it to unlock a heart (to make someone love the first thing they see), a bladder (to make them pee), or any other part of the body. Does not unlock doors.
        A set of tools for installing a door, including hinges and a knob. When placed into an existing door frame, will open upon the name of any plane that is written upon its face in chalk. Cannot connect physical spaces on the same plane.
        A pair of wedding rings that pull towards one another if the player using them is single, and repels if they're married.
        A portable brewery and distillery kit that is semi-automatic. It is however slightly damaged and will produce loads of methanol (causing blindness and death).
        A brush that changes your hair color when you use it.
        A (fake) plant, made of some sort of organic fiber, resembling a tiny Shambling Mound, that will clean your room and leave a slightly slimy trail.
        A baseball bat that deals damage equal to the amount of tattoos and piercings you have.
        A puppet in the form of a human or an animal, it depends on the desire of the one who claims it. It has a string to open and close the mouth and its limbs are fully articulated. The puppet has a name tag stitched to it, and its always the same name as the person who claims it. Over the course of 30 days the puppet will attempt to switch the owners mind into the doll, while it occupies the owner's body. If it is successful, it will live the most mundane, boring life it can, not trying to destroy anything, but not helping either, and will become listless and only interested in food and sleeping. After 30 days of this it will become bored and switch back. If it is not successful, it will be forced to wait 30 days before it can try again.
        A small glass bulb that gives off a bit of bluish light when touched. The light it shines counts as moonlight for the purpose of revealing things.
        A small stone that ticks. Everyone who hears the stone becomes convinced that the stone must remain locked away or something very bad will happen.
        a painting of an old hag wearing a cloak and hood in a bad frame. If hung on the wall, over the next 30 days, it will slowly transform into the painting of a beautiful man or woman. After the painting has fully changed, the owner will meet the subject of the painting and fall madly in love with them, and the feeling will be mutual. The painting will then teleport away.
        A dagger that doesn't harm anything stabbed by it, but displays the memories of what it stabs instead.
        A coin that when flipped tells you something nice about the person you're looking at.
        A set of brass chimes that will calm all the animals who can hear its ringing, regardless of their current mood.
        Two little birds in cages that tweet when they are apart and will do anything to come together.
        A bowl that whistles if the food in it is too hot to consume.
        A wooden stool that is unusually comfortable, despite it's simple construction.
        A pitcher that always pours the owner's favorite drink, and restores 1d4 HP. The drawback is that the entire pitcher must be consumed to gain the effect, and the drink becomes alcoholic, regardless of its original composition.
        An orb that swallows a negative emotion and spits out a black butterfly.
        A monocle that changes every person the wearer sees to be happy.
        A tiny clay man wearing a tiny hat. If a name is scratched into its chest, it will come to life and perform complicated dances, but only when the owner is alone.
        A deep blue pistol, which compels the wielder to shoot their own head. When done, the wielder's subconscious will become a physical manifestation, and have an honest conversation with them.
        A lost letter that will attempt to fold itself into a tiny bird, but fails to do so. It is completely crumpled by now but it still attempts to origami itself every hour or so.
        A brick of modeling clay that when used to sculpt small creatures they come to life. If two of these creatures encounter each other they will battle to the death, the loser reverting into a blob of clay.
        A beautiful painting of the sea. It moves when you look at it. You see yourself floating on your back. You're smiling.
        A bar of bitter cocoa that banishes doubt when eaten.
        A book that contains all the alternate universes where your life is worse than it is now, to show you how great you've done so far.
        A cloak with a hood that smells of lavender and repels all disease while worn. It is bright orange and stitched with embroidered smiling cat faces.
        A necklace with rough cut stones and glass strung on it. It makes the wearer feel comfortable in all conditions.
        A dragon hoodie with a zip-up hood. When the hood is zipped up you can roar like a dragon and fly for 10 seconds at a time.
        A jar of honey, with matching wand. Never empties.
        A piece of pavement with a partial rune on both sides. When placed on another stone surface it either turns hastens or slows a walking creature in a small area (by 5 ft., 20 ft radius) depending on the side that touches the stone surface.
        A tiny house, two stories, beautiful and always the perfect temperature. It can travel anywhere. But you have to be tiny to enter.
        A history book written about a long collapsed empire. When touched the user experiences the last 12 days of Emperor Callifax Corentius IIIV, leading up to his assassination.
        A small honey bee token, carved from soap. When crushed, it summons a honeybee familiar to serve you. It can only give advice in a soft, kind tone.
        Empty flower pot. If you collect a flower from a place and plant it in the pot, you can smell that place by sniffing the flower.
        A map of the solar system in 3 dimensions. Any alterations to the map move the cosmos.
        A set of gingerbread men molds that only work on human flesh, and will create homonculi that will serve the owner until they are destroyed.
        An invisible, invincible creature trapped in a lead box. It kills something random once a year if released.
        A floor tile with a footprint on it that reads: "Step here to summon Balog." The tile is slightly charred.
        Ear warmers that heighten the environmental sounds around you, but drowns out conversations.
        A tongue that replaces your tongue. It can extend 10' and has a hyper-sensitive sense of smell
        A set of knitting needles that are capable of knitting together dreams of multiple people or even the same person. once complete, if the dreamcoat is worn, the memories are able to be changed, but only once, and never again.
        A 6 inch tall horse.
        A tool designed to crack nuts. It disintegrates shells, leaving the nuts untouched. Bloody marks between the teeth and weird stains on the handle leave disturbing thoughts as to what it has been used for recently.
        A group of 7 mushrooms, each with the abbreviation of a day of the week (Sun-Sat), eating one takes you back to the last occurence of that day.
        A wooden handle that contains every tool ever conceived within. The ultimate swiss army knife. Good luck finding what you need, though.
        A snowglobe of (insert city from your world), shaking it makes it snow there.
        A full sized 110-pipe organ, complete with padded bench. It comes with a songbook of the greatest hits of Heaven and Hell. If played by a skilled performer, will draw a host of the appropriate type to come and judge the performance. A poor performance will have unpleasant consequences, while a good one will grant the player a Boon. The organ will then teleport in a random direction.
        A small music box that makes sounds when opened as if it was connected to another object somewhere else. Effects could include: Busy tavern, Snoring man, Diner table, Street sounds, Whispering meeting, Bedroom noises, Playing kids, People begging for mercy before being murdered
        A tiny hand mirror that will reflect the owner at any age it desires, including into the future. there is a 10% chance that Shael will gaze back at the owner.
        A bell that summons a horse when rung. 10% chance it summons Shael on a pegasus.
        A cold Iron spade labeled "THE SPOON OF BALOG."
        A pouch containing one pound of the most potent drug in the universe. A single molecule is enough to kill a man instantly, while he experiences 1000 mental years of pure ecstasy.
        A red liquid that when drank turns you into an old King long thought to be dead. 10% chance of turning you into Shael.
        A set of tiny iron soldiers wearing the livery of Kalan, The Unspeakable. if the soldiers are arranged into an attack position, there is a 50% chance they will animate and become full sized, obeying the commands of the owner, and a 50% chance that the owner will be forced to wear the livery of Kalan for the next year, losing their name completely.
        A music box that plays pleasant music. 5% chance of invoking the curse of Shael when the song completes.
        A hand-written diary by a young girl professing her hatred of Balog, the Spoon Thief.
        One hundred carved wooden ducks each bearing the name of a constellation. They are unremarkable otherwise.
        A fingernail sized blade that can cut through anything, even subatomic particles.
        A lantern that burns brighter the more the wielder is afraid.
        A disembodied head of a Modron. The creature will accurately guess the weight of anyone who stands within 1' of it.
        A silver eye-mask not unlike the one famously donned by Balog, the Spoon Thief. Allows the wearer total knowledge of every spoon on the plane they are currently in.
        A small tea kettle that fill with acid if the phrase. "be careful with that one, he's a biter." Is spoken within a 2 mile radius.
        A flask with an unknown liquid. It cannot be poured out unless it is standing upright (in which case nothing happens since gravity). The flask is very sturdy and in inscription reads ‘’Those that drink smart and slow will drink this drink made long ago.’’.
        A set of dueling blades that refuse to deal a killing blow. the individual cases are marked "His" and "Hers" in High Elven
        A small set of silver dining spoons. Scrying is impossible within a 10foot bubble centered on them.
        A group of seven swords, each with a day of the week on them. They can only be used on the week that is on their blade. When used they always hit and always cut off a limb.
        A fork that causes any edible substance stabbed with it to be transmogrified into cooked pork. Was retrieved from the possession of an infamous serial murderer.
        A dagger that only hurts those who are feeling angry
        A candlestick that ignites things that are inserted.
        A noose that only tightens around the necks of thieves who stole because they were starving.
        A gold coin that can only be stolen
        A coin that changes metals every time its flipped
        A dagger that can only strike its target in the dark
        A set of dishes that can summon rotting food that will fully heal any lycanthropic curses, but will permanently give the user bad breath.
        A wineskin that at random will take out the alcohol of the substance it contains before adding it some time later. It is a health risk to drink from, but often invokes quick inebriation or not at all.
        A Deck of One Thing. This magically imbued deck contains 31 of 40 cards. When a card is drawn, the drawer of the card has their pockets filled with pewter spoons.
    Rp objects
        A floating chest that when anything is removed from it creates a inescapable barrier around it that only goes away if the item taken, or something of equal or higher value is placed back in the chest. [/u/]
        A mirror that shows a parallel dimension version of whomever looks into it, with slight to large differences being shown. [/u/]
        A skull that can speak and remembers it's former life, but can do nothing else. [/u/]
        An enchanted broom that cleans on its own, but also has a personality of a disgruntled dog. [/u/]
        A working spirit board, that allows limited communication with whatever spirits may be near. [/u/]
        A magical vending machine that when a gold is deposited, it creates and gives a 3" wood statue of who ever is standing in front of it. [/u/]
        Giant ceramic jars with holes in them for air, and a trickle of water. The jars are the size of houses and magically sedate (and then force into hibernation and then stasis) anyone who enters them in short order. They are a form of larder for keeping sentient creatures alive and fat until thier time to be eaten. [/u/MaxSizeIs]
        A crown that puts the wearer to sleep, but then transforms the world around them into a twisted version of what they are dreaming. The dream ends if the crown is removed. The more powerful lucid dreamers can even interact and live in this dream world, which grows larger the more powerful they are. [/u/MaxSizeIs]
        A porthole of desire. There's some standing stone, with a hole carved out through to the otherside. It shows the observer the greatest desire of a person they are observing through the porthole, examples include a spider subject where everything is covered in webs, and dog and their owner playing together, or an ork burning down the world. [/u/bigbearboy144]
        A prayer wheel assembly with a near infinite number of runes in an ancient and pre-verbal form of celestial. With it, one might spend a 5th level spell slot and gain a use of a spell similar to Commune with a deity that is within 1 step of the caster's alignment. They may ask up to 8 questions, but the DM must SECRETLY flip a coin each question up to a maximum of 2d4-1 times (max once each question). On tails, the answer she gives must be False or a Lie. If Heads, instead the answer must be True, if cryptic. After the 2d4-1 confusions have occured, then the resulting answers must be True. Using the device more than once per day requires a DC15 Wisdom save, or the user takes a point of exhaustion. [/u/MaxSizeIs]
        An eternally screaming fire skull. It’s not in pain or anything, just bored. Giving it something that might distract it might stop the screaming. [/u/WSHIII]
        A black stone statue of a frog filling a cubic foot, weighing 150 lbs. Expend a spell slot of at least level one. Every flying insect, bug, creepy crawly, and flying vermin of size Tiny or smaller within a 40 foot cube centered on the frog is snatched by shadowy lashing tongues of force. After 1 hour, roll a d6. On a 5 or higher, the item creates 1d3 goodberries. The statue continue snatching insects for 1d4 hours after activation, a higher level spell slot multiplies the duration. Roll again for goodberries after each hour. The frog is capable of attacking swarms as well, dealing 1d6 hp worth of damage to the swarm or single Tiny flying creature within its range of effect every round, for the duration. [/u/MaxSizeIs]
        Orb of Distant Sight: A crystal sphere the size of a basketball, weighing 50 pounds. Spend a 1st level spell slot, and an image of anything located within a 40 foot cube (within line of sight of the orb, and within a maximum range of thirty miles, or the horizon, whichever is closer) is shown, projected within a 10 foot cube adjacent to the orb, as per the spell Silent Image. The image updates in real time. Using a full round action, the area spied upon may be moved up to 40 feet per round, within range, and the Orb's effect lasts for 1d10 minutes. Spending a higher level spell slot multiplies the duration of effect. Additionally, once per day, spend a Level 1 spell slot, and the Orb may be used to project an image in the reverse manner to a point within the same range, as per the spell Silent Image for 1d10 rounds. Higher level spell slots multiply the duratiom of this effect. Using the orb in this manner prevents its use for any other purpose for a full 8 hours. [/u/MaxSizeIs]
        Altar of Imbuement: A smoked boxwood altar three feet to a side, with fine ivory handles wrapped in gold wire and decorated with cabochons of Onyx and Amber. A fine golden chalice is mounted inside the altar. Place a magical item that has at least 1 charge remaining, expend a divine spell slot of at least level 1, and pray for 8 hours; roll a d6, on a 5 or higher the item will regain 1 charge (up to a maximum of 3 charges in a 1 month period, or 6 charges per year, whichever happens sooner). Spending a higher level spell slot reduces the required d6 roll, becoming automatic when a 6th level divine spell is expended. [/u/MaxSizeIs]
        The Burning Bell: A courtroom with a sinister looking, large-sized black-iron bell (with no clapper) with adamantine bands is mounted six feet above the floor in a central position. The bell weighs over 200,000 pounds and is twenty feet tall and ten feet across at the base. When rung, it peals at B♭-1 (14.5 Hz) and can be heard for up to 10 miles. While painfully loud, a strange property of the amphitheater is that it protects those inside it from the bulk of hearing damage from the bell's peal. A marble dais is built directly beneath the bell, while a second (more ornately carved) is nearby. The sound of the bell is almost completely muted while standing on either dias. The courtroom is shaped like an amphitheater, with rising levels of seating behind the second dias. The bell (and surrounding temple courtroom) is covered with bas-releif pictoglyphs in a forgotten tongue, the glyphs demonstrate a man standing burning beneath the bell, while those surrounding fall to thier knees. Spend a spell slot of at least third level, and the bell peals, sustaining itself for 3d6 minutes, a higher level spellslot multiplies the length of this effect. While active, anyone hearing the bell (including those on the dais) is under the effects of the spell Zone of Truth. Attempting to lie causes physical pain (and potentially damage) that increases to a maximum beneath the bell. Within the first d6 minutes, the Will DC beneath the bell is equal to the 16+caster's proficiency bonus. This decreases by 1 for every d6 minutes or 100 feet of distance (to a minimum of DC10). Those who lie while beneath the bell suffer 3d6 Sonic damage and 3d6 fire damage (reduced by 1d6 for every 10 feet of distance or d6 minutes, to a minimum of 2 sonic and 2 fire). They may attempt a CON save equal to the same DC (as to lie) to only suffer half damage. [/u/MaxSizeIs]
        Goblets of Shattering: A set of at least seven fragile musical crystal goblets. Up to once per hour, when all are played at once, it casts the spell Shatter against targets within range. Roll a d6. On a 1, this causes one of the goblets to break as well, but the damage dealt is doubled. If all the goblets are broken, the magical set no longer functions. [/u/MaxSizeIs]
        The Whispering Pillars: A set of 60 foot tall pillars, intricately carved. Anyone seated at the top of a pillar suffer the following effects (during) and up to 1d6 hours after leaving: Blinded (CON DC15 resist), Silence (WILL DC15 resist), and Slow (DEX DC15 resist). While seated at the top of the pillar, the creature gains ADV on sound based Perception checks and a +5 bonus, being able to hear even a whisper up to ten miles away, as if they were right next to the whisperer. Additionally, once per eight hours, the listener may use the effect of the spell Detect Thoughts against one creature they perceive within 1d6 miles. [/u/MaxSizeIs]
        A heavy gold plated metal washtub weighing 300 pounds. Six feet long, three feet across and three feet deep. When mostly filled with clean warm water, any object or creature placed within the tub is cleansed as per the spell Prestidigitation. It also smells strongly of either rosewater, jasmine, orange blossom, mint, smoked sausage/bacon/steak, sandalwood, patchouli, or lavender (roll a d8), for up to one hour. [/u/MaxSizeIs]
        A Giant Pendulum in a Garguantuan Grandfather Clock: Movement speed in the room is doubled, but all creatures in the room are under the effects of Slow (Will DC 15, resist at start of each round) or Haste (Will DC 15, resist at start of round), determined by a coinflip for each creature upon entering the area, or at the start of thier turn. [/u/MaxSizeIs]
        A fancy room with a very accurate dollhouse inside that creates dolls of anyone or anything within 100 feet. Interacting with the dolls or furniture moves and affects their counterparts as well, and againstvliving creatures the effect is like that of a Voodoo doll (Will/Str/Con DC 15 to resist at the start of the round. Resist three rounds and you are immune to the effect until your next long rest.) Each round, the contents of the house reflect reality. Damaging or destroying the dollhouse deals an equal amount of damage to all within range. [/u/MaxSizeIs]

Misc Hooks
    Omens
        setting
        1.  You find yourself on a ship at night with rain pelting your face.
        2.	You find yourself in a seemingly peaceful grove full of flowers.
        3.	You find yourself at the top of a wizard's tower, looking over the ledge.
        4.	You find yourself sitting at a the bar of a familiar inn.
        5.	You find yourself face down in the sand with no structure in sight.
        6.	You find yourself falling from the sky and crashing into a body of water.
        7.	You find yourself on a battlefield lined with dead soldiers and common folk alike.
        8.	You find yourself in a cemetery covering all sides of a city-sized sphere floating in the darkness.
        9.	You find yourself as small as an insect, lost in the grass of a field.
        10.	You find yourself looking down upon your own body, laying where you slept this night.
        11.	You find yourself feasting with loved ones in a grand mansion.
        12.	You find yourself bound to a strangers back as they walk through a swamp.
        13.	You find yourself rising from slumber in the same spot you fell asleep, but you see your body still sleeping; you are a spirit.
        14.	You find yourself losing an arm wrestling contest to a king, and the court laughs and points.
        15.	You find yourself swimming in an endless ocean.
        16.	You find yourself telling a joke to a monarch, and nobody laughs.
        17.	You find yourself furiously running from something chasing you.
        18.	You find yourself aboard a ship far out to sea.
        19.	You find yourself at the gates of eternity; a choir of divine beings float around you as far as you can see.
        20.	You find yourself in the dilapidated temple of a religion you despise. However, a feeling of failure weighs heavy on your mind.

        the being
        1.	A three-headed being looks down upon you from the sky, one face scowling, one crying, and one smiling.
        2.	Your deity manifests in front of you after crashing down from the heavens; they are worn from battle.
        3.	A serpent slithers toward you, it's body growing longer as it moves as to never leaves an area it once occupied.
        4.	A sickly frog uses its broken limbs to move toward you.
        5.	A figure made solely of familiar faces stares at you.
        6.	The person you care for most walks up behind you and places their hands gently around your neck.
        7.	Bones rise and form the skeleton of an unrecognizable creature.
        8.	Your skin tears from your muscle, forming a swirl of a face in front of you.
        9.	A swarm of maggots overtake your surroundings becoming a being standing 20 feet tall.
        10.	A mass of red clouds shroud the sky. A tear allows you to see something approaching from far beyond the stars.
        11.	Four versions of you appear, each one from an important moment in your life.
        12.	An oval eye nearly as tall as you stares at you, following you wherever you go.

        Action
        1.	The being looks left quickly, and scrambles around before disappearing, but you can faintly make out
        2.	It creates a plume of fire; you feel the heat against your face. A vision of what to come:
        3.	A pool forms at your feet, swirling with otherworldly power, which glistens with the image of
        4.	It calls out your name but its voice fades from existence. Then you see
        5.	It tears open, revealing a single word in a language you do not understand along with the image of
        6.	You destroy it, but it wails and dies revealing
        7.	A wave of teeth and bones wash everything away, and in its wake, you see
        8.	It kneels before you, arms stretched out as if waiting to receive something.
        9.	Its mouth opens, a haunting chorus of laughter erupting forth; its cackles turn to streams of light which manifest as
        10.	It splits the ground open before you, exposing the depths of the world.

        Omen
        1.	your hometown, burning, absolutely orange with smoke and flame.
        2.	those you love turning the back on you, shame is clear in their eyes.
        3.	a devilish form laughing before being consumed in brimstone.
        4.	your eyes pull themselves from your body, moving toward a collection of colors you cannot look away from.
        5.	all material items you treasure are taken, destroyed, or dissolve.
        6.	a foreign vessel with a crew that have no solid form sinking at an incredible rate.
        7.	cracks forming along the sea bed, draining the waters, and then a horde of monstrous limbs climbing out.
        8.	a terrible screech and then complete and utter silence.

        Feeling in Dream
        1.	You feel a great sense of dread about how real it all felt, but shake it off quickly.
        2.	You feel a bit perplexed on why this being came to you of all people.
        3.	You feel like this is something you need to tell your party members, but can barely find the words to describe the experience.
        4.	You feel like this matter will weigh on you for the days to come.
        5.	You feel the matter would be a complete waste of time to investigate.
        6.	You feel unsettled at the events that unfolded before you.

        Feeling upon Waking
        1.	You awaken in a cold sweat.
        2.	When you awake, you find yourself sleepwalking about 20 feet from where you fell asleep.
        3.	When you awaken, you still see the last image of your dream when you shut your eyes until you flush them with water.
        4.	You jump up, screaming for a moment, but you are able to silence yourself before waking your allies.

        seperate, complete omens
        1	A PC makes eye contact with a mysterious beggar, who gasps and runs away. If followed, they disappear.
        2	A raven caws angrily at the party before flying away. More are seen periodically, perching and watching.
        3	A woman in the street drops an urn, which shatters. There's a moment of silence in the street.
        4	A baby won't stop crying in a nearby basket. If the players investigate, there is no child. The crying is gone.
        5	The campfire goes out in the middle of the night. There is no wind. It is difficult to restart as darkness closes in.
        6	The flames of nearby candles flicker out completely, but a moment later they return.
        7	The moon is larger and brighter than usual. It seems to dominate the sky, and cast harsh, pale shadows.
        8	A wooden road sign is snapped in half at a crossroads. It lies broken in the dirt.
        9	The clouds are gray and full of rain. And yet it does not rain. Though thunder rumbles, not a drop lands.
        10	A PC wakes up in the morning with a cut across their palm that wasn't there before.
        11	Animals go wild. Horses buck and have wide, scared eyes. Dogs bark fiercely and pull at their leashes.
        12	There's a large crack in a PC's drinking glass, and yet it doesn't break unless forced.
        13	A bird flies into the wall of a building and drops dead outside the door.
        14	A PC is contacted by the Sending spell, but they only hear heavy breathing and crying.
        15	The players hear distant, sourceless harp music. When pointed out or mentioned, it stops.
        16	An old man has a heart attack in the street. He stares directly at one of the PCs as he dies.
        17	A passed out drunk wakes suddenly and screams, clawing at his eyes. He runs and disappears.
        18	A strong wind that was blowing all day suddenly stops. The world is still for a few moments before life continues.
        19	A child chases an errant ball, only to trip and twist their ankle. The ball is not found.
        20	The temple doors are tossed open by a violent wind until a concerned acolyte rushes to close them.
    Rumor 
        Did you hear the news?
        A Child
        A Fat merchant
        A Temple priest
        A Sailor
        A Soldier
        A Magician
        A Noble
        A Rogue
        A Crazy monk
        A Drunken farmer

        1d10 AND THEY
        Got drunk
        Got washed out to sea
        Got stuck on a runaway horse
        Found an old well
        Disappeared for 3 days
        Found an old tomb
        Met a weird stranger
        Found a magic item
        Were sleepwalking
        Walked off into the forest

        1d10 AND DISCOVERED
        A new disease
        A powerful artifact
        A cursed item
        A sleeping monster
        A treasure map
        A hero/villain thought dead, returned to life
        A book of secrets
        A key to a vast fortune
        A supressed truth about the ruling kingdom
        A door to another Plane

        1d10 AND NOW
        People are disappearing!
        People are sick!
        The king has decreed strange new laws!
        The temple has issued strange new tenets!
        The sun might not come back up!
        The moon might fracture!
        The world might be invaded!
        People are having bad dreams every night!
        People are unable to sleep!
        People are afraid to come outside!



        Motivations
        d4 - You Asked, So I'll
        Tell you a blatant lie, because I don't like you or because I'm afraid.
        Tell you a half-truth, because I don't trust you or because I'm afraid.
        Tell you the truth, but mix up all the details, because I want to trust you, but I'm afraid.
        Tell you the truth, because I like and trust you, or I need help.

        d20 - Why Am I Doing This?
        To gain wealth.
        To gain power.
        To fulfill a promise.
        To get revenge.
        To get justice.
        For the glory.
        To gain the favor of someone.
        To help a friend.
        To stop an event.
        To pay a debt.
        To solve a mystery.
        To escape from a problem.
        To thwart an enemy.
        To expose the truth.
        To cover up the truth.
        To gain my freedom.
        To liberate others.
        To oppress others.
        To keep the status quo.
        To upset the status quo.


        d4 - When Will I Give Up?
        As soon as I meet a serious setback or if I, or anyone else gets hurt.
        As soon as there are a lot of obstacles, or if I, or anyone else gets seriously hurt.
        As soon as someone dies.
        Never. I will die before I give up.
    nightmares
        1	You find yourself stranded in a desert, only sand from horizon to horizon. You keep walking but the dunes don't seem to come any closer. You feel extremely thirsty and slowly but steadily, your energy starts to fade. Hours seem to pass and when youre getting desperate, the sand in front of you starts to shift, a giant scorpion emerges and starts chasing you.	(/u/DraXus87)	(I)
        2	You stand before all those who have been affected by your rampant killings throughout your adventure. A wife who committed suicide after you killed her husband, a bandit. A son, clinging to his mother and asking when his father will be home. A woman, weeping for the loss of her daughter. A man brought to tears by the loss of his husband. They weep and ask why you've brought them such pain. You cannot see yourself and it is unclear whether they are actually referring to you or to the cursed item which is giving the dream.	(/u/Polinthos_Returned)	(I)
        3	You're having a normal dream and everything is 100% fine, then all of a sudden, certain items start to grow, then shrink, then grow, then shrink. You have no control of what it is or if it grows or shrinks and your forced to be 100% concentrated on this object. You're completely aware you're dreaming but can't stop. Whilst this is happening, a loud, deep bass drum is going off every couple seconds, it almost sounds like a war drum. You can hear it but you can't comprehend what is going on or where it's coming from.	(/u/lordochaos321)	(I)
        4	You dream about $the next encounter$.	(/u/StingerAE)	(I)
        5	You are fighting a shadow rival, and the nightmare is different dependent on where you are sleeping: In the mountains, your rival attacks with a sword of ice and rock; In the forest, your rival strikes from shadows and bushes all around; In the desert, your rival attacks with a scorpion's tail; In a town, every passing villager is your rival; By the sea, your rival pins you underwater, gasping for air; Just before you awaken soaked in sweat, your shadow rival's face lightens to reveal your own reflection.	(/u/evilninjaduckie)	(I)
        6	You're in a dimly lit room, you see a butterfly or moth struggling to fly and flapping against the wall. Walking over to investigate, you reach out to gently touch the grey creature, only for it to fall into dust as soon as you touch it.	(/u/Beltyboy118_)	(I)
        7	You dream that you are chased by countless slow walking zombies and you can't defend yourself even if you want to. Also the floor is very slippery, like you are on a frozen lake, no matter how hard you try, you can't run properly.	(/u/Faulknir)	(I)
        8	You dream that the letter you were searching for a long time is in your hands now, but you can't read it, but everybody expects you to read it. You want to take your time but it gets worse and the letter begins to burn in your hands. You have a little time to read this important information, good luck trying.	(/u/Faulknir)	(I)
        9	You dream that you are a constant state of falling. Everytime you think that you are going to hit the floor, a gigantic monster appears and swallows you to another dimension and you keep falling in there too.	(/u/Faulknir)	(I)
        10	You find yourself in a battle for whatever cause you champion, whether it be the safety of a loved one or the annihilation of your most despised enemies. The battle is a crucial one, one you’ve prepared for for months; however, every strike you make falls short, your body feels sluggish whenever you move to attack - as if you’re wearing full plate underwater or you’re one of those squishy wizard-folk - all your spells fizzle and drown as you find yourself unable to speak. You watch helplessly as you fail to protect your loved ones from horrible fates, your empire crumbles around you, and your every last pleasant dream lies in shambles at your feet.	(/u/Syuriix)	(I)
        11	You dream that you've lost all of the skill and experience you've gained over your travels. If you were a melee user, you feel your muscles wither away and your attacks are as weak as a child, a magic user, your spells backfire or are weak and useless, an archer would watch his arrows fly wildly off-target, etc. You can get creative with the description here, if a PC is proud of a certain skill you could describe in brutal detail how awful they've become.	(/u/SomeCasualObserver)	(I)
        12	You dream that your body is overtaken by a malicious presence, and you watch as a helpless captor while it slays your companions using your body	(/u/SomeCasualObserver)	(I)
        13	You dream that you've died, and your companions forget about you completely. Meanwhile, you linger on as a spirit and watch your party go on without you and meet great success, seemingly much better without you dragging them down.	(/u/SomeCasualObserver)	(I)
        14	In your dream you suffer a grave wound, and instead of saving you, your party decides to put you out of your misery, you spring awake just as you feel the cold steel of the blade meet your neck.	(/u/SomeCasualObserver)	(I)
        15	You go out for a night on the town with your friends. All is well and you are having a great time. Eventually the inevitable time comes when you must rest. Finally alone, the faint music and noise of the tavern behind you, you feel relaxed and at ease. Strangely relaxed, even as a hand morphs out of the wall in front of you. It gives a slow wave, so you feel like it is friendly and even wave back. Strange, when did it get a friend? Why do they keep trying to touch you? You decide to leave and try to turn away but there are more hands beside you now and they grab you. No matter how hard you try, you cannot break free, more and more of them grab at you, pulling you towards the wall. You manage to get out loudly as they somehow pull you into it, but you are cut off as a hand covers your mouth and pulls you through the wall. You see your friends rush into the room and bite the hand and try to shout to them, but they cannot hear or see you from this side of the wall. You watch them search for you fruitlessly until you are pulled screaming further into darkness.	(/u/TheMatt666)	(I)
        16	You dream that you wake up normally, however as soon as you speak for the first time, you are interrupted mid sentence by biting your own tongue. You try to curse the pain away only to spit blood and teeth from your mouth. Frantically you scramble to grab them with one hand while trying to stop the flow of blood from your mouth with the other. You can feel more of your teeth falling from your gums into the sea of blood filling your mouth. Strangely, the person you were talking to does not seem shocked by this and continues on normally. You try to shout to them for help, hell, for anything, even a bowl to catch the pieces of you falling off, but only succeed in spraying them with a mouthful of blood and your remaining teeth. They still seem unphased, even as you raise your hands to your mouth in surprise to feel it, only to have your lower jaw slough off. Panicking you reach for them, only to find that your limbs crumple at the joints as you try to move them. Your entire body slowly crumpled as bits break or fall off until you are nothing more than a blob of mangled human parts in disarray, staring up at your friend as breathing becomes harder and harder to do. You wake up just after you black out.	(/u/TheMatt666)	(I)
        17	You are awakened by strange noises outside. Some sort of loud commotion. You decide to get ready and investigate. As you head out, you are stopped by someone close to you. They start trying to tell you something. By the way their hands move, it must be important, but only an inhuman screeching comes out of their mouth when they talk. Their lips don't even move. You try to get them to repeat themselves and they seem to get frustrated and grab a notepad. You feel a slight relief for a moment before they turn the pad to you so you can see what they have wrote and it is just jagged scribbles. Others try to help them explain what's going on to you and progressively everyone gets more and more frustrated but you still can't understand them. You wake up screaming as one of your party members jumps on in a rage after an extended effort trying to get the point across to you.	(/u/TheMatt666)	(I)
        18	You find yourself seemingly restrained, looking down you see your a baby swaddled in a course blanket. An unseen figure picks you up and begins to carry you, walking at a slow hobbled giant. Eventually you are laid down on a forest floor and the unseen figure walks away. A rat scampers over to you and climbs on your chest, you feel yourself smiling at it, soon there are more, 3, 6, a dozen, two dozen! They climb over biting into your flesh until you succumb to death from a 1000 bites.	(/u/only_male_flutist)	(I)
        19	You’re racing away from a darkness that threatens to swallow you. Something about this darkness and it’s inky blackness seems to be erasing everything it touches and the daylight begins to dwindle. You claw a slide down the edge of a wet leafy steep and slip into the pond far below. You expect cool water to wash over you but it’s oddly warm. You breech the surface and are horrified to discover you’re swimming in a pool of vomit. It’s in your mouth and nose, choking you as you start to drown, gagging over and over. Finally you realize that you are laying down, and the gagging is real, that you are actually beginning to choke on your own vomit. The character continues gagging afterwards for 15 minutes.	(/u/PantsIsDown)	(I)
        20	You're walking along a path when a heavy silence falls, like a great weight is placed on you. You look up to a forest in flames as large monstrous heads on necks higher than trees glare down upon you.	(/u/only_male_flutist)	(I)
        21	You slowly wipe the tears from your eyes before opening them. All around you the crowd shouts. "You are a terrible person." "You should never have existed." "Scum of the earth." Wiping more tears from your eyes you slowly turn your head upwards. Before you, silhouetted by the gray cloudy sky, stands a tree with a rope hanging from it. A hooded figure places a platform beneath it. A person is pushed towards it. You wish you could forget them but you can't. It's your partner of over 300 of your most beautiful, wonderful, joyful moons. The crowd's shouting gets louder. "Murderer." "Terrorist." "Villain." You continue to watch, knowing they are innocent with all of your heart, mind, and soul. The shouting gets louder. Your world is consumed, leaving only the shouting, the rope, and the love of your life. The shouting reaches its peak as the rope is tied around their neck. You can't take it any more. Rushing forward towards the tree, crying out in agony all the way. You push aside a guard and feel cold, hard steel piece through your back. A lung ruptures, but before you die you hear one last thing, "You could have lived. It only had to be me." Darkness fills your vision as the rope goes taut.	(/u/schmucker5)	(I)
        22	The weight of a cask of ale presses down upon your back as you return to your home village from the city. Birds sing as they fly through the sky's bright, cloudless blue. You set down the cask for a rest and begin to play a joyful tune on your ukulele. Gray clouds begin rise over the horizon but they don't look quite normal. After some thought you realize that it is smoke coming up from the only place you've ever known. The birds go silent as you leave the cask behind and start running. The cries of your people blend with screams of the invaders before echoing across the landscape. Praying to all of the gods, you continue only to run face to face with a strange person clad in dark armor and wielding a shining sword. Past them you can see your parents on the ground crying over the body of your sibling. Your childhood friend sees you and shouts to run while you can. The attacker grabs you and kicks you to the ground. Another one approaches and begins to mock you. You wish you could do something to stop this. You would willing surrender your life to end the suffering of your people. But that chance never comes, a sword pierces through your heart and you fall to the ground. The last sounds you hear are the cries of your parents and the angry shouts of your friend. Your vision fills with red before fading to black.	(/u/schmucker5)	(I)
        23	The bustling crowds push past you as you walk to your favorite bar. Once you arrive at your normal seat an unfamiliar dwarf comes up to you and sits down. "I have an opportunity for you." Intrigued you start paying very close attention. The dwarf pulls out a rune covered deck of cards, "How many do you want." After some questioning they explain that the cards are items of great power. You agree to take third cards and pull out the first one. On the first card a bright, golden, almost glowing orb appears. Years of experience flood through your mind while a belt wraps itself around you causing strength to surge through your body. Extremely satisfied with the outcome you pull out one more. On this card a the image of a golden key glows before a powerful magic $Important Item$ appears in your grasp. You can sense the sword [or whatever] would strip away the soul of anyone unfortunate enough to get hit by you. The third card has a cloaked figure on it and no apparent effect occurs. You try to thank the dwarf but find they have already left. After celebrating by getting thoroughly drunk you return to your home and pass out almost as soon as you enter. You awake to find your spouse standing over you and bring down your new sword [or bring down a sword whilst wearing your new whatever] on your throat. The air escapes your lungs and you hear nothing from them before your vision fades to dark.	(/u/schmucker5)	(I)
        24	A small sidewalk cafe in the open market. The character is seated and finds the body feels so heavy As to be unable to rise. Waiters and then passersby stop one after the other in front of the player placing plates full of offal in front of them. Disgust colors their faces as they take the plate away empty. The character doesn't remember eating but feels fuller and fuller. The crowds begin cutting of their own body parts to set before the player only to react in fear and loathing as empty plates are taken away. If the player ever tries to actually eat what is front of them they look down and see their own half eaten body and blood on their hands.	(/u/NeoBlue42)	(I)
        25	Climbing up the circular interior stairway of a tower castle the sense of something BAD following increases. The faster the character tries to get away the tighter and tighter the hall becomes until the press is suffocating. If the player turns around they find the stairs crumbling behind them into a void where they would fall forever.	(/u/NeoBlue42)	(I)
        26	A giant approaches and you reach for you weapon only to find an empty sheath. The creature laugh as it points out you forgot your pants as well. The rest of the party starts to chuckle also until one then the other notices that (whomever of the party the character likes most) has been slain with the lost weapon.	(/u/NeoBlue42)	(I)
        27	You are a Shepard, tending to your flock of sheep. You feel relaxed as you count them jumping over a fence, one by one. But pretty soon the sheep coming over the fence becomes a flood as they swarm around you. Soon you are completely surround, tormented by their inhuman moans as they stare at you with their alien eyes.	(/u/Jacknerik)	(I)
        28	you dream that you are drowning in ghostly hands that pull you into the ground while the item floats before you	(/u/Oyster_Stu)	(I)
        29	you dream a friend gives you a gift in a box and when you open it, the item lies inside and when you look back at your friend they are swiftly withering into a corpse	(/u/Oyster_Stu)	(I)
        30	you dream of walking through a large empty house at night and tormented voices call to you behind closed doors but never anyone behind them	(/u/Oyster_Stu)	(I)
        31	you dream you're standing at the banks of an icy lake at night and you can hear the item call your name over and over, knowing it lies at the bottom of the lake while silent figures around from the bank point at you, their eyes milky white	(/u/Oyster_Stu)	(I)
        32	you dream that you visit a royal figurehead but when you are left alone with them, they begin to choke on blood in their mouth and the guards enter, convinced that you are the murderer	(/u/Oyster_Stu)	(I)
        33	You're in an outhouse, when something big starts slamming on the door, trying to break it down. The slamming slowly gets louder, and you try to get up to escape, but you find yourself chained to the seat. The banging suddenly stops. The door creaks open and you hear a rasping breath, a cold chill engulfs you. You hear the breath get louder and louder, until it feels like it's almost in your ear. Then suddenly, the thing screams in your ear and you wake up in a cold sweat, screaming.	(/u/DocNeonOnReddit)	(I)
        34	A little child stands before you. They reach out a hand towards you as if for help. An ax appears nested in their skull. A spear appears through their heart. They screams as blade after blade impale them; crying out for you to end it; end their misery. A small obsidian glass dagger appears in your hand. But you can’t do it. You wake up with a start, sweating, with the dagger clutched in your fist.	(/u/SkrewtapeSecertary)	(I)
        35	You are writing a letter or playing an instrument at a feverish pace, but your fingers start to quickly grow weak and you lose sensation in them. The skin and muscles on your fingers slowly starts to rot off the bone, but you cant stop moving them until the bare bone that remains falls off and you are left with only a bleeding stump for a hand.	(/u/Jacknerik)	(I)
        36	You have a ship to catch. It leaves in just a few minutes and it is absolutely imperative you get on it. But for every few steps you take, the road shifts so that it goes at right angles to the path to the ship, and it lengthens. You keep going faster and faster, but cannot catch up. Periodically, you come upon people who ask you questions, and you have to give the right answer to move on, or something terrible will happen.	(/u/felagund)	(I)
        37	Your party is is the entrance to the $BBEG'S_LAIR$. Your comrade says "On three. 1...2..." You glance down. You are naked, directly under the continual light globe in the ceiling, forgot to prepare any spells this morning and are not proficient in the bizarre exotic weapon in your hand. Your friends look at you expectantly to lead the charge. ... "3!!!!!"	(/u/StingerAE)	(I)
        38	You go about your day as usual, when you suddenly feel your teeth loosening as you touch them with your tongue. They start to fall out one by one, and you can't do anything against it.	(/u/cal-n-cas)	(I)
        39	You find yourself sitting at a table in a dark room along with others, trapped in an hypnotic state and mumbling sentences while referring to yourself in third-person.	(/u/Delightful-Dingo)	(I)
        40	The dream is wonderful. All of your friends and family are there. Even the ones who have passed away. You feel elated and joyful. Everyone lives forever in the light. Then, slowly you realise that this can’t be real. People do die. Most of these people are dead. You will die too.	(/u/[deleted])	(I)
        41	You are traveling a road by your self. The road begins to wrap around and suddenly you realize you're traveling in a circle you can't escape from. No where to go but forward you encounter someone traveling ahead of you on the same direction . As you catch up to him/her you they began to seem familiar. As you get close enough, you see it is yourself, only horribly disfigured. A gaping wound in your chest. And your face horribly scarred. This future version of you gasping for air says "don't trust them" and falls over.	(/u/thorndawg1337)	(I)
        42	you are fighting with your closest friends against a horrible monster (beholder or something similar) when you are suddenly compelled to turn against those who have saved you countless times and whom you have grown to love and trust. you slowly kill them before killing yourself out of grief.	(/u/dafzes)	(I)
        43	You are running from a horrifying monster the likes of which you've never seen before. He moves at a slower pace than you but he never seems to tire while you feel yourself fading quickly. Up ahead you see a house. Safety! Surely, if you get inside and lock the door you can buy time to find a hiding place. Your speed picks up, energy renewed at the thought of safety. Finally making it you slam open the door and dart inside. You survey your surroundings when suddenly you feel a hot breath on your neck. In that instant one terrible thought makes itself horribly clear. "I forgot to lock the door."	(/u/DuzellKitty)	(I)
        44	You dream you are staring into a mirror, your reflection smiles evilly at you before turning its back to you and walking away. The world surrounding you starts turning to glass and crystal, as your body turns to glass you awake.	(/u/Ravendead)	(I)
        45	A giant crystallized skull floats in space surrounded by stars, as the skull rotates to face you you catch a glimpse of light shining from inside the skull through one of its eye sockets.	(/u/Ravendead)	(I)
        46	You are sitting with your friends at a table in a tavern, having a meal when suddenly you find yourself bringing up a secret you hide from them. Then [closest or more vulnerable friend]'s head rolls off. The severed head says "no wonder you hid this, you monster." You look down, your meal has turned to blood. You look back up. All your friends have lost their heads now, and they lay slumped over the table.	(/u/Montybeth)	(I)
        47	You are trapped in a giant butler's sink in dirty water and the plug has been removed and the water is beginning to swirl pulling you round and down sweeping you past giant utensils just too distant or too fast to catch.	(/u/StingerAE)	(I)
        48	You are nothing more than an imaginary puppet dancing to the tune of laughing godlike beings who decide your fate with a casual toss of dice.	(/u/StingerAE)	(I)
        49	Your party have forgotten you exist, and are trying to kill you or they torture you instead	(/u/[deleted])	(I)
        50	You dream of getting stitches from a huge living orange with an artificer's crank-powered sewing machine...	(/u/Devstep)	(I)
        51	You start by entering a room. There's a chest. It's a mimic. You run and open a door. It's a mimic. You bring out your sword. It's a mimic. The room is a mimic. Your chestplate is a mimic. Your helmet is a mimic. YOU are a mimic.	(/u/ShayminKeldeo421)	(I)
        52	You’re wandering alone in a forest. It’s dark and cold, but there’s no snow, just a bitter frost that clings to everything. You can feel the numbness in your fingertips slowly spread up your hands and arms. You vaguely understand that you won’t last long - that you WILL die if you don’t find shelter from the cold. Up ahead you see a light. Maybe an inn? Just a small cottage? At this point anything will do. You try to walk towards it, but you can’t control your shivering and you collapse on the forest floor. You can’t move your fingers, but you can claw your way forward, inch by inch. Finally, you’re at the edge of the clearing, but you’ve used the last of your strength. The cold binds your screams in your throat, and your body shakes uncontrollably. Eventually even that ceases, and all you can do is watch the people through the windows as the frost covers your eyes. As you struggle to hang on to your last breath, knowing that once you breathe out no more air will enter your lungs, you wake and realize your chest hurts from holding your breath.	(/u/killary4pris0n)	(I)
        53	You sit next to a campfire. The party members surround you. You all tell stories, recite poems and jokes, and drink to your hearts content. Eerily, you hear a soft whisper in your ear, and you feel a sharp blade crawl across your neck. You watch in horror as your closest friends observe you bleeding to death and do nothing to help you.	(/u/Billybaf)	(I)
        54	In a bustling city you watch you party members getting slowly eaten by giant $Terrifying_Creature$. None of the citizens around you seem to hear you or do anything about it.	(/u/Patergia)	(I)
        55	You find yourself laying down in a heap of snow in a frozen forest, barely alive, your friends are around you... (they are either all laying down, all standing, all dead, etc)	(/u/theoddman626)	(I)
        56	You find yourself at home, in the night outside your house. A terrifying attacker chases you inside, only to find your family/friends who are too busy to even take notice. You fall victim to the attacker as they sit idly by, ignoring your screams.	(/u/GoldenArcher823)	(I)
        57	You find yourself among a crowded urban area, a market perhaps. However, you quickly realize everything, from folk to beast to nature itself, is running backwards in time. You try to interact with someone, to no avail. Suddenly you notice a hooded figure across the street staring at you. As you try to discern it's shape, you see a humanoid creature with an upside down face, screeching as it points in your direction	(/u/cxshards)	(I)
        58	You and your companions are having a meal. Only thing is, there's no food, only charcoal on the plates. You turn it away, but everybody is staring at you seriously. You feel a hit on the back of your skull and dizzily watches without reacting your friends tying you to the chair and force-feeding you. It tastes like ash and you feel your throat bleeding as you swallow. "You gotta eat, $Name$" "Gotta keep your fire lit".	(/u/cxshards)	(I)
        59	You stand at the end of a large stone and wood bridge, the land around you dead and barren, the sky dark aglow with an eerie orange light. The wind howling as you scan around, you notice the bridge and the surrounding area as place from your childhood. Though then it was vibrant and lush with life thriving all around. As sadness and despair begin to settle into your gut you hear a ferocious wicked growl. From the shadows a large beast with razor sharp teeth, gnarled spines growing out of it's back, and blood thirty eyes starts moving towards. You try and runaway but move slowly as the horror approaches, half way across the bridge you stand consumed in shadow. The beast is upon you and ready to...	(/u/[deleted])	(I)
        60	You are walking on the docks at night with your? child, you look to your left and a massive serpent made of black bones slowly rises from the dark water. You freeze but your? child keeps moving, playfully running forward. You wake up as the serpent lunges at your child?.	(/u/Korgatsoup)	(I)
        61	It's winter, you're a wolf running with your pack. They find something to eat in the snow and you join them. After a few bites you look down, you've been eating the half frozen remains of your loved one(s).	(/u/Korgatsoup)	(I)
        62	A $Charming_Friendly_Creature$ offers you blueberry cake. You eat the cake, and begin to expand and turn blue. Then your adventuring comrade yells "Gonna Pop!" and everyone ducks for cover!	(/u/Javrambimbam)	(I)
        63	You wake up in your camp and hear the soft crunching of branches. As you look, you hear a growl behind you. As you turn to face it, a $Terrifying_Creature$ leaps at you. You feel warm breath on your face as it begins to take a bite!	(/u/Javrambimbam)	(I)
        64	You're hunting for an offender, and as you are about to shoot, they hide behind the last tavernkeep you saw. You shot them instead and the offender's shadow looms over you. Smothering you!	(/u/Javrambimbam)	(I)
        65	You're on a sandy beach and realize $Skittering_Creatures$ are crawling all over you. They engulf you completely.	(/u/Javrambimbam)	(I)
        66	You find yourself at a gathering of those you admire. Great heroes, beautiful lovers, and influential figures. They're all looking at you with admiration. You open your mouth to speak, but you feel your teeth begin to fall out. As each one clinks to the stone floor, you can feel the disgust roll over you, the taste of blood in your mouth making you sick as you wake up gagging.	(/u/nlitherl)	(II)
        67	You see (npc or character they're most attached to) approaching, as you go to embrace them you notice a look of surprise then pain cross their face, as you look down you see your hand, scarlet, as the blood drips down your elbow the drops in the pool of blood bring you back to awareness, they whisper one word "Why?" as the tears run down their face mixing with the blood the last thing you hear is the dripping of the blood flowing down your arm. You awaken to the sound of the rains last drops collecting in a pool nearby.	(/u/Smokey9000)	(II)
        68	You move to awaken $party_member$ for their turn on watch, but as you move you notice an odd weakness in your legs, as you look down you notice for the first time the flesh on your hands slowly melting and sloughing off revealing the pitted/ rotted bone beneath, as you go to scream out in horror/pain,your legs give out from beneath you, the impact knocking the breath from your lungs. As you lay there feeling your body slowly dissolve, unable to draw breath you see a pair of malevolent feline eyes staring at you from the lowest branch in the tree you were resting against, the cat begins to take shape and as it leaps at you it bursts apart as a swarm of spiders engulfing you, you awaken to your own screams, realizing it was just a dream, but a prickling along your spine and the echoes of a malicious laugh leave you wondering, was it really only a dream?	(/u/Smokey9000)	(II)
        69	It's hot. Humid. You're holding an unfamiliar crossbow-like weapon. You lie motionless in a row of bushes along the edge of a flooded grain field. Dragonfly-shaped airships circle overhead with a powerful thumping sound, and begin to debark men clad in green. With a stuttering roar, some kind of automated wand sprays red magic missiles into the green-clad men from somewhere on your left. Their crossbow-like weapons glow with flickering star-shaped flame as they respond. You wake with a start, wondering what that even was.	(/u/slaaitch)	(II)
        70	You are being pursued by an immense fat demon made of glass. You can only run, because if you try to hide, it bursts through even the stoutest stone wall with a cry of "OH YEAH!" Brilliant red ichor sloshes visibly within its skin at every step.	(/u/slaaitch)	(II)
        71	The party is ambushed by goblins. Just as you are about to enter the fray, you feel a breeze. One of your party members asks if you're forgetting something. You look down and see that you are nude. The party laughs. The goblins laugh. You wake up cold, the blanket having slid off the bed.	(/u/slaaitch)	(II)
        72	An airship envelops you in golden light and you float up from the ground. A group of hairless gray Deep Gnomes straps you to a table and performs a thorough examination. Uncomfortably thorough. They shine a glittering light in your eyes and you jerk awake. It's an hour before dawn and you can't recall making camp last night, even though the tents are set up.	(/u/slaaitch)	(II)
        73	You are standing above the sky, leaning against a wall of glass, looking down on the familiar coastline of your homeland, made strange by this new perspective. A menacing shape, clearly made of metal, slides soundlessly into view and begins to project beams of light at the points you know hold towns.	(/u/slaaitch)	(II)
        74	You're in complete agony. You move the hand away from your mouth to see it is covered in blood. The blood continues to drip on the sides of your mouth. You run to the nearby commoners walking among the streets begging for help except nothing you say makes sense. The words appear to be gurgled by the amount of blood. They look at you strangely and push you away as you bleed on their clothing. Looking into a mirror placed in front of a store, you use your hands to spread your mouth open and realize that your tongue has been extracted. The amount of blood begins to overtake you and you begin to choke. It is at that moment you wake up with a burning sensation in the back of your throat. You were choking on saliva in your sleep.	(/u/domdomdommy)	(II)
        75	The bed you are sleeping in is really a mimic and is trying to eat you!	(/u/PutridMeatPuppet)	(II)
        76	Your loved one is secretly a doppelganger and your real loved one is held captive far away.	(/u/PutridMeatPuppet)	(II)
        77	Your favorite possession has been stolen and been replaced by a fake replica.	(/u/PutridMeatPuppet)	(II)
        78	You're stuck in a white room with an eerie-looking statue. You don't know why, but something's telling you that you really need to leave or something horrible will happen.	(/u/EpisodicChaos)	(II)
        79	You're stuck in some kind of time-loop, reliving the same day over and over again. Nobody will believe you, even as you predict every detail you've spent the last month or so seeing over and over.	(/u/EpisodicChaos)	(II)
        80	A surreal rendition of $next_planned_encounter$. It takes a sharp deviation from the original when a shadowy creature picks the party off one by one and the dreamer is helpless to stop it.	(/u/EpisodicChaos)	(II)
        81	You are stranded in a painted desert, and the sun is perpetually setting. The dry, dusty ground becomes a riverbed which flash floods and drags you under.	(/u/MaxSizeIs)	(III)
        82	You are a bird, flying over someone dying. You alight next to them and they reach for you.	(/u/MaxSizeIs)	(III)
        83	You are dying. A bird alights next to you. Then more. You are whisked up in a flock of small birds who peck and scratch. You know there will soon be no trace of you left, but you cannot.. or must not move.	(/u/MaxSizeIs)	(III)
        84	A collection of live butterflies and winged insects sits in front of you, glittering like jewels. Your $Stern_Parental_Figure$ stands over your left shoulder instructing you in the method of euthanizing, and then mounting the insects for display and study. They tell you that you are not done despite all the bugs having been mounted. You realize they mean to have you mounted last, and expects you to do everything but the final pin.	(/u/MaxSizeIs)	(III)
        85	Your teeth are loose. You pull one out by accident, but a second grows into it's place. You pull a second, and a third...	(/u/MaxSizeIs)	(III)
        86	You see yourself in the mirror. You smile, and have too many teeth, and then your reflection drags you into the mirror and begins devouring you.	(/u/MaxSizeIs)	(III)
        87	You go to show your friends some cool thing you can suddenly do, and find they are dead.. rotting hunks of flesh, but still moving. They bite and scratch, clawing at you, trying to drag you down.	(/u/MaxSizeIs)	(III)
        88	You are lost and naked. Something is pursuing you, and the further you run the larger and more frightening it becomes, eventually looming on the horizon.	(/u/MaxSizeIs)	(III)
        89	Wandering the labynthian corridors of a place you once knew well, seeking a murderer hiding amongst your friends. It starts to snow and inside the building there are snowdrifts everywhere. It is quite cold, and you are nearly naked. Your friends don't beleive you that there is a murderer and that it is snowing. You are also late, the murderer has killed one of your friends, and know that if you do not find the killer soon, then more of your friends will die.	(/u/MaxSizeIs)	(III)
        90	A dream where you wandering through a cave populated with mannequins. All of whom are wearing the faces of your friends and family. At the back is a mannequin whose back is turned to you. You find yourself terrified at looking upon its face. But you don't know why...	(/u/Sobek6)	(III)
        91	You dream of your family members that are still alive are brutally murdered by someone or something.	(/u/chidarengan)	(IV)
        92	Your beloved family pet turns on you, and you are forced in defense to choke it. It does not relent its attack as you do, and you're forced to continue choking until it dies. Its head swells and throbs with its heartbeat as you continue the hold, and it dies as the animal's scalp and face explode from the pressure of the blood you choked it with. Your pet falls dead from your hands, a brutal mess, and all the good memories you had with it flash before you and seem to crumble.	(/u/chidarengan)	(IV)
        93	Your dream that you have severed ties with $best_friend$; yet contact continues, and they seem to be nearly everywhere in your life. They betrayed you, yet everywhere you go and everything you involve with they seems to be there. Frustrated, you approach them near a stream and berate them that it was they who wronged you and still goes where they know you will be. You begin to argue in earnest, screaming and furious, and as your vision blurs and tunnels, you find you have wrestled them to the bank of the stream, and to try to silence his screams, push his head in the water. Before you know it they are dead in your hands!	(/u/chidarengan)	(IV)
        94	You are in a noble's salon, moving among salaciously dressed courtesans. Every drink you sip tastes like sand, and every caress fills you with horror. When you sit at the table they all set to, devouring the meat, but the sickly sweet smell of it makes you think of corrupted flesh, and the thought of eating it turns your guts.	(/u/nlitherl)	(IV)
        95	You dream that you're in a dark room, and random body parts of all different races are appearing and disappearing sporadically. They begin striking you, chasing you, or assaulting you. Some have claws, others warts or a contagious disease...	(/u/[deleted])	(IV)
        96	You dream you're watching the stars when you feel a sense of losing your footing like you're going to fall into the night sky, nearly falling upward. As your feet leave the ground, the stars dim as a winged form stares at you, then you plummet into the cold ocean.	(/u/Oyster_Stu)	(V)
        97	You dream that you're home reading by candlelight when you look up to see your $PET$ contorting; it's head and limbs sprouting second and third heads and limbs. Lightning flashes by the window and a dark monstrous shadow looms across the horizon line.	(/u/Oyster_Stu)	(V)
        98	You dream you wake in your bed at home to the sound of the sound water flowing just out of ear shot. As you follow the sound you feel the wriggling of tentacles in your left hand and look down to see a writhing mess of small squid.	(/u/Oyster_Stu)	(V)
        99	You dream that you are buried alive in the ground and waken to the cramped darkness, screaming & yelling as you scratch your nails bloody against the coffin lid. The ground outside is filled with burrowing and holes begin to smash open as black tentacles begin to writhe through slowly filling the coffin with their cold, slimy touches as they begin to suffocate you.	(/u/Jarek86)	(V)
        100	You dream of floating in a strange, airless void, with a scintillating blue field of stars on one side and a great black void on the other. As you look around, the void begins to grow, enveloping the rest of the sky, and as the last lights wink out you feel your body start to be ripped apart.
    Rumors that can be quests
        The Giants were never killed in the giant war, they secretly retreated into their airship and escaped (they actually went up into the clouds like Jack and the beanstalk)
        The king's advisor is a disguised lizardfolk
        Lead helmets stop the government from hearing your thoughts (they also make you go crazy from lead poisoning)
        The public execution of an enemy kingdom's spy was faked with a body double. The real guy is hiding out pretending to be a peasant in one of the outlying towns.
        The birds are spies for the government (not robots though that's crazy)
        the beholder is rumored to have dreamt up the kingdom itself u/ceticbizarre
        The Primordials were never content with being resigned to their own planet, and the increasing amount of dragonborns (only there by sudden portals) points to the fact theyre trying to break back in u/ceticbizarre
        The heir to the throne is actually the son of the general, switched at birth with the true heir, who is living as a peasant, unaware of their lineage. u/20dollarpeanutbutter
        The rapid disappearance of many types of animals in the surrounding area is the work of a mad wizard, intent on fusing them together Frankenstein style. It’s only a matter of time until they will go after humans. u/inkwell13
        The government puts something in the city's water in order to surpress magical abilities in its citizens. u/sirtoshi
        The bandit raids on towns and villages are orchestrated by smithing guilds in order to increase demand in weapons and armor. u/sirtoshi
        The strange magical beasts and monsters in the area are actually what's left of sapient humanoids that were experimented upon by mad mages. u/sirtoshi
        The local artifact and curio shop is suspiciously cheap and easy to steal from to encourage the spread of demonicly corrupting artifacts. u/ZukosTeaShop
        A being with glowing red eyes has been seen in the woods many times over the past month. u/ZukosTeaShop
        The entire kingdom is actually being run by the sentient throne the king sits on u/gladiatorjustin
        The kingdom's elite are using the cargo Griffins to spread chemical trails across the sky. u/cumberdong
        The local Crime Lord is actually the king's daughter who is trying to make life generally difficult for her father who has promised her hand in marriage against her desire, and eventually she's planning on having him murdered in order to take over. She keeps her identity completely secret and lives a double life with the denizens of the underworld. u/gibecrake
        The real king was actually killed years ago by his corrupt advisors; he's been replaced by a doppelganger under the control of said advisors ever since. u/Double0Lego
        The Gods are a lie. They don't exist. They are really a powerful cabal of spellcasters who rule the world secretly u/hamlet_d
        Dragons aren't particularly long lived. They only appear so because they grow in power by killing others of their kind. That is why there are so few of them u/hamlet_d
        Dwarves are the actual builders of this world. They created everything literally from the ground up. Elves are actually "fallen dwarves" who live so much longer because they have cut themselves off from the earth and stone and no longer return to it when they die. u/hamlet_d
        Everyone knows there used to be a village there, it was on the trading route. But there is no village there anymore. Nor any sign that one used to be there! u/venom1991
        The attacks on the livestock are not actually from a direwolf as the king has proclaimed, but they are being used as sacrifices by an evil cult OR your typical lycnathropy trope. u/deathsythe
        Someone believes that the king was born abroad and isn't legitimate and wants witnesses or certificates of his birth.u/greatteachermichael
        Someone believes that Elven Pressleaf, the famous elven bard, didn’t actually die from too many nature shrooms, but retired and is in hiding.u/greatteachermichael
        Someone believes that teleportation magic is a hoax, and that people haven’t been to the The Lunar Castle, home of Lunadiel.u/greatteachermichael
        Carol O'Na, is believed to be the reincarnation of the horseman Pestilence. It seems everywhere she goes people get sick.u/greatteachermichael
        Karen Wokefeld once hired an abjuration wizard to protect their house during a small bandit raid. She is claiming his abjuration magic actually cursed her family, and would like him dead.u/greatteachermichael
        No one goes near the abandoned mansion at the edge of town because it’s haunted. But rumour is that’s just a ghost story to keep people away while something more sinister happens behind the walls...u/harshmillennium
        A local business man is intent on building a legacy of locally-owned farms. He employs only slaves. u/prothirteen
        The rise in sea-levels over the past few decades are not a result of the slowly increasing global temperature but rather an increase in gargantuan water-dwelling creatures, whose sheer collective volume is actually displacing the water, making it appear to have risen. u/Tupac_Presley
        A local drunk and part time stable-hand claims the recent spate of illness and deaths across the kingdom are the result of tiny invisible creatures attacking us from the inside, and not because the king slept with the wife of a powerful and vindictive mage. Nobody believes him, and his drinking habit grows by the day. His family are concerned and are considering staging an intervention. u/Tupac_Presley
        All the random natural events impeding construction of an outpost are being caused by a group of druids trying to stop the project. u/kinshwicky
        The king is hiring spies to spy on people who didnt pay lots of stuff
        A person wanted for u/ScaredSaltShaker the stuff of the kingdom is a little kid u/ScaredSaltShaker
        There was a shop that had over 40 people going there a week but it was replaced with one of the least selling shops today u/ScaredSaltShaker
        The kings king's assassination while he was in his coach was not by a rogue from the the storage tower of the wizards collegium, but was actually done by the kings own guard from a grassy hill on the route through the city. u/remirenegade
        The leaders of the 2 warring nations are in cahoots. The gain profit and influence by perpetuating the war. They have provided propaganda to be taught in schools, they put out flier propaganda on both sides, they use religion. u/cephiroth
        The kings throne is actually a mimic that has been enchanted to only allow those of the royal bloodline to sit on it. u/bwabbitv3s
        The Queen was never assassinated, it was actually the King. She has been using polymorph and potions to disguise herself as the King. u/bwabbitv3s
        The horses used by the guards are actually Kelpie that have been contracted to work for the Kingdom and are feed the prisoners that are 'executed'. u/bwabbitv3s
        The reason the Holts Farm never suffers from blights and pests is because they sacrifice an orphan to the creature that lives in their well. u/bwabbitv3s
        A rebel group is opposing the prominent church with the overwhelming evidence of their old god. u/brockett1
        When you use teleportation magic, it's not you being teleported. The real you dies, gets disintegrated, and then they make a clone of you in your place. u/INYH
        Changelings and Doppelgangers have infiltrated our society, they could be anyone at any time! u/INYH
        The King has been replaced with an illusion - The real king is being held prisoner in the dungeons. u/INYH
        The thieves guild is actually a secret branch of the government - When someone gets caught, they don't get prosecuted, they get retired from the public eye and repurposed. u/INYH
        Aarakocra aren't real. u/INYH
        Secret organizations proliferate anti-tiefling propaganda to keep them subjugated. u/INYH
        Orcs used to be intelligent, until government programs turned them into killing machines. u/INYH
        The church of <insert god here> is a front for the cult of <insert other entity here>. u/INYH
        Metallic dragons don't exist. Chromatic dragons paint themselves metallic to attract prey. u/INYH
        The "Common" language is a means of cultural suppression by humans for races who speak other languages - by unifying the races under the human tongue, they assured that they were at the center of trade. It didn't even used to be called common, that change was made in the year 733 for PR purposes. u/INYH
        There are alligators the size of whales in the city sewers. One recently destroyed an outhouse! u/stanggtwin
        The earth is hollow; beneath the Underdark, there is a beautiful and mysterious land of freshwater seas and mushroom forests with inverted gravity. u/stanggtwin
        Roundearthers are convinced that the world is not a disc and stories of sailors falling over the edge are merely government propaganda. u/flipviii
        The "Golden Age of Magic" that took place hundreds of years ago actually never took place. The world is much younger than history books show, and everything that happened before a certain point in time was a large-scale illusion placed upon everyone in the kingdom as a cover-up for something else that happened u/dantes-infernal
        A clan of changelings have secretly replaced significant individuals of power in order to steer the kingdom to its doom as revenge for something u/dantes-infernal
        The kingdom is surrounded by tall walls that hide everything beyond. No one is allowed out because of the Great War between nations. In reality, there is no Great War. Beyond the walls are unending stretches of desert, ocean, and destroyed land due to some catastrophic event that's hidden from the general populace. But the truth is somewhere out there u/dantes-infernal
        Low magic campaign: Powerful magic exists, but the knowledge is hidden in the hands of the powerful, while the general populace is told that magic inherently has a cap in strength u/dantes-infernal
        A current plague is actually spread by mages using "Sending" which is why the non-magic using commoners get ill u/womble-king
        According to some credible sources, health potions are made of pulverized gnomes. u/forsaken_earth
        The various planes of reality are all part of a giant turtle’s dream. If a sufficiently powerful wizard or sorcerer were to find a way, they could wake the turtle. u/forsaken_earth
        A bandit company that was vanquished/scatter years ago never really died, their members just integrated into society and they're enacting a covert, long-term mission to sow chaos in the kingdom. Rumor is, "My neighbor is a sleeper agent of the long-disbanded thieve's guild!" u/ergotofwhy
        If you go into the Giant's Beard Inn, Soggy Frog Inn, or Quail's Tavern and ask about Rohir Borgenaut, they kick you out. That name means nothing to anyone else in the city. Why? u/ergotofwhy
        Those slaves that the mercenaries sold to the citizenry a few months back are actually just zombies wearing rings of disguise self! People are paying money to bring zombies into their home! u/ergotofwhy
        I saw the court wizard flash a demonic handsign once, as he stood behind the Baron during an address to the people. Who was he trying to signal in the town? What does the signal mean? u/ergotofwhy
        A farmer tells the party that his neighbor was NOT, in fact, killed by orcs three years ago. Orcs go house to house, killing and plundering. My neighbor was violently killed in his own home, and nothing was stolen! no other houses hit! I suspect it was the farmer's guild, they've been squeezing us really hard. I thought they were supposed to help us?! u/ergotofwhy
        The humans in an elf-human city have invented a new device that the elves suspect was purposefully invented to hurt them: the printing press. Using this device, they began mass unlawful arrest of all elves caught in the human quarter, and are producing arrest records much faster than the elf council can keep up with - resulting in a great many innocent elves staying in jail unlawfully for days, weeks, and even months. u/ergotofwhy
        Farmer Randall made a huge fuss a week ago - claims he saw a green dragon eating his sheep. He demanded a retinue of guards come and do a detail. When the guards arrived the following dawn, farmer Randall denies ever making any such claim, and refuses the guards entry to his farm. A few days later, his wife "left town in the middle of the night" and no one has seen her since. What the hell is going on at farmer Randall's? u/ergotofwhy
        Many demons and other humanoid monsters are just people wearing suits u/carelessstruggle
    rumor mill
        have you heard that 
            The king.
            The queen.
            The local miller.
            The local blacksmith.
            A retired adventurer.
            A famous assassin.
            An influential guildmaster.
            The mayor.
            An up-and-coming young knight.
            The high priest of Bhaal.
            A powerful Drow Matron.
            A wicked wizard.
            The Knight-Lord of a local order of Paladins.
            Strahd von Zarovich.
            A militant emperor in the West.
            A dragon-tamer in the mountains.
            The local dragon.
            An Orc warlord.
            One of the party members.
            An ancient pharaoh.
            A popular gladiator.
            A teamster who is a local legend for reckless driving.
            The crown prince.
            A master alchemist.
            A high-ranking Hobgoblin commander.
            An elven sage.
            The duchess.
            The duke.
            The local priest.
            An eccentric inventor.
            The town lunatic.
            A notorious pirate captain.
            A travelling monk.
            A famous mystic.
            The housekeeper of a local hostel.
            A Viking king.
            The Great Chief of Ogres.
            A famous trap-maker.
            An influential politician.
            The town beggar.
            The Princess.
            A newly-appointed Lady Knight of the region.
            A newly-appointed Lord Knight of the region.
            The Caesar of Minotaurs.
            The local weaponsmith.
            The BBEG.
            The mysterious man with a long, silver beard and a ragged black cloak.
            The mysterious woman with long, silver hair and an old-fashioned scarlet cloak.
            The local tobacco merchant.
            The kingpin of a crime ring.
            The head of a Tarrasque-worshiping cult.
            A vicious Manticore baron.
            A highly sought-after tailor.
            A highly sough-after baker.
            A highly sought-after physician.
            Every gravedigger in the entire region.
            The king's two-year-old son.
            A kuo-toa diplomat.
            The Bloodlord of Vampires.
            A necromancer.
            The court magician.
            A boatman on the local river.
            A mason building the king's new palace.
            A great athlete.
            The head of a not-so-secret society.
            The local innkeeper.
            A zombie who was voted in as townmaster.
            An Elvish king.
            The Lord of a druidic circle.
            The new 8-year-old king.
            A famous painter.
            One of the PCs' mentor.
            A famous evangelist.
            A Gorgon beauty guru.
            The yuan-ti God-King.
            A powerful Unseelie Fey.
            A goblin warlord.
            The editor of a local newspaper.
            The game warden.
            The king's butler.
            A renowned golem-building wizard.
            A great General.
            A local veteran and war hero.
            A folk-music writer.
            The street-lamp lighter.
            The street sweeper.
            The chimney-sweep.
            The harsh boss of a local factory.
            A far-sailing explorer, back in town after an expedition.
            A local archaeologist.
            The Witchfinder General.
            The Protector Angel of the nearest large city.
            A powerful Seelie Fey.
            The Iron Emperor of Dwarves.
            The Erlking of a local band of monster-hunters.
            A fashion icon.
            The Grand Duke of the Society for the Preservation of Gnomish Vocabulistics and Grammar.
            A famous daredevil.
            The leader of a mostly harmless local cult.
            The leader of an extremely harmful local cult.

            Is disgusted by...
            Hates...
            Weeps tears of joy for...
            Breaks down laughing at the thought of...
            Is worryingly obsessed with...
            Spent all their money on...
            Has asked the Church to forbid...
            Has asked the Church to demand...
            Has formed a society based around...
            Has led an expedition to...
            Once enjoyed...
            Has recently picked up...
            Demands someone to explain to them what all the fuss is with...
            Has forbid the mere mention of...
            Commissioned several murals of...
            Sentenced convicts to....
            Named their new yacht....
            Disowned their child for the child's becoming addicted to...
            Is hopelessly addicted to...
            Has challenged any takers to a contest of...
            Has started a scandal by...
            Has completely ignored the issues of...
            Got drunk and admitted to...
            Firmly denies that they have ever...
            Is hosting a costume ball themed around...
            Suffers nightmares about...
            Wants advice on how to go about...
            Tossed someone out of a window for daring to malign...
            Hired bards to sing the praises of...
            Is trying to quit...
            Divorced their spouse to spend more time...
            Wandered into the desert with the intent of...
            Demanded that any honest man would never stoop to...
            Stole a carriage to go...
            Has paid people to stop...
            Has demanded, against ancient tradition, that they be allowed to...
            Carved a statue of themselves...
            Has never even tried...
            Is ignoring the obvious solution to their current problem, ....
            Gives up all hope for the world when they think about...
            Turns into a panda whenever they try...
            Has been cursed by a witch to ceaselessly wander through the forest, ...
            Loves their spouse, but more so, ...
            Used magic to make 100 people go...
            Got drunk and went...
            Spent all their inheritance on...
            Might start a war over...
            Tattooed themselves with scenes of...
            Ceaselessly talks about...
            Ran 40 miles so as not to be late for...
            Wears their finest clothes to...
            Believes in the Gods but more so in...
            Doesn't even understand...
            Pays good money for people to compete at ... for their amusement.
            Found an ancient urn, worth thousands, depicting...
            Insists that it is a genteel pursuit to...
            Is causing trouble for everyone by...
            Sees it as unseemly to...
            Frequently enjoys...
            Is enraged by...
            Is saddened by...
            Got sick while...
            Broke their foot while...
            Died while...
            Proposed to their true love whilst...
            Is terrified by the prospect of...
            Believes it is a grievous sin to...
            Nearly started a revolution while a nobleman was...
            Clapped a man in irons for trying to...
            Is only ever gladdened by...
            Fully intends to kill their rival, making it look like an accident that occurred while they were...
            Has changed their main pursuit to....
            Denies claims that they ever..., despite solid evidence.
            Has a long history in their family of...
            Was nearly assassinated while...
            Explodes with fury when others ask if they intend to...
            Is enchanted to slowly levitate into the sky should they ever try...
            Has ordered a local noble to stop...
            Is haunted by the ghosts of those who died such that they could...
            Has cured themselves of a terrible illness by simply...
            Arose from the grave when they heard their relatives were... instead of attending their funeral.
            Wrote long and vivid books on the subject of...
            Will not so much as get out of bed until they...
            Rises bright and early to...
            Trained several hawks for the purposes of...
            Breaks into song and dance randomly to distract people from their habit of...
            Says they would rather die than...
            Dreams of...
            Has no appetite on days when they haven't...
            Hired adventurers to...
            Hired a wizard to help them with...
            Built an entire facility dedicated to...
            Used slaves and prisoners for...
            Threw themselves into a lake after a long day of...
            Hosted a banquet in celebration of their successful quest of...
            Frequently boasts about how good they are at...
            Demands that nobody but themselves be allowed to...
            Prays to the gods for success in...
            Recommends that pregnant women try...
            irmly believes that .... is extremely classy and romantic.

            Hunting ogres.
            Digging pit traps.
            Minting gold pieces.
            Falling out of windows.
            Human sacrifice.
            Setting things on fire.
            Raiding small settlements.
            Eating pastries shaped like sacred icons.
            Swimming around in pools of oil.
            Riding horses.
            Painting pictures.
            Sabotaging other people's carriages.
            Hurling radishes at beggars.
            Stepping on people's toes.
            Doing nothing.
            Shutting up.
            Feeling confident.
            Running over small and fluffy animals.
            Tipping over Dominoes.
            Going on shopping sprees.
            Punching sacks of potatoes.
            Building elaborate but useless siege engines.
            Having rap-battles with pixies.
            Doing the conga.
            Convincing other people to do the conga.
            Building extremely comfortable couches.
            Building up an immunity to every kind of poison they can find.
            Studying vaccination.
            Learning how to fly.
            Burying dead bodies.
            Juggling swords.
            Juggling.
            Being a clown.
            Buying elaborate tricorn hats.
            Ringing people's doorbells and running away.
            Writing terrible books.
            Reading scandalous magazines.
            Praising themselves.
            Cow-tipping.
            Throwing china plates across rooms.
            Plating things with solid gold.
            Getting involved in tangled love-triangles.
            Awarding themselves trophies for things they never did.
            Giving long and elaborate speeches.
            Getting drunk.
            Getting high.
            Throwing knives at pictures of their enemies.
            Mixing fake blood in excessive quantities.
            Fighting Treants.
            Inventing new kinds of forks.
            Grave robbing.
            Burning down mansions.
            Writing speeches full of innuendos for pastors.
            Recycling old furniture.
            Playing war-games.
            Playing card games.
            Playing dice games.
            Making loaded dice.
            Starting bar fights.
            Making theatrical declarations of war against nonexistent countries.
            Completely ignoring real-world geography.
            Crashing the economy.
            Hurling cinder-blocks at passerby.
            Teaching Trolls calligraphy.
            Insulting Dragons.
            Writing dramatic Last Wills for themselves regarding fictitious deaths.
            Murdering people to start a murder-investigation romantic drama.
            Brooding on rooftops.
            Doing tuck-and-rolls into wedding ceremonies.
            Hiding treasures in local dungeons.
            Doing the Charleston at funerals.
            Starting moshpits at children's cello recitals.
            Headbanging to the church choir.
            Rolling themselves down hills.
            Giving excessive amounts of charity.
            Joining every secret society they can find.
            Doing somersaults when excited.
            Shooting people with crossbows.
            Designing a new national flag for their country every day, and sending it to the nobility for approval.
            Taming Mimics.
            Hitting people over the head with bar stools.
            Wearing cool cloaks.
            Spontaneously combusting.
            Drag-racing in carriages.
            Trying to ride Displacer Beasts.
            Trying to ride Owlbears.
            Jumping out at people from behind corners and shouting "Boo!"
            Rigging old castles to explode.
            Making silly faces at high-ranking clergy.
            Smoking far too many cigarettes than is advisable.
            Writing fake magazine articles describing wars between closely allied countries.
            Deep-frying books.
            Writing dictionaries of all 89 dialects of Abyssal.
            Pulling pranks.
            Breeding new horses.
            Conducting unethical scientific experiments.
            Building exact replicas of small villages, then demanding that all the villagers from that village move to the replica.
            Giving themselves ludicrous new titles.
            Carrying far too many canes.
            Carrying out exorcisms.

        but then again ... i heard that from 
            The local newspaper.
            The village idiot.
            The gods themselves.
            A giant demon.
            A local magistrate.
            The police chief.
            A drunk in a bar.
            An eerily sober man in a bar.
            The local miser.
            My grandmother's ghost.
            An insane prophet.
            A mercenary captain.
            A mermaid.
            A man who turned out to be a Doppleganger.
            Three gnomes in a trench coat.
            Two halflings in a trench coat.
            Eighty-six pixies in a trench coat.
            An animated, sentient trench coat.
            A Beholder.
            A man cursed to only speak the truth.
            A local jester.
            A mafia hitman.
            A goblin who was on fire.
            A Cloud Giant.
            A group of Azers.
            A man who fell through the roof.
            A Viking warrior.
            A man who rolled through like tumbleweed.
            A Mind Flayer.
            Mordenkainen himself.
            Volo himself.
            A bounty hunter.
            An old soldier.
            An old policeman.
            A former army commander.
            A crusader.
            An occultist.
            A grave robber.
            A mailman.
            An animated reflection of myself in a mirror.
            A man who wore two dark cloaks.
            A one-legged, one-armed, one-eyed man.
            A werewolf.
            A stone golem.
            A tap-dancer.
            A saxophone player.
            The high priest of Kelemvor.
            An entire travelling circus.
            The town crier.
            A retired pirate.
            A retired bandit.
            A slightly insane author.
            A salty old sailor.
            A great-grandmother from a large local clan.
            The greatest clown in the world.
            A suit of Animated Armor that had trapped a man inside it.
            A man selling salt.
            A trickster spirit.
            An imp.
            A regiment of Hobgoblins.
            A tribe of Orcs.
            An Ettin, who also said it wasn't true.
            A Wraith.
            A lich lord.
            A lost traveler.
            The mayor's niece.
            A fisherman.
            A silent and mysterious stranger who recently moved into town.
            A professional spy.
            A stockbroker.
            A tabaxi minstrel.
            A Goliath monk.
            A band of singing Dwarves who sung it to me.
            An Elvish comedian.
            A halfling with a mohawk.
            My evil twin.
            A lost Planeswalker.
            A slightly evil magician.
            A poison dealer.
            A Mob legbreaker.
            Someone covered head to toe in scarves and coats.
            My spouse.
            My son.
            A Tortle with a purple-painted shell.
            Three knights, one in white armor, one in black, one in grey.
            A Kobold with a violent temper who screamed at me about it.
            A dragonborn who was looking for their parents.
            A beautiful forest nymph.
            An old woman who turned out to be a Hag.
            An old man who turned out to be a Vampire.
            A man who refused to stop doing jumping jacks.
            A young woman who started a dance party after telling me.
            A skeleton.
            A morbid man with tired-looking eyes and rumpled suit.
            A talking parrot.
            A wandering preacher.
            A young half-elf who was on a pilgrimage.
            A knight in golden armor.
            Gary Gygax.
            A talking cat.

NPC stuff
    Questgiver motives
        Bullion, precious metals, filthy lucre. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Blackmail material over powerful colleagues. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Horses, or more exotic animals (hippogryphs, gryphons, pegasi, etc.) [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Impressive real estate. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Paintings, or other exceptional works of fixed art. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Drugs. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Adulation of the masses. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        The fear of everyone around them. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        The best music, shared with the world or just for them, and at their own whim. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        The rarest foods, cooked by the best chefs, for the most exquisite and rare experiences. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Obtain protective magic items, so that they can never be hurt. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        The complete destruction of anyone who opposes them. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        The elimination of a particular family or dynastic house. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Mastery of a particular skill (1d6): 1. swordsmanship; 2. military leadership; 3. horsemanship; 4. sailing; 5. painting; 6. music [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Raising their home city/nation up above all others in the world. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        The supremecy of their own religion or ideology. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        The elimination of a particular religion or ideology. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        The elimination or subjugation of a particular nation. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Eternal life for self. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Complete control of everyone around them. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        The elimination of threats to their species. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Ensure collective dominance of their offspring. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Ensure dominance of their designated heir. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Discover the secrets of an ancient or alien race. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Emancipate an oppressed group within society. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Bring world peace through the sword. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Bring world peace through financial interdependence. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Bring world peace through the elimination of poverty. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Bring world peace through complete mind-control of everyone. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Bring world peace through continuous inspiration of greatness. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Eradicate a disease. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Completely prevent fiends from being able to enter the world. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Completely prevent the use magic. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Destroy all undead. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Bring world peace through economic dominance. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Establish a colony for their species on another world. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Prevent anyone from coming to or leaving this world. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Reset all life on this world, to be created in the patron's idea of what a perfect world would be. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Eliminate all life not subservient to patron. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Destroy the world. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Destroy half of all life in the world. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Eliminate an idea from the world. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Destroy all fae creatures in the world. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Kill all the gods. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Kill particular gods. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        End death. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        End all laws of man (or elf, or dwarf, etc.) [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Kill all who break the laws of man (or elf, or dwarf, etc.) [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        End war by making it impossible for people to move in groups of more than 1d6x10 [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Prevent children from being born for any intelligent species. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Prevent children from being born for a particlar species. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Prevent a particular species from being able to use magic. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Eliminate from society those who do not contribute value. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Education the masses on good taste in (1d6): 1. Poetry; 2. Fashionable clothing; 3. Music; 4. Needlepoint; 5. Calligraphy; 6. Floral arrangement [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Educate the masses in the proper maintenance of personal health through (1d6): 1. A particular diet (e.g. veganism, keto); 2. A method of meditation; 3. A particular method of bodily hygiene; 4. A particular form of calisthenics or martial arts (e.g. Tai Chi, Tae Bo); 5. A particular beverage (e.g. coffee, naval, or low fat soy lattes); 6. A particular kind of clothing (e.g. a certain kind of undergarment, or a certain kind of headware). [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Educate the masses in the proper means of enlightenment and divination through (1d6): 1. Astrology; 2. Numerology & Arithmancy; 3. Bibliomancy; 4. Cartomancy; 5. Pyromancy; 6. Hydromancy [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Ensuring the most rapid possible increase of the patron's own species. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Infecting everyone with a particular disease. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Infecting the chosen with a particular disease. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Gaining the attention of a particular deity or outsider. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Merging two species together. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Merging two cultures together. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Liberating a subculture or ethnic group from a greater political body. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Constructing a monument to the patron's own life, in the form of an extravagant mausoleum. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Experiencing life in every conceivable way (e.g. as a biped/quadruped/invertebrate/etc., all genders, aquatic/avian/amphibious/etc) [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        End the lives of all over a certain age. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Gain the romantic love of a particular creature. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Outdo someone else, and make sure they realize it. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Prevent a particular catastrophe from ever happening (again). [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Destroy all those who have committed a particular crime. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Destroy all those who have committed a particular crime, and not served punishment for it. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Avoid their own doom or fate. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Change a law. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Ensure the obedience and proper behavior of those below a certain age. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Ensure the obedience and proper behavior of those below a certain station. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Gain the filllial love of a particular creature. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Gain the parental approval of a particular creature. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        To fit into a particular group. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        To achieve enlightenment. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        To achieve physical perfection. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        To fulfill the patron's destiny. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        To fulfill the patron's species' destiny. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        To recover an empire. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        To bring about the battle of the gods. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        To never feel powerless again. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        The protection and empowerment of the patron's own family, at any cost. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Secretly playing threats off against each other, just because the patron can. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Demonstrating the patron's own superior intelligence. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Becoming able to cure any disease, wound, curse, or other affliction. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Subjugating the most powerful entities, because anything else is too boring. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Desperate to overcome a threat against them. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Desperate to find their loved ones, or their remains. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Pushing society past stuffy conservatism to embrace beliefs previously rejected. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Stopping society from discarding trusted traditional values to embrace twisted beliefs. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Travelling to somewhere no other member of the patron's species has ever been. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Find a way to commit violence as desired without reprecussion. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Expel all those who would harm others. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        Cause the patron's society to surpass all other societies in this world. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        To harness the power of gods for the use of mortals. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
        To prevent any mortals from ever again being subjugated by others. [/u/EmpedoclesTheWizard]
    fey questions
        What is the sound of a shadow? /u/WitchDearbhail
        Why is a weather vane so indecisive? /u/WitchDearbhail
        How is the moon like a mug of ale? /u/WitchDearbhail
        What is myname? (not a typo, just watch as others argue whether or not you're asking for the NPC's name or what a "Myname" is.) /u/WitchDearbhail
        When a Druid shapchanges, where do his clothes go? /u/Torger083
        How is it that grass grows but rocks don’t? /u/viceVersailes
        What is your significance in the realm of why? /u/Ajaxl
        Why does a Lark sound so fluidly? /u/Ajaxl
        If buttons hold your clothes what holds the buttons? /u/Ajaxl
        Why must your shirt be so cantankerous? /u/Ajaxl
        Why is a quill so like a musician's lyre? /u/Ajaxl
        How does a staff whistle so beautifully? /u/Ajaxl
        What if a giant steps down? Are they still a giant? /u/Ajaxl
        If you walk backwards, does your shadow follow you or do you follow the shadow? /u/Ajaxl
        Are trees blind? /u/Ajaxl
        Why does a Brook babble? Does it have no shame? /u/Ajaxl
        Do you like my hat? It has its own socks. /u/Ajaxl
        Would you like to swing on a star? /u/MaxSizeIs
        Are you, or aren't you? If you are, then you certainly can't, and if you aren't then why won't you? /u/MaxSizeIs
        Where is the line between time and space? /u/GuySingingMrBlueSky
        Are two layers of chips with melted cheese in between a sandwich? /u/GuySingingMrBlueSky
        Who TRULY let the dogs out? /u/GuySingingMrBlueSky
        Is this violence in our nature simply the image of our maker? /u/GuySingingMrBlueSky
        Could you use necromancy on a book? It is, after all, a collection of dead trees. /u/GuySingingMrBlueSky
        What purpose do dots serve in written language? /u/GuySingingMrBlueSky
        How do you know your god’s the right one to follow? /u/GuySingingMrBlueSky
        Is the world more like a puppet on a string or a dog on a leash? /u/GuySingingMrBlueSky
        Who shaves the barber? /u/GuySingingMrBlueSky
        What about violence is cyclical? /u/GuySingingMrBlueSky
        What if those who are raving mad are in the right? /u/GuySingingMrBlueSky
        Are means justified by ends? /u/GuySingingMrBlueSky
        What purpose do games serve? /u/GuySingingMrBlueSky
        Is a good story a good way to pick a ruler? /u/GuySingingMrBlueSky
        What is worse, evil or chaos? /u/GuySingingMrBlueSky
        Are we alone right now? /u/GuySingingMrBlueSky
        Why did the basilisk cross the road? /u/BingBongDonkeyKong
        If a treant falls in the forest, and no one is there to hear it, will it call out for help, or will it hope that nobody saw? /u/BingBongDonkeyKong
        How many licks does it take to get to the center of a sugar golem's chest cavity? /u/BingBongDonkeyKong
        Why is it that everytime my dog looks at me he seems to have some sort of question in mind, but then he turns around and starts licking his butt? /u/BingBongDonkeyKong
        Who's making clothes for all those giants? Is there a giant tailor around here somewhere? Or is there like, one giant Mom making everybody's clothes? I don't get it. /u/BingBongDonkeyKong
        Is it true you can tell how old rich people are by cutting them in half and counting their rings? /u/BingBongDonkeyKong
        Why do leprechauns keep their money in a pot? Why can't they just keep it in a purse, like everybody else? What happens if they go to the store and they forgot where their pot's is? Do they steal crap from the store? That seems a little excessive. /u/BingBongDonkeyKong
        Have you ever danced with the devil in the pale moonlight? Me neither. That guy's a douche. /u/BingBongDonkeyKong
        Why is that dude over there staring at us? /u/BingBongDonkeyKong
        What makes you think I won't cut you? /u/BingBongDonkeyKong
        Why don't the mountains crack under the weight of the sky? /u/FreeTheGluten
        What's harder: watching your weight, or waiting for your watch? /u/bxtros/
        Do Modrons dream of mechanical sheep? /u/bxtros/
        Haven't you heard? (any response warrants an enthused answer) /u/bxtros/
        If a bear shits in the woods and no one is around does it make a sound? /u/shace616/
        If you punch yourself and it hurts, does that make you strong or weak? /u/Aturom/
        Can God make a rock so massive that God himself cannot move it? /u/PutridMeatPuppet/
        Do you see what I see? /u/PutridMeatPuppet/
        What do I have in my pocket? /u/PutridMeatPuppet/
        How many times do you have to tell a lie before it becomes the truth? /u/PutridMeatPuppet/
        If you can cross the boundaries of one plane of existence into another, how can those planes be truly infinite? How can something that has boundaries be infinite? /u/PutridMeatPuppet/
        Which came first: the chicken or the egg? /u/felagund/
        Why do they say a river runs through the land when it's always there? /u/raykendo/
        Does my reflection see me in the mirror? /u/raykendo/
        Why do cats always land on their feet while bread always lands on its butter? /u/raykendo/
        If you butter a cat's back and drop it, will it land on its feet, or on its butter? /u/raykendo/
        How do you take your ale? One lump or two? /u/raykendo/
        Have you thought you met me yet? /u/afourthfool/
        Trees are wood but can they? /u/bigew/
        A cow will moo but to who? /u/bigew/
        If a fire is in its place but it isn't a fire place is the fire in its place or does the place have a fire? /u/bigew/
        A candle burnt at both ends, which side falls first? /u/bigew/
        If you are routed on your route do you get there faster? /u/bigew/
        Why can a trap be sprung and a spring be set while a trap can be set but a spring can't sprung? /u/bigew/
        Can a fish drink you under the table? /u/bigew/
        How can the butterfly, yet the lard cannot? /u/Tehwipez/
        Did you choose where the moon would be in the sky when you were born? /u/Zythryl/
        How is a raven like a writing desk? /u/Moon_Dew/
        One eye sees a sight a second eye can also see, but the second sees the sight as second truth. One sight the same, but living separate lives. Which eye knows best? If either knows at all. /u/TheMightyFishBus/
        Can I choke you to death? /u/Speterius/
        Do you know the difference between choking and strangulation? /u/Moon_Dew/
        Why do humans have so many gods? /u/si-man/
        Why is a chicken? /u/vmos/
        How many beans make five? /u/vmos/
        How soon is now? /u/vmos/
        Which way is morning? /u/TheTouchStoner/
        You're alive, you change, you're dead- who are you next, may I be your ghost while you are gone? /u/TheTouchStoner/
        If you hadn't never ever but you could, would you and why? /u/TheTouchStoner/
        When you toss the coin, does the coin not toss back? /u/TheTouchStoner/
        Which maker does the mark serve, when all change is off the counter? /u/TheTouchStoner/
        The whole point of the apple is the seeds- why must you spit split and discard those of The Core? /u/TheTouchStoner/
        Plant me a seed that I may saw the tree, wood you? /u/TheTouchStoner/
        North's exclusive set from sister South, yet one man's east is another man's west- to who does your compass point? /u/TheTouchStoner/
        What's updog? /u/CountOfMonkeyCrisco/
        Is a hotdog a sandwich or a taco? /u/CountOfMonkeyCrisco/
        Is water wet? /u/Dronizian/
        Can I have your name? /u/LordSwinton/
        How do you plan on getting here? /u/calrinet
        What is is? /u/ElZoof/
        Who watches the watchmen watching the watchers watched by the watchers watching the watchmen? And where are the watchwomen? /u/ElZoof/
        Where is nowhere? /u/ElZoof/
        When will then be now? /u/ElZoof/
        Why? Why? Why? Why? Why? Why? Why? Why? Why? Why? Why? Why? Why? /u/ElZoof/
        If the planes are infinite, and the Gods are all-powerful, would you like a toasted tea-cake? /u/ElZoof/
        What is the last question? /u/ElZoof/
    more quirks
        1	Mind of a child. This NPC has the mind of a child.
        2	Smells like dog shit. This NPC doesn’t wash very often or just has some unfortunate pheromones that cause his skin to excrete a smell that is unmistakingly similar to the smell of dog shit.
        3	Nail biter. This NPC is biting his nails almost all the time. His/Her nails are very short as a result and his/her fingers bleed every now and then.
        4	Eye twitch. This NPC has a nervous eye twitch. Roll a d6/2 to determine if it’s the 1: Left eye 2: Right eye or 3: Both.
        5	Wig wearer. This NPCs hair is fake. Flip a coin to determine whether or not the wig is of good quality. Heads means it’s clearly a fake wig, tails means it’s actually very natural looking.
        6	Ring fondler. This NPC turns his ring around a lot.
        7	Loud thinker. This NPC thinks out loud most of the time. Intimate thoughts are usually still silent, but every now and then a private thought might creep through.
        8	Multi-names. This NPC seems to give a different name each time when asked. Maybe he/she doesn’t even know his/her own true name.
        9	Parrot pal. This NPC has a parrot on his shoulder. The parrot repeats lots of the NPCs sentences, like any good parrot would do.
        10	Mute. Pretty self-explanatory. Communicates with notes, a chalkboard, or sign language.
        11	Someone’s witness. This NPC always tries to convince others of the greatness of his/her God during silent moments in normal conversation. Roll on a God table or pick one yourself.
        12	Finger tapper. Always taps his/her fingers in rhythmic fashion on the counter table or anything that he/she can lay his/her tap-dancing hands on.
        13	Itchy and scratchy. This NPC itches all over his/her body and can hardly control him/herself in scratching all the time.
        14	Brandy addict. This NPC is always looking for a bottle of his/her favorite rare brandy, but settles for the cheap kind too.
        15	Dirt dweller. This NPC is usually covered in a thin layer of dirt. Even if he/she spends his/her days inside the house, dirt always finds this person.
        16	Pants on fire. This NPC lies all the time, even though it’s pretty clear they are lies and even if the PCs point out the NPC is telling lies, he/she just keeps on lying.
        17	Kinky past. This NPC has a bite wound on his/her cheek that looks suspiciously like the bite of a human.
        18	Lisper. Fif NPV talkf wif a very obviouf lifp.
        19	Toothless. This NPC has no teeth at all, no matter what age he/she is.
        20	Milkstache. This NPC has a clear fondness for milk, visible by the almost permanent milkstache on his/her upper lips.
        21	Spit sniper. This NPC likes to spit. A lot. He/she finds or makes targets around him/her and spits on them all day long.
        22	Pregnant or pretending. This NPC is pregnant. If it’s a male, it’s pretending to be pregnant, no matter how silly it looks or sounds.
        23	Pockmarks. This NPC has his/her face covered in the permanent impression that the pocks left.
        24	Giggler. This NPC keeps giggling uncontrollably. Whether it’s the result of a magical experiment or it’s just because of hormones, that’s up to you.
        25	Scarface. This NPC has a giant scar across the left side of his/her face. As a result, he/she is blind in one eye.
        26	Deaf. This NPC is deaf. Need I say more? Flip a coin to decide if the NPC can read lips or not.
        27	Big Ear. This NPC has really large ears.
        28	Clumsy. This NPC is particularly clumsy. He/she drops things all the time and trips a lot.
        29	Ballscratcher. This NPC scratches his balls. If it’s a female, she scratches her lady parts.
        30	Finger sniffer. This NPC sniffs his/her own fingers a lot. For no apparent reason whatsoever.
        31	Neurotic Do-over. This NPC does everything twice. This includes talking, opening doors, handing over objects, etc.
        32	Fantasy has Acne too! This NPC has acne. Yes, acne. It’s not just our problem, fantasy worlds have Clearasil potions too!
        33	I can’t stop talking! This NPC can talk for hours on end. Usually telling the same thing over and over again, this NPC has trouble seeing whether or not their listeners are interested at all.
        34	Nose off. This NPC has lost his nose. Maybe in a fight, maybe because of a spell-gone-wrong, maybe because of frostbite, or maybe because of something totally different.
        35	Pants down. This NPC has sagging pants. He/she doesn’t wear a belt and keeps pulling up his/her pants.
        36	Armpit eater. This NPC often sniffs his armpits, then proceeds to pick something out of it and eat it.
        37	Toe nibbler. This NPC nibbles his/her toes whenever the opportunity arises.
        38	Heavy smoker. This NPC talks with a very sore and raspy throat.
        39	Breaks everything. This NPC breaks everything he/she touches.
        40	Shoes switched. This NPC always puts his/her shoes on the wrong feet.
        41	Word pukes. This NPC always pukes when he/she says a certain word, like cow, or house. This is the result of a curse. Try to pick a word that your party actually uses.
        42	Looks like an Orc. Unless this NPC actually is an Orc, then it looks like a dwarf.
        43	Drunk as f*ck. I think this quirk needs no further explanation.
        44	Fake beard. This NPC wears a fake beard. Bonus points if it’s a dwarf who can’t grow a beard himself.
        45	Curser. This NPC curses all the damn time.
        46	Amnesiac. This NPC has a terrible short term memory. He/she keeps forgetting everything that he/she has heard, said, seen or… wait… what was I talking about again?
        47	Flirter. This NPC flirts quite openly and overtly with anyone from the sex they're attracted to.
        48	Small accident. This NPC misses a finger on his/her good hand.
        49	Beautiful. This NPC is incredibly beautiful, and the party will need to do a DC 10 charisma save to not be completely flustered by this NPCs beauty.
        50	Ugly. The opposite of number 49. The party needs to do a constitution saving throw of DC 10, or they’ll puke.
        51	Magically scarred. This NPC has a strange face. One eye is a lot bigger than the other, and his/her mouth is above his/her nose. This seems to be the effect of a magical accident.
        52	Carrot Crazy. This NPC really, really loves carrots. He/She is constantly gnawing on a carrot, and carries a whole bag of them with him/her.
        53	Cross-eyed. This NPC is cross eyed. Seems pretty self-explanatory to me.
        54	Peg-leg. This NPC has one wooden leg, just like the classic pirate captains used to have.
        55	Missing eyebrows. This NPC has no eyebrows. It’s really difficult to see what kind of expression he or she is making, therefore players have disadvantage on wisdom (Insight) checks concerning this NPC.
        56	Musical Madness. This NPC likes to sing his/her way through life. Everybody kind of hates it, but the high notes hang around like flies when this NPC is singing (which he/she does instead of talking).
        57	Scared of Little People. This NPC somehow is extremely scared of halflings, gnomes and dwarves. He/She could very well be one of those races him/herself, but they’ll only hang around with larger people. Why this NPC feels this way, I’m not sure. Maybe you know?
        58	Joker of the Town. This NPC thinks he/she is the funniest of the town/city. He/She always makes the most terrible jokes and always ends them with: “Haha, I’m joking of course.”
        59	I wanted to be a ballerina. This NPC dislikes whatever occupation it has now. He/She always wanted to be a dancer but never had the chance. He/She is actually pretty good at will dance during conversations with the party if possible.
        60	Ni! This NPC can’t stand the word ‘it’. Whenever he or she hears it, he/she covers their ears and screams “Ni!”
        61	Seemingly Disturbed. This NPC looks very disturbed. He/She shakes all the time, constantly watches his/her surroundings and jumps in the air in fright from every little noise.
        62	Apocalypse Now. This NPC is constantly talking about the end of the world, which, according to him/her, is just around the corner. Hide yo wife, hide yo kids!
        63	Slow Speaker. This NPC speaks at least twice as slowly as normal people do. All the while seemingly oblivious to the annoyance it raises in others.
        64	Natural Born Trader. This NPC tries to sell you everything it can. “See this chair? It’s yours for just two gold pieces! See this flower? Yours for a piece of silver, it’s really rare! See my wife/husband? It’s yours for…”
        65	Not a care in the world. This NPC is unbelievably happy. They only see the good in life and are extremely positive.
        66	Higher than thou. This NPC feels like the fucking king/queen of the country. They talk down to almost everyone and use a (what they think is) a royal way of speaking.
        67	Just Married. This NPC just got married and can’t stop talking about their wife/husband.
        68	Peeyou. This NPC dislikes words that start with the letter P. Each time this NPC hears a word that does indeed start with a P, he/she cringes in disgust.
        69	What’s this for? This NPC doesn’t use his left arm. He/She just leaves it hanging, doing nothing. There’s nothing wrong with the arm, the NPC just doesn’t use it at all. For nothing.
        70	Classic Tammy. This NPC has underwear visible above his or her pants. It’s not that his/her pants are really low, but his/her underwear is just really high. Roll a d4 to determine the state of the underwear, 1: Clean, nothing special, 2: Dirty and torn, 3: Obviously way too tight, 4: Very sexy.
        71	First off: nonsense. This NPC starts every new sentence with one of the following d6 random words (or one you come up with yourself of course); 1: Dangerzone, 2: Beelzebub, 3: Calipers, 4: Possessed, 5: Desire, 6: Synergy.
        72	Genderswap. This NPC likes to cross dress. Everytime the party leaves and sees this NPC again, they switched clothing and makeup to the other gender.
        73	Weirdest Mutton Chops Ever. This NPC, whether it’s a he or a she doesn’t matter, has the weirdest mutton chops anyone has ever seen. They are a different color than the rest of his/her hair and they are somehow intricately braided.
        74	Final Countdown. This NPC counts down after each conversation. The NPC has a conversation with the party, and when they or the NPC leave, the NPC utters: 73. When the party then asks: “What was that?” The NPC will claim to not know what they are talking about, then leaves again saying: 72. Good luck roleplaying this one.
        75	Grumpy face. This NPC has a face that says: “I hate everything. I hate hating everything.” Basically, his or her face looks incredibly pissed off all the time, even though he or she might be very happy.
        76	Poker face. This NPC has a poker face. It’s nearly impossible to discern any emotions, all insight checks on this NPC need to be made with disadvantage.
        77	To be or not to be. This NPC is desperately trying to become an actor/actress. He/She is not very good at it though. In normal conversations this NPC sounds like he or she is talking on stage, it sounds very fake and extremely articulated.
        78	Lip Licker. This NPC licks his lips, a lot. I mean really, this NPC licks his or her lips constantly. It’s extremely unsettling.
        79	Shaving Sucks. This NPC is very bad at shaving. If it’s a man, he has a lot of small cuts on his face. With a successful DC8 perception or insight check it’s pretty clear that they are the result of terrible shaving. If the NPC is a woman, it is almost the same, but instead the cuts are located on her legs (Yes, even in D&D some women shave their legs. Trust me!).
        80	Wild Accuser. This NPC accuses everyone he talks to of minor crimes, like littering, or making too much noise.
        81	Am I hearing this right? This NPC mishears almost everything. He/She thinks he/she heard everything right, and continues the conversation on whatever subject he/she thinks he/she heard. For example: “Can you tell us where the Inn is?” The NPC hears: “Can you tell us where Theon is?” And responds with: “I have no idea who that is, I’m sorry!” If you still want the NPC to be helpful, make him/her understand every sentence correctly when he/she hears them a second time.
        82	Puppet Pal. This NPC always has a wooden puppet with him/her. Whatever his relationship with this puppet is, is up to you as a DM. Good luck!
        83	Bless you! This NPC has a permanent cold. Always a runny nose and sneezing all the time.
        84	Broken down. This NPC has a broken limb. Roll a d4 to decide which: 1: Their good arm, 2: Their other arm, 3: One leg, 4: Both legs and their good arm.
        85	Permanent Ink. This NPC has a large tattoo of an animal’s head on their neck. If you can’t think of an animal yourself then it’s a chicken’s head.
        86	Loading, please wait. This NPC needs some time processing conversations. Whenever you talk to him/her, it takes them 1d6 + 5 full seconds to respond. Even if it’s a short and simple question.
        87	Whispering guide. This NPC has a small creature hidden in their hair that whispers advice and insight into their ear. The creature is a Sprite, which has the ability to turn invisible and sense if anyone is lying by touching them.
        88	My brother, there art thou! This NPC is convinced that one of the party members is their long lost brother or sister. He or she will not be easily convinced of the contrary.
        89	Shapeshifter. This NPC is actually a doppler. The players might notice subtle changes in the NPC’s physical attributes each subsequent visit, like a smaller nose, another eye colour or an extra feet in height.
        90	Lilac and Gooseberries. This NPC smells like lilac and gooseberries, a particular smell that might be familiar to some of the players.
        91	Mouthful. This NPC always has something in his/her mouth. It could be food… but they never swallow. And it's too big to be chewing gum. It makes this NPC very hard to understand.
        92	The Narrator. This NPC always speaks about him or herself in the third person, and he or she narrates everything that happens in their vicinity.
        93	Narcissist. This NPC is always holding a mirror, looking at him or herself while blowing kisses and winking. It looks away now and then to look at the party but he or she mostly looks at themselves.
        94	Needlessly Shifty. This NPC comes across as very shifty. He or she laughs sneakily after answering questions or making deals, like he or she is hiding something. But they aren't, it's just a weird mannerism they were born with.
        95	Fungal infection. This NPC has a small growth of blue green fungus on one of their cheeks. Under close scrutiny the fungus almost seems to pulsate with every heartbeat.
        96	Squinter. This NPC squints their eyes at the party. It looks like he/she needs a pair of glasses.
        97	Mad hatter. This NPC wears a really long, really silly pointy hat. It's over 3 feet (1 meter) tall, made up of different kinds of materials and colors. Possible explanation for why the NPC is wearing it: 1. Their kid made it for them and now they are pretty much obligated to wear it. 2. They made it themselves because they believe it will make them a really powerful wizard. 3. It is a cursed hat that can't be removed and someone put it on their head while they were sleeping.
        98	Sketch artist. This NPC is scribbling on a piece of paper while he or she is talking to the party. After a while they proudly show the sketch they made of one of the party members. Roll 1d6/2 to see how good this NPC is. 1: Very, very bad. 2: Extremely average. 3: Very, very good.
        99	Want a cookie? This NPC bakes their own cookies and offers to anyone and everyone to try. Roll 1d6/2 to determine the quality. 1: Terrible, bitter and is that a hair? 2: Average, OK cookies. 3: These are amazing, crunchy, sweet and something you can't quite put your finger on but it's awesome.
        100	Juggler. This NPC is an excellent juggler and will juggle everytime he or she has two or more items in his or her hands. Their limit is 1d6 + 3 items at once.
    backstories quirks/ motives
        Was exiled by their brother the king
        Petrified to stone for over 200 years
        The last of his ancient bloodline
        Always takes first watch
        Keeps a blacklist of people to kill
        Became an adventurer because they lost a bet
        Aims to learn every language in the land
        Is wanted for a reward
        Wants to clear his name
        Drunkenly swore a blood oath and forgot what for
        Insists they are the reincarnation of a legendary warrior
        Doesn’t understand sarcasm
        Believes trees can speak to them and them alone
        Seeks to end an family feud
        Hates being made to wait
        Carries a charmed locket that they can't open
        Always cuts to the chase
        Can’t tell a lie, no matter the cost
        Is searching for the knowledge of true immortality
        Framed for the murder of a famous and well-loved innkeeper
        Beaten and imprisoned for their religious beliefs
        Keeps getting mistaken for a famous knight
        Already made and lost a fortune
        Has deserted from the army
        Is trying to avoid a prophecy
        Secretly became an adventurer to impress a love interest
        Hates riding horses
        Always gives the good/bad news first
        Has cheated death more times than they deserved
        Raised as a hostage by their father's enemies
        Is running from a marriage arranged by their parents
        Can understand common, but only speaks (language)
        Has a huge debt to pay back
        Has no other family but the party
        Never returned anything they borrowed
        Ran afoul of the goblin mob
        Seems to know everyone
        Once served as a court jester
        Has been exiled twice under different names
        Is the twin of the local monarch
        Is really (I mean really) afraid of the dark
        Trying to build a network of shady connections
        Woke up in a bar with no memory and a sealed letter
        Always keeps his promises
        Worries some of their memories have been tampered with
        Is terrified of rats
        Suffers from claustrophobia
        Is trapped in a faustian bargain
        Ran away from home at the age of eleven
        Always wakes up on the right side of the bed
        Is afraid of sharp edges
        Has gotten away with murder
        Was a weapons instructor for the city militia
        Loves to haggle
        Often will offer a bribe over other persuasion tactics
        Was expelled from the royal guards
        Makes all minor decisions by flipping a coin
        Is a former bare knuckle boxer
        Always needs to be the centre of attention
        Has an outstanding warrant for their arrest
        Never takes their armour off, just in case
        Is maniacally obsessed with etiquette
        Rejected a foreign prince's marriage proposal
        Used to work as a tavern bouncer
        Only has two more years before a demon comes back to claim their soul
        Doesn't have a reflection/shadow
        Has anger problems
        Bribed a nobleman to help them smuggle slaves out of a tyrannical kingdom
        Believes plate armour is just a sign of being posh and over privileged
        Is posing as someone else
        Is on the run after having an affair with a noble's daughter
        Is being hunted by a terrible monster
        Wants to one day own their own ship
        Never stands an insult
        Doesn't believe in the gods - even though they have seen one with his own eyes
        Always takes credit
        Can’t resist a wager
        If some says any number lower than 8, your must pass a constitution check or keep counting to 8.
        Carries a cryptic treasure map they won in a tavern bet
        You cannot pronounce your own name correctly.
        You know “fun facts” about everything. They are usually wrong
        You absolutely REFUSE to sleep without a trinket of some kind. (a blanket, a stuffed animal, a pillow, etc.)
        You introduce yourself by a slightly different name every time
        You believe that Undead, have rights just like regular people. You must only fight them, in self defense
        Thinks they are a god/immortal being
        Studied interior dungeon design
        Hasn't accomplished anything in their short life yet
        Distrusts all authority
        Is downright racist towards the Undead
        Can't swim
        Unwittingly misuses words all the bloody time
        Has a regular sleepwalking issue
        Never passes up a chance to say ‘I told you so’
        Doesn't believe in magic, ever
        Is afraid the rest of the party will kill them if they try to leave
        Gets nervous when speaking in front of crowds
        Is afraid of heights
        A chef looking for the rarest/most exotic ingredients and cooking methods to create the ultimate gourmet experience
        An agent of the church looking to steal back/reclaim holy relics
        Is adventuring to send money home to the family farm
    sailor tattoos
        location 
        1: Hands / fingers / wrists
        2: Lower arm
        3: Upper arm
        4: Shoulder / shoulder blades
        5: Neck
        6: Head / face
        7: Chest
        8: Back
        9: Upper legs
        10: Lower legs

        For the tattoo's quality, roll 1d4:
        function tattooQuality = {
            let chance = rollDice(100)
            if (chance<12.5) {
                return the tattoo is very simple or crude, only outlines, 1 or 2 colors tops.
            } else if (chance<50) {
                retrun the tattoo is simple but decent, mostly just outlines and using 1-3 colors
            }else if (chance<87.5){
                return the tattoo is above average, impressive work, a decent amount of shading and detailing, multiple colors.
            }else {
                return the tattoo is a true masterpiece, incredibly vibrant and richly detailed.
            }

        For the tattoo's subject, roll 1d20:
        1: A ship.
        2: Part of a ship. (anchor, flag, sail, oars, etc)
        3: Ropes, chains, or fishing lines.
        4: A dragon, wyvern, dragon turtle, etc.
        5: A sea monster. (Kraken, giant octopus, sea serpent, etc)
        6: A shark or dire shark.
        7: Sea turtle
        8: Harpoons or spears.
        9: Gambling motif. (Cards, coins, dice, etc)
        10: Religious symbol or symbols.
        11: A sea bird. (tern, swallow, albatross, roc, etc)
        12: A 'pin up girl.'
        13: Compass rose.
        14: Tankards, mugs, bottles of booze, etc.
        15: Elementals, most often water or storm elementals.
        16: 'Sea folk.' (Mermaids, Darfellan, Sahuagin, etc)
        17: A heart with a name in it.
        18: Skulls, crossbones, etc.
        19: Celestial bodies (stars, constellations, star charts, etc)
    ancients
        The Swamp Lurker: a six foot tall elven woman with skin lesions and leprosy ulcers. The Swamp Lurker has been spotted in swamps all over the world and is always carrying a lantern. Legends say that she was once a cleric that was desperately trying to cure her city of a deadly disease. Those who make pacts with her have the strange quirk of attracting flies. She has been known to assist travelers as well as kill them.
        Corrin: an artificer that had achieved lichdom through human transmodifications. Corrin is now more machine than man.
        The Chained King: a large creature with black feathers and demon horns. The Chained King was punished by the gods for using forbidden magic. The Chained King now remains locked away by three chains, each will be broken if certain requirements are met. As of now one of the chains was broken when a woman gave birth to a beast.
        Fafnir: a 15 million year old red wyrm that has survived off of his unending list for gold. Fafnir uses his greed as motivation to remain forever living.
        Volk: a primordial living at the bottom of a volcano. Legends say when Volk arises from the volcano the entire continent will be lit aflame.
        Sobrick: a crocodile human hybrid often worshipped by lizardfolk who is said to spring from the bottom of the ocean depths to eat the sky when he escapes a maze of coral he is trapped in.
        Galia: The mother of all dryads, Galia is found in a forest in the feywild and is said to be 100-300 feet tall. Galia is responsible for creating seasonal change. If Galia dies she simply is reborn from her old corpse. Galia is lawful in nature and will only appear to those who she wishes to see.
        The Watcher: an invisible entity with eternal life grated to them by the gods of death. It’s impossible to know how old the watcher is or where they are at any moment but what is certain is they are always gathering information. Warlocks have made pacts with The Watcher but even they have never talked to or seen them.
        The Monolith: a monk that has been meditating for 2000 years. The Monoliths real name is Feng and he has not aged since he had been in meditation. The Monolith while being unconscious still has subconscious defenses. Many assassins have tried to kill The Monolith only to have their mind bombarded with psychic energy.
        William Greyhammer: a dwarven paladin that upon death was offered the opportunity to be the guardian of Celestia. William spends his days at the gates of Celesia making sure the people who enter are allowed there.
        Drakeslayer: a greatsword that was forged by a great cleric. Drakeslayer can speak telepathically and has a hatred for dragonkind. Drakeslayer is a +3 weapon and deals an additional 2d6 to all dragons.
        Behemoth: a 6 legged bear-like creature with chitinous plates and fur, a hairless head and sharp needle like teeth. Roaming the heart of the oldest forest in the land, its roar is audible from the villages near the edge. They say it sounds like the screams of thousands of creatures dying, and the war drums of a legion
        Goliath: a tiger-like creature with one pair of legs and a pair of muscular arms. It’s fur is thick and drips a dark viscous syrup. A head that looks almost reptilian in nature and thick sharp teeth like the heads of spears. It’s roar sounds like a screeching violin. On its stomach is a deep scar, scholars say the Goliath got this scar from a fight it survived with The Behemoth
        Spawn of Orcus: This entity is the result of an ancient summoning ritual gone wrong in the Underdark. 30ft in diameter, the Spawn of Orcus is an amalgamation of over a hundred humanoid corpses and skulls, fused together in a disgusting mutated formation of perpetually rotting flesh and bone. For centuries it has writhed in agony in a gigantic cavern known as the Sepulchre Sanguinis, where the original ritual once took place. Its agonizing wails can be heard for miles, and its only wish is it to spread pain and suffering to those who cross its path.
        Warforged Dragons: a peculiar species that was uncovered only recently. Warforged dragons are the rarest type of dragon and come in all forms of metals like copper, steel, iron, and even aluminum. The largest and most intelligent of the warforged dragons known is Gorashi. Gorashi breaths fire and poison, they have been known to make deals with mortals for knowledge they have gained in their lifetime.
        Barothgar: an orcish sorcerer that steals the remaining life force of the creature he kills. Barothgar has killed so many creatures that his estimated lifespan is 1.3 trillion years. Barothgar is a name feared by all orckin. Some old and sick orcs venture into his mountainous domain so that Barothgar can give them a warriors death.
        Phenrodna: A failed attempt at creating a being with the power of sorcery artificially, Phenrodna is sealed inside a large gemstone through the use of the Imprisonment spell, and has been for many hundreds of years. Originally a normal human, it has lost that humanity, the wild magic coursing through its veins mutating it into a mercurial form that is ever shifting, while also driving it insane, and making it exceptionally powerful. It can be released from imprisonment by three kings simultaneously touching the crystal.
        Karthonon: a lich that lives in the feywild and is worshiped by the fairies living near him. Karthonon uses his worshippers as subjects for his alchemichal experiments. Karthonon is as of now not very well known however many of the feywilds best divination wizards forsee of a dark being using his power to destroy the summer court. Whether the being succeeds is uncertain. The dark being these wizards see is Karthonon.
        The Weeping King: A ghostly apparition that resides in a lonely, decaying long hall in the wetlands. Tears seem to eternally flood from his eyes and his hellish wail drives men to their knees. When he holds aloft his chipped, rusted sword a host of long dead warriors manifest around him
        Kumbaka: a dragonborn bard that was one of the first dragonborn ever born into existence. Kumbaka spent his life learning as many instruments and languages as possible. One day using his charm and cunning Kumbaka made a bet to a god of magic that if they couldn't kill him before he was done with his preformance tomorrow was over then he would be unable to age and won't die until they are finished counting to infinity. The god of magic agrred to this bet with confidence but on the night of the performance Kumbaka was nowhere to be found. Kumbaka had actually preformed in a different plane of existence which bought him enough time to finish his preformance before he could be found. Kumbaka knows that the god is almost done counting to infinity amd is planning one last show three years from now. In his life Kumbaka had learned to play 13 instruments and can speak 6 different languages. Kumbaka is proud of his accomplishments and is ready to die.
        The Hermit of the Glade: No one knows how old he is, but he has always been there, and will always be there. His house is well maintained, though of low quality. For some reason no one ever bothers him, and few even bother to visit. He is always polite, helpful and could even be called friendly by those who have tried to visit. Perhaps he is some old man blessed/cursed with immortality, or perhaps there’s more to his story.
        The Beast: A boar that has lived in the underdark for 1000 years. He was ordinary boar that grew too large. Throughout the ages hunters have tried to slay The Beast, but none have triumphed. The Beast has only grown, both in size and hatred. His thick hide bristles with the spears and blades of the hunters and warriors it has bested.
        Früdwark The Elder Giant: no one is sure if Früdwark is a storm giant or a separate breed of giant entirely. Früdwark is by far the largest and oldest giant known to giant kind. Früdwark has no concern for other giants, dragons, or mortals and simply wants to be left alone. Früdwark has a distaste for dragons especially because dragons seem to be the creatures that are always trying to pester him the most. Früdwark has been known to make deals with mortals so that they can stop bothering him and so that they can kill dragons who bother him.
        Filtara: the oldest dracolich still alive. Filtara was the creature that had taught mortals to achieve lichdom at the cost of their servitude. Filtara was betrayed by her servants and was banished to an endless void somewhere in the shadowfell. When Filtara escapes her prison she will plan to make all humanoids extinct for what they have done to her.
        Ythandr: a pit fiend that owns the endless library which is a huge landmark in the nine layers of hell. The endless library is considered the library with the most books and information within its walls. Those who make too much noise in the library are swiftly dealt with by Ythandr. First time offenders are warned and left with a painful burn mark, second time offenders are taken to an area of the library simply labeled "pain room". It's a mystery what happens in the pain room but each offender spends 20 years in it and always leave with the parts of their brain pretaining to memory removed and given back to them in a jar. Ythandr is one of the very few devils that were born before the nine hells existed.
        The Trader: a quiet, strange being who pulls a cart full of strange magical items for no known reason. They wears a cloak that is always oily for some reason, a mask that completely hides their face, and large leather gauntlets that go up to their elbow. They only accepts other magic items of equal value for trade, and their stock is completely random, one day they may have only a +1 dagger, the next they may have multiple +5 vorpal swords. They are immune to all magical effects, including any forms of divination. If a PC asks a god or being with similar power about them, the god/other being will have no clue who they are talking about. They are friendly to the party, but will refuse to leave their cart or reveal any skin no matter what.
        The Poison Tree: The Primal Aspect of Knowledge, both good and ill. Uncovering new information is to be celebrated, even when it brings about ruin. Some scholars believe the tree is purely a metaphor, written about to conceptualize complex ideas in a primitive age; some believe it to be real, and strike out on lifelong journeys to find it and eat of its fruit.
        Eros: Referred to as "The Mother of Monsters" in common parlance, this entity shares its name with the later goddess of love, though Eros is far more primal. It is love and lust in all of its forms, and its offspring and faithful are hybrids of monsters and humanoid species. Violent and terrible, the Forbidden Plateu of the Cult of Eros is home to rare species of beast and plant life. The very air there is said to corrupt mortals beyond recognition, twisting them into amalgams of man and monster.
        The Iron Pillar: Deep in the earth, it sings an endless song to all who dig toward it, though they do not understand it. Those who find it, fall to their knees in worship and expire in mortal terror.
        The Pig: a very strong woman with the head of a boar. The Pig can be found anywhere and everywhere as long as there is dim light. The Pig is a lawful neutral being that punishes those who try to defile the laws of nature. The Pig is said to be a failed experiment on how to prevent hunger but why the entity has lived for such a long time is beyond explanation. Those who have been killed by the hands of The Pig are found with no face and black ooze bubbling from a hole in their chest.
        The Yawning Willow: A sentient tree that speaks via the wind blowing through its leaves. The Yawning Willow is so old that it invented the language of druidic and has taught some of the first druids the ways of nature.
        Rinoir: he uses the body of a human once sworn in pact to Rinoir, now an avatar to him, as a demonic machine that has twelve mechanical arms protruding from the human’s old, withered, and blackened corpse. Rinoir is desperate to find a new host as his current one is getting more and more fragile as each year goes by.
        The Duke of Stone: a 20 foot tall being made of various stones and metals. The Duke of Stone is near impossible to describe due to their alien nature but some defining features are its many eyes and sharp, jagged body (if that even is a body at all). The Duke of Stone is a creature who takes joy in learning of its prey before petrifying them and engulfing their stone body into its horrendous figure. The Duke is always joking about how it "eats" and "sleeps" like a fleshbag, thinking of any creature smaller than him as a toy.
        Qpljhyt: an entity made of a pink fleshy substance that forms into a circle. The name of this creature cannot be pronounced by any creature except for gods and powerful aberrant mind sorcerers. Qpljhyt has been around since the creation of the material plane and will only give information to those who he wishes to give information to. Qpljhyt cannot attack but can use a special reaction to force a creature to make a DC 28 intelligence saving throw, on a failed save the creature is reduced to 0 hit points and on a successful save the creature take 30+20d12 force damage. Any creature reduced to 0 hit points by Qpljhyt are erased from time and space. Qpljhyt has a hit point total of 4000.
        Talveer: A roughly humanoid figure made of grey living ropes bound together, wearing rough clothing that seems to be made from parts of various clothes and other materials sown together. They wander the wilderness, if encountered by heroes or others with potential, they will offer a strange quest. The rewards will be good, but the consequences of failure morbidly bizarre. Accept the quests at your own peril, follow every letter and you will be rewarded, a single mistake will be worse than death.
        The Night Owl: an immortal being who owns a demiplane where the sun never rises and the party never stops. Those who get trapped on his plane cease to age with the downside of never being able to escape the endless party.
        The Birds: Ancient beings of Shadowfell that seep into the material plane through their disciples. Nobody knows where The Birds came from or what their true intentions are, as each of their followers are given a different set of powers and directives, but they are powerful. Those who know of their existence speak of visions of thousands of voices speaking at once, being in the center of a tornado of black wings, and an overwhelming sense of dread.
        Thornhart: A very old, forgotten god of life and nature, may be offspring of (insert your god of nature). His appearance resembles a massive hart with white fur tinged with green as if moss has been growing over him, with antlers made of interwoven vines covered in blooming flowers of all colors. A rainbow rack, it's called. Once long ago he was worshipped as a god of protection, rewarding those living close with nature. Now all he protects is his own Grove, mostly forgotten by all except the oldest of druids. He is standoffish to an irrational degree towards all but the most reverent of druids.
        Stormpale: A very old, forgotten god of war and death, may be offspring of (insert your god of war). His appearance is a massive falcon (about the size of a young red dragon) whose feathers are so black they seem to drink the light. He appears as though he's a shadow in the sky, or rather, a shadow projected onto the sky. The only part of him that is not inky blackness are his red eyes, which don't so much glow as they seem to reflect light back in a red haze. Seeing him in the sky has long been considered a very ill omen, portending war, famine, or death of some sort. However, at this point, being forgotten for so long, he is simply lonely, and is content to have a conversation with anyone.
        Arachae Cythalia: roughly translated from deep speech meaning queen of spiders, Arachae Cythalia is a spider with an old hags face and human feet on each of its ten spider legs. Arachae Cythalia has been building a web from the deep realm to the material plane and she will soon achieve her goals. Arachae Cythalia believes she deserves to be the goddess of spiders and intents to kill the current god of spiders. Arachae Cythalia gives birth to a freakish human spider hybrid race that has not been seen by anyone in the material plane. The ettercap species is considered a perversion of spiderkin to Arachae Cythalia and plans to cause a mass extinction to all ettercaps.
        Dreamstalker Child: an undead entity that manifests primarily in dreams, travelling from one dreamer to the next. It appears as a young child with an indistinct face that cannot be remembered, wearing a tattered grey linen tunic. If the dreamer reacts with fear or hostility towards the child, it will begin stalking them during waking hours. Small knife cuts will appear on the stalked person's body. If they walk near a dark doorway, they will feel a small hand grab them and try to pull them inside.
        The Golden Thrush: a small, plump bird with large, inquisitive eyes. Its plumage is brilliant gold, with brown spots and a white underbelly. Its song is a sparkling high-pitched trill, audible for miles. It is actually a remnant of the consciousness of an ancient forest spirit. If it witnesses someone damaging the forest or attacking the native creatures therein, it defends its domain by diving at the trespasser at incredible speeds, plunging through their body like a bullet. If fed mistletoe berries, it will grant a boon and safe passage through its forest.
        Warden of Agathys: a large muscular devil with blue skin and horns made of ice as well as a pigs nose. The Warden of Agathys hold the flail of punishment which is a +3 flail that magically causes painful spasms. The Wardens job is to punish sinners who were vile enough to make it into such a deep layer. After doing the same job for three millennia The Warden has perfected the art of torture to a science.
        Duchess of Wasps: a giant wasp with a head set ablaze with purple fire. The Duchess of Wasps can speak telepathically to creatures and loves to feast on mortal flesh. The Duchess of Wasps very rarely allows for deals to be struck with mortals but when she feels generous she allows for them to get power in return for food that her children may eat. The Duchess of Wasps will lay eggs in her victims and wait for them to hatch. Her lair is filled with wasps and corpses of humanoids, goblins, trolls, dragons, beholders, etc. Legends say that The Duchess of Wasps was once a druid that has transformed into a creature as disgusting as her heart, others say she was the first wasp to ever fly, whatever her story is nobody can deny how old and how powerful she is with near impossibly potent venoms, acids, and Psionics capability.
        Epok, Tilin, and Merq: The Planestriders: A trio of Alhoons that travel between planes successfully hiding for decades at a time. Every thirty years, they return to the Material plane to repeat their ritualistic sacrifices to extend their lives. They target weary travelers on quiet secondary roads. The story of these planestriders is thousands of years old.
        Scourge: a giant reptilian beast from a time long before man existed. It resembles a Tyrannosaurus with wings and horns. It can use a sonic roar as a breath weapon and break down fortified walls. It is said any city he visits is depopulated and left in ruins.
        Gnorman, The Gnomish Sythesist Summoner: He's an incredibly old gnome who at this point cant survive outside of his eidolon and is incredibly powerful. He spends most of his time making discount magic gear and supplies for the needy. The eidolon takes the form of a large mass of black tentacles.
        The People's God: A sentient, if simple mind created on accident via the arcane architects when a great ritual tripled the size of their city overnight. The People's God, or 'Ol Watchful, as it's called colloquially, is omniscient within the walls of the city and can be asked questions via prayer, though the answers are vague at best, nonsensical at worst. It's whispered that a band of vigilantes and a handful of neighborhood watches have learned to access it's knowledge in a more precise manner, and will go to extreme lengths to keep that knowledge out of the hands of the law. Many have claimed to see Ol’ Watchful but appearances vary from story to story and usually come from unreliable sources.
        Heart of The Undead: a mass of black flesh and rotten plant matter located in the shadowfell. The Heart will convulse occasionally and create a wave of necrotic energy from its convulsion. Any non undead who are within a 200,000 foot radius of The Heart while it convulses will take 4d12 necrotic damage. Those who die from the necrotic wave are resurrected as zombies. It is uncertain of the connection between The Heart and undead as a whole but it seems like undead try to protect The Heart.
        Shatterquake: An ancient continent-sized Earth Elemental. It is said its steps could cause the very continental plates to shift. It slumbers now, and a family of Halflings have began unknowingly cultivating life from its back. One day, it may awaken.
        Yiith?: Long ago. when a cerebrilith devoured the mind of a minor god, its temple home was sealed away, the whole pocket dimension locked for eons and eons in fear of the demon leaking out divine secrets or power into the rest of the world. When the makeshift tomb was finally unsealed, all that was found besides bones and dust was a single sea snail, dull and healthy. It MIGHT be the cerebrilith Yiith, morphed into this inconspicuous form as a disguise or a side-effect of absorbing the god's magic. Either way, the explorers that raided the ancient home knew of its history, and have taken great care to ensure that this possibly-volatile creature stays under lock and key.
        Saurothid: What remains of an extremely powerful fiendish entity that was heavily wounded long ago. It is mindlessly spawing lesser monsters in its crippled state, and despite having powers that exceed even the most powerful wizards, it wants to die and will not actively resist against the party trying to kill it. Though it’s endless army of lesser devils and its aura of heat and darkness will still make killing Saurothid a difficult task.
        Fuishtar: known by some as The Great Scorcher, Fuishtar is a gargantuan fire elemental that can speak directly to the god of war. Fuishtar is a servant to the god of war and is used as a messenger by the god of war. There is a legend of a battlefield where both sides prayed for the removal of a tarrasque so that they may fight. Their prayers were answered and Fuishtar stayed the monstrosity, the cost of his services is that all tarrasque from them onward had immunity to fire.
        The Illumin: They are not known to engage with humans openly. But now and then, those who went spelunking or miners trapped in caves found themselves either led out by a mysterious light being. Or sometimes, led deeper in. The stories told around them are often suggestive that when someone becomes trapped in the dark, they measure a person by whether or not they bring light to others. Then choose to appear and lead them to whatever the Illumin wish them to see. Perhaps it is safety or their end. But whether or not the beings truly gauge such things or if they are each with their own whims and choices is not known to mortals. The Illumin themselves are creatures of the dark, deep, and below places. They are often compared to feyfolk or changelings but some scholars have theorized they share things in common with bioluminscent cave mushrooms or spores. They disappear in areas of light, and can shape themselves as they wish. Another more accepted theory is that they are the result of hallucinations and that they do not truly exist.
        Jack O’The Roadside: A tall, pale human man in patched suit who casts no shadow. He is seen by travellers on the side of the road at night, playing a golden harp and inviting them to dance. Should they dance his beautiful melody he will begin to up in tempo until it’s the fastest song in all the lands. It is said that those who can keep up with Jack are granted good luck for 7 years but those who fail encounter naught but misfortunes.
        Altabach: A large snake, in the upper range of an anaconda, with off-white scales and black eyes, fangs, and tailtip. Letters and words crawl over his skin like living text. He hoards secrets, and will answer two questions in return for the tongue of one's lover and the liver of a faithful hound.
        Stro The Patient: An immense egg that, at first glance, appears to be made of stone. It is sunk partway into the ground, and lichen grows over its surface. No one is certain for how long it has lain there, but there is no doubt it is alive: it's surface is warm to the touch, and a slow pulse, almost like a heartbeat can be felt by those standing near to it. Those living in its proximity may find themselves falling under its psychic influence and performing strange tasks. The ultimate goal of the unborn creature, as long as if and when the egg hatch, remain unknown.
        Mother Hornwort: Ancient even by hag standards, Mother Hornwort's hunched figure emanates an aura of power. She rides a giant stork as a mount, and has been known to feed it those she dislikes. She is avoided by sensible folk, but other hags sometimes seek her out for her knowledge, services, or to offer supplication in hopes of earning her favour.
        The Giants Shadow: a peryton that has survived thousands of years feeding on hearts and slowly growing. The creature is now larger than a wyvern and its shadow resembles a giant instead of a human.
        Soul of Winter: a glowing blue light in the shape of a woman that appears on the coldest night in winter. Many have theories on who she is and why she comes but they all vary from culture to culture. One culture believes she collects the souls of the dead to be judged, another says she is a frost hag that revels in making the coldest nights even colder, some say she’s an illusion brought by frigid weather on the eyes of naive travelers, no one will really know for certain.
        Umaraka: a gargantuan sea serpent that guards the entrance into the abyss. Umaraka is worshipped as a god of darkness and the sea by many cultists. Umaraka can speak to its followers through dreams, usually asking for more living creatures to be sacrificed in its name.
        The Forgotten King: a once great king that fell upon a curse that would slowly turn him into a god of madness. The gods knew that while they could stop his horrid new form from arising they couldn’t help but watch as the abomination unfolded before their eyes out of morbid curiosity. The forgotten king has been cursed for 500,00 years now and looks like a deformed werewolf, having one hand being larger than the other, a horn protruding from his eye socket, sickly white colored fur, and pure white eyes. The Forgotten King has never transcended into godhood for the other gods refused to allow it. He now waits in his castles ruins waiting for his daughter (who’s been dead for many many centuries) to come back from her coronation as princess (an event that happened when he was still happy). Hearing him ramble on about how proud he is and how he will celebrate with tea can bring any man to tears.
        Sabaramha, The Dark Empyrean - The daughter of Tharizdun, Sabaramha is a six armed empyrean exceptionally talented in swords and life magic. Instead of the normal healing abilities that life magic would normally imply, Sabaramha's skills lie in the manufacture of diseases that can wipe out civilizations or the forced evolution of violent magical beasts.
        Oreglai, Shadow of Death - Oreglai appears as a giant rotting crow with a 2 mile long wingspan. All plants caught in its shadow wither and die, while creatures are afflicted with a horrible despair that can cause suicidal thoughts. Oreglai is infested with billions of insects that often reach gigantic sizes.
        Krullajer, The Fear Tyrant - This golden great wyrm turned shadow dragon feeds of fear itself. Fearing Krullajer himself will empower him and grant him immortality. Whereas, simple fear in general will also strengthen him, yet to a smaller degree. To seal away Krullajer, the gods built a magical artifact to make everyone and everything forget him. This artifact becomes more fragile as general worry, doubt, and fear spread across the world.
        Asherl-Khan, The Guilt of Gods - Khan, the former god of glory, was slain and reanimated as this undead husk of a god. Khan's artifact, The Mantle of Glory was also transformed into The Mantle of Guilt which now exhales an impossibly black fog that reanimates the fallen and converts undead into following Asherl-Khan's will. The other gods were too ashamed to face their former friend and thus had Sigil's Lady of Pain seal him away in one of her mazes.
        Voltius the Eternal: the oldest known vampire of the world. His large age and the gigantic quantities of blood he consummed granted him god-like abilities relate to his condition. He can smell any warm-blooded creature in a 3km radius, control blood with telekinetic power, making him able to slow down heart-rates, extracting precise quantity of blood, giving blood related diseases, etc..., shapeshift into anything, turn invisible, and is immune to any anti-vampires techniques. You can see his reflection in mirrors, holy water feels like water to him, he can go anywhere no matter if he was invited or not, sunlight doesn't do anything to him...The list goes on.
        The Renegade God: A Nameless God who, in ancient times, sided against his fellows Gods. His name was erased from history, an he was chained deep beneath the earth.
        The King of Flames: A powerful Titan residing in a blinding palace on the back of a giant Phoenix, by which he travels the world.
        The Three-Faced Tree: An enormous and ancient oak with three humanoid faces protruding from it. They will answer any question: one of the faces always tells the truth, one tells what the traveler would want to hear, and the last one always lies.
        Xurv: a death tyrant located somewhere in the abyss. Xurv has no grand scheme or plan to conquer, he simply enjoys inflicting pain. Xurv will float above the abyss scouring one layer at a time trying to find demons. When Curv finds one he shoots a laser at it obliterating any trace of its existence.
        Pam: a frail old human woman who just never seems to die. She has outlived her children, grand children, great grandchildren and so on for so many generations, but the pain of loss just doesn't seem to dissipate. This has left her a bitter old woman. She holds intimate knowledge of ancient societies because, well, she lived there and she often yearns for the "good old days" when only sorcerers could make fire and magic couldn't be learned by any idiot who could open a book. She has attempted and failed at ending her own life and having it ended for her by provocation, but recently she has altered her strategy in life and is using her knowledge to indugle in a little necromancy. If she won't die, then neither will her great-great-great-great-great-great-grand children. If she succeeds, she will be united with her huge extended, risen again, family.
        The Forge: The Forge is a sentient entity...a golem of sorts. The Forge acts more as a portal when a hero commits their first great deed (I.e. slaying a dragon or protecting a kingdom) the Forge will appear out of nowhere, often emerging from nearby water sources of from the shadows. its 12-foot tall stature consumes the hero and they wake up within the Forge. They have the honor of watching the forge create their very own custom magical weapon.
        Old Rambler: A bark-encrusted quadrupedal humanoid with a skull that channels it's slow breaths through pipe-like protusions. It’s breath acts as a thick fog and any living thing that breathes in the fog takes constant acid damage, but is revived with increased vitality an hour after leaving it's presence. The Old Rambler wanders slowly through the swamps of which it is considered a patron.
        The Walker: Nobody's sure of this being's real name, or even what they look like; the Walker has appeared as male, female, elven, human, dragonborn, and many other races besides. Regardless of their form, the Walker is always found walking down a road or path, surrounded by golden motes of light. They have never been seen leaving or arriving anywhere. If the Walker is spoken to politely, they will reply and offer to grant the person "a light to watch their path". When the person accepts, one of the lights that surround the Walker will start orbiting them instead, and will keep doing so until they die (when it flies off in a straight line, presumably back to the Walker.) If questioned about the direction of their journey or why they have lived so long, they will reply, "Does the walker choose the path, or the path the walker?"
        The Myriad Faced One: a colossal entity that has tens of faces and hundreds of arms. He lived for trillions of years and is located at the intersection of all the planes of the multiverse. His goal is to fusion all planes to create a single perfectly balanced plane.
        Ugami: the first ever skeleton, sometimes called the ever-living warrior. Ugami had made a pact with a warlock to remain living forever so he can fight for eternity. The wizard agreed and now Ugami lives in an ancient dungeon waiting for his next foe. Centuries underground has left Ugami completely insane.
        Melezabeth: A severed undead head of an ancient giant, kept unliving only by its unsatiable gluttony. It has no bowels and everything it devours comes right through it, chewed and dropped from between all tangled sinews and veins that hang from its stump of a neck, all resembling grotesque tentacles and pseudopods. Melezabeth is mostly immobile, sitting atop of the ancient bottomless well, losing all its meals to the void beneath it. It can crawl, albeit very slowly. It can't be satiated, even with the help of its many cultists, which sacrifice countless victims to Melezabeth's all-devouring maw. Its minions suckle black goo from its disguisting arteries, like lambs of an undead goat, which gives them supernatural strength to do Melezabeth's bidding. They say the head has hypnotic abilities and when fought, it will often cannibalize its minions to instantly regenerate portions of health, catching prey with veiny tentacles and shooting nauseating goo from its swollen body.
        The Cottage: Deep in the Far Realm, protected by an unbreakable bubble of force, lies a small, picturesque, thatched country cottage, floating on an floating island of land with a small pasture for two or three sheep, a small wooden shed, and a vegetable garden. Two elderly humans can occasionally be seen, puttering about the garden, milking the sheep, or caring for the cottage in some way. Ancient tomes and beings with such knowledge describe them simply as The Husband and The Wife, but that is largely the entirety of knowledge about them. They, or similar beings, have lived in The Cottage unchanged for millennia. The bubble in which they exist is utterly unbreachable, even by divine power or spells that effect the nature of reality itself, such as Wish. Any attempts to reach the inside of the bubble result in the breacher being hurled from the area with insane speed and force. Anyone attempting to contact the couple through the bubble will be greeted with friendly nods and waves, but no other attempts at communication.
        The Abstract: The result of a failed attempt at Lichdom. The wizard was left a torn and deformed being; immortal but cut off from magic. They cannot cast spells of their own. Instead their aura perverts the magic of those around them. Twisting and tainting the effects of spells and magic items or weapons.
        Chirpy: A delightfully round songbird. Nobody can fully identify its species but know it to be a magical being of some kind. Chirpy is a primordial creature and despite having powerful magical potential still has the mind of a bird. They cannot be killed permanently by anything short of a god and when out of sight are capable of traveling from one point to another in an instant. Chirpy finds people interesting and will follow anyone who shows it affection.
        Liliveth: An ancient Oracle of a long forgotton deity who lives on an island in the middle of the ocean. She represents the turning between day and has two presences: She who walks the light, and she who walks the dark. She resides in two temples built into opposite halves of a mountain. The light temple is filled with light and magic based puzzles. The night temple is filled with dangers and fights taking place in magical darkness. At the end of each, she is sitting upon a throne. Small and frail but radiating with power. In the light, she will answer any three questions you ask, three answers, two truths, and one falsehood. In the dark, she will answer one question per individual, but the answer always rings true, and the asker may not like the answer. After a group leaves her temples, they will not open their doors again for anyone for 1,000 cycles of sun and moon.
        83: The Savior: a 7 foot tall angelic being with large white eagle wings, unnaturally pale skin, and no face. The Savior is rarely seen and seldom heard of. When a hero is doomed The Savior will come down and protect them from the fatal blow. Some say The Savior is a solar of the goddess of fortune but it is impossible to say for certain. Sightings of The Savior go back farther than elven history.
        84. Keeper of The Body: a large grey mass that gives off immense amounts of heat and exists just beyond the edge of the universe. Very few have spoken to it but those who have had to pass an intense trail of strength to unlock a stone door with celestial writings saying “I Feel All”. Those who have spoken to The Body gain a feat called Fragment of the body which grants the creature +2 constitution and advantage on constitution saves. The Body tells all it meets that it must reunite with its kin.
        85. Keeper of The Mind: a large blue crystal with other crystals attached to it resembling a pattern that gives off a strange sense of pressure and exists just beyond the edge of the universe. Very few have spoken to it but those who have had to pass a difficult trail of mental fortitude to unlock a stone door with celestial writings saying “I Know All”. Those who have spoken to The Mind gain a feat called Fragment of the mind which grants the creature +2 intelligence and advantage on intelligence saves. The Mind tells all it meets that it must reunite with its kin.
    descriptive sayings
        As unpredictable as a fey on a bad day
        As noticeable as an ogre at a gnome bar
        As convincing as three Gnomes in a sundress
        As original as a kenku
        Sweating like a heretic next to a paladin squad
        As smooth as a bard with a beer in them
        As tactful as an orc barbarian
        You know what they say in Silverymoon. This is gonna go over like a Xvart in the birch grove. (/u/invisibledirigible)
        As bubbly as a bard (/u/WeHateSand)
        "You're worse than a kobold with a new dragon in town." Said to somebody who is brown-nosing. (/u/SamBeanEsquire)
        Instead of referring to a hardass spouse as "The ol' ball and chain" you could replace it as "the ol' bugbear" (/u/ThumpasaurusFlex)
        You look as nervous as a displacer beast in a paladin convention. (A reference to this art piece done by the famed Fredrik K.T. Andersson.) (/u/Moon_Dew)
        As ugly as the south end of a northbound gargoyle.
        As smelly as something that got crapped out of one otyugh, eaten by another, and then crapped out of that second otyugh, then then set on fire.
        As angry as an owlbear who caught his wife in bed with another man.
        About as subtle as throwing a fireball into a smokepowder storehouse (smokepowder being the Forgotten Realms' equivalent to gunpowder).
        I've had warmer welcomes in Stygia (Stygia being the 5th layer of the Nine Hells, and known for living up to the expression "When Hell freezes over".).
        All the social grace of an orc berserker.
        "He's/She's under rolling thunder!" (they are in trouble) (/u/MojoDragon365)
        "They are connected through stone." (they share a stubborn opinion)
        "You're burning a stone bridge!" (You are only harming yourself, not the target)
        When a player fails stealth checks all the time: You’re as stealthy as a Goliath in a goblin den. (/u/SyntheticMilk)
        I’m so hungry, I could eat a tarrasque. (/u/malnox)
        as tricky as a pixie with a puzzle box (/u/Matkol1998 & /u/proopypants1)
        As uncomfortable as a tiefling among aasimar clerics (/u/BurntNerd)
        As dead as a goblin caught stealing from a dragon (/u/darthfodder)
        As happy as a pixie in a honeysuckle patch.
        As fast as a Sprite with the spell Haste.
        As hungry as a Tarrasque woken from a 1000 year slumber.
        As skittish as a Blink Dog cornered by three trolls.
        As dead as a troll in a volcano.
        As high as a Bard in college.
        As drunk as a dwarf on his brother's birthday.
        As discreet as a centaur tapdancing in a marble hall (/u/herissonberserk)
        Higher than a dragons butthole (/u/VoltasPistol) (or Higher than a giants butthole)
        Chattier than a Kenku at the fair. (/u/ButHonestlyWhy)
        Just as warm as a lizardfolk [re personality] (/u/sweetharpykey)
        Busy as a Gnome
        Temper like a Salamander (or fire dragon if it's really bad)
        Flies just like a Purple Worm
        All the bravery of a kobold and none of the skill
        Upstanding as a Slime
        Reeks like an ogre's armpit
        Smart as a bugbear and mean as one too
        Flumphface
        Go have fun training basilisks (doing the impossible)
        Happy as a sorcerer with their first fireball
        One-blast Warlock (one trick pony)
        Trustworthy as a Yuan-ti
        As subtle as a dwarven tavern during a high feast (/u/Wobberjockey)
        Like a barbarian in a Goblin Camp (/u/Fish_can_Roll76)
        "As plain (or prude) as a wizard at the College of Lore" (/u/RollinThundaga)
        "As lost a ranger in city hall"
        "As lost as a ranger at a banquet"
        "As confused as a goblin with a scarecrow"
        As welcoming as the Nine Hells (/u/Biokrate)
        as dumb as challenging a Goliath to arm wrestle (/u/RowanStimpson)
        useless as tying up a gelatinous cube
        as helpful as a flint and steel to fire mage
        pretty as a nymph in the moonlight
        The time dragged on like a hill giant planning his next chess move
        he is a real Kua-toa out of water
        like asking a Treant to help gather firewood
        happy as a dwarf in a brewery
        As much use as boots for a beholder (/u/ElZoof)
        As happy as a hungry gnoll in an orphanage
        Busier than an incubus in a convent
        About as lively as a lich (/u/Pidgewiffler)
        More mindless than a modron
        Breath smells like a green dragon's (/u/amintowords)
        Hairstyle looks like a gryphon's nest
        As clear spoken as a sphynx
        Armpit hair looks like the forest of (insert appropriate forest name).
        As romantic as a gelatinous cube.
        Beautiful as a beholder with conjunctivitis
        The offspring of a dwarf and a hill giant.
        As graceful as an elf.
        A booming voice like a giant's.
        So beautiful they'd never need to cast charm person.
        As patient as the games master.
        You look as comfortable as an elf in a mine (/u/jakemp1)
        As much personality as a gelatinous cube (/u/tcjaeger)
        As graceful as a tapdancing goliath in a China store
        As dumb as a bag of holding full of portable holes
        They might as well be a rust monster. (clumsy/inept) (/u/LazyRaven01)
        Suspiciously clean, as if chewed up and spit out by a gelatinous being. (/u/invisibledirigible)
        My hotel's as clean as an elven arse.
        Dumber than a box of goblins (/u/joeschmoemama)
        Looser than a dwarf wearing an ogre's briefs
        Murky as the bottom of a hag's cauldron (/u/MildlyConcernedGhost)
        As useless as a giant at an ass-smelling contest. (/u/futureButt)
        Like asking a dragon to light a match
        You are as paranoic as/ more paranoic than a beholder (/u/salocin01 )
        Hotter than a jug of fire beetles (/u/Kronk458)
        Not an anvil's chance in a nest of rust monsters
        Deader than Strahd's ex-girlfriend (/u/ElZoof )
        Crazier than a kuo-toa hopped up on pixie blush
        Dumber than challenging Vecna to a game of "Truth or Dare"
        So by the book they probably have the day of the week engraved into thier Tassets and Faulds (/u/MaxSizeIs)
        as graceful as a bugbear in high heels (/u/3lminst3r)
        meaner than a landlocked kraken
    charlatain backgrounds
        Leaving an acquaintance to blame for selling fake drugs to a noble [/u/Sleepy_Bandit]
        Tampering with a competitor's equipment to cause them to lose a competition so you can win a bet [/u/Sleepy_Bandit]
        Stealing candy from a child who has now grown up to become a rage-filled barbarian [/u/Sleepy_Bandit]
        Selling fake love potions to a desperate noble who ended up being embarrassed in public [/u/Sleepy_Bandit]
        Using a friend's identity for an illegal deal and getting them arrested / questioned by the authorities [/u/Sleepy_Bandit]
        Seducing away a minor noble’s daughter while posing as a noble, leaving them both destitute. [/u/Marksman157 ]
        Bank fraud, resulting in the economic collapse of a village; a few deaths by despair, starvation or incidental robbery involved [/u/LordsOfJoop ]
        planting fake evidence of involvement with a string of robberies, resulting in a local noble being exiled for life [/u/LordsOfJoop ]
        popularizing a song that portrays a church in a strongly negative light, resulting in a purge from the region [/u/LordsOfJoop ]
        selling a crate of shoddy weapons and armor to a local militia, resulting in a humiliating defeat [/u/LordsOfJoop ]
        Playing both sides of a minor dispute between nobles that resulted in closed borders between the 2 regions (cold war situation). [/u/always_gamer_hair]
        Farting at a very inopportune moment in front of a noble's child. [/u/always_gamer_hair]
        Keeping a memento from a battle that should have gone back to the soldier's significant other or child. [/u/always_gamer_hair]
        Climbing up a wall with clearly posted "no climbing" signs, causing part of the wall to collapse [/u/always_gamer_hair]
        Accidentally melting the ice sculptures at a local ice festival. [/u/always_gamer_hair]
        Reselling stolen goods to the wrong merchant. [/u/always_gamer_hair]
        Informing the local captain of the guard that their wife is having an affair when, in fact, she is most certainly not. [/u/always_gamer_hair]
        Joined a convent for 9 months to hide from debt collectors, then burned the place down in a botched attempt at faking their death. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Let a refugee family use their name to get into a safe city, having forgotten that they are a wanted criminal there. The family was detained, brutally interrogated as potential accomplices, and then thrown out. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Used a set of vestments stolen from a cleric's wardrobe following a one night stand to sell fake indulgences and de-cursings. Many people were injured, and the cleric has been banished from their temple. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Made up a really impressive sounding fake name off the cuff while being arrested which turned out to be a real, very important person. Interpreting the announcement of their arrest as some sort of provocation, a series of insults and slights escalated into an actual border war... in which the character was an active profiteer. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Deflowered one of the participants in a critical political marriage the night before the ceremony, derailing a critical peace settlement and destabilizing the entire region for years [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Participated in a rebellion against an evil overlord, and named names when captured by the guards. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Hocked a critical spare part from an irrigation system for beer money, causing a massive crop failure when that part was needed and couldn't be found in time. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Engaged in some petty abuse of the local populace while wearing a guard uniform (stolen as part of another petty crime), which provoked a clash between the local peasants and the local law, resulting in many injuries and some deaths. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Took a large sum of money to act as a surveyor and just copied a previous surveyor's work, resulting in multiple recently founded villages being destroyed when a dam was built down-river from them. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Accidentally started a race war by spouting off about how much better elves are than dwarves...in a dwarf bar [/u/WSHIII]
        Accidentally started a three way religious war by claiming Torm was better than Ilmater...in Tyrian temple. [/u/WSHIII]
        Accidentally started the Blood War by pissing through a portal into Graz’zt’s throne room...while dressed as a devil for Halloween [/u/WSHIII]
        Betting (and losing) a party member on a gamble after already having lost all their money. The winner has ties to the slave trade and is not happy. [/u/Zekaito]
        Sold a man a bridge who was subsequently eaten by a very persistent troll. [/u/Wolfenight]
        The significant other of a person killed in a fireball mistake turned out to be a renowned and feared bounty hunter. [/u/supersteve320]
        Tricking a family member or friend into buying pointless insurance. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Tricking a family or friend into investing in a company that never existed. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Convincing a friend not to marry by using a loaded die / coin. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Upcharging significantly for beer/wine/mead at a close friend’s wedding. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Taking and completing a contract to kill or bankrupt a close relation’s parent, friend or lover. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Betting and losing a deed that wasn’t theirs to bet. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Stealing a horse. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Rewriting their parents’/grandparents’ will to their benefit. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Laundering money for a gang / beholder / trading company that then ruined the charlatan’s ancestral lands or city. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Convincing a former ally to make a pact with a shady entity at great personal cost in the name of wealth. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Extorting, blackmailing or embezzling from an orphanage. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Running an orphanage as a front. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Skimming/stealing tithes. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Hanging on to a memento from a cursed forest / temple, which must be returned lest extremely bad luck continue to befall them. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Selling a cursed memento to an acquaintance that granted them exceptionally bad luck. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Working with a troll/ogre to collect bridge tolls at great cost to life and limb for others. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Contributing to the extinction of a local beast / bird after selling snake oil made from its bits. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Conning a respected warrior into buying a weapon the charlatan enchanted to return to his/her position when the command word was spoken. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Secretly working with a nothic to learn too much at great cost. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Destroying a family’s crops and livelihood with shoddy agricultural remedies to cause their business and lands’ value to decline. [/u/Umkynareth]
        Eating that last slice of pie... it was not a good idea... [/u/dermitdog]
        Instigating a gang war between two shady (yet wealthy) casinos by cheating and pretending to be from the other casino. [/u/dermitdog]
        Sinking the prize ship of a navy while pretending to be a nautical carpenter [/u/dermitdog]
        Crashing the lord's masquerade by spilling all of the swindled gold lining your clothes while on the stage, then escaping and therefore discrediting the lord for allowing a vagabond to steal so much money and get away with it leaving the (generous and generally beloved) noble house destitute. [/u/dermitdog]
        Selling 'magical' 'snake' oil that, caused a child to die of blood poisoning instead of their terminal (yet curable) illness. [/u/dermitdog]
        Reading from the wrong scripture while posing as a preacher, causing a devout acolyte to be executed for heresy after reciting your teachings. [/u/dermitdog]
        Lying about your identity to someone while becoming their lover for a scheme. The love was eventually genuine from your side, but the scheme wasn't exactly for the other's benefit. The revelation of your lie has left them heartbroken and angry at you. [/u/dermitdog]
        Laundering money so well that it got into wider circulation and put multiple people into prison as they tried to use the money in more rigorous markets. [/u/dermitdog]
        Telling someone that you could make them fly, leading to their suicide. [/u/dermitdog]
        Selling family heirlooms while posing as a moving company worker, scattering the heritage of a dwindling noble family. [/u/dermitdog]
        Leaving your home city abruptly, cutting all ties and never looking back on the people you knew. [/u/dermitdog]
        Not stopping a clear case of marital abuse because doing so would blow your cover. [/u/dermitdog]
        Stealing the bricks from a historic building and selling them at extortionate prices while replacing them with weaker materials, causing the building to collapse during a busy day. [/u/dermitdog]
        Misquoting a holy passage, causing a schism in the church. [/u/dermitdog]
        Pressured an accomplice to not seek medical aid for a serious injury, fearing it would result in the detection of a criminal plot, only to wreck the plot themselves by running their mouth in a tavern while drunk. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Not wanting to be outdone telling tawdry tales at the inn, the character made up an atrociously lurid fib about their activities with a young princess they had never actually met. A bard heard it, made it into song, and completely ruined her marriage prospects. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Sold a map of the city catacombs to what they thought were drug smugglers for 50 gold and a cask of nice wine. The "drug smugglers" were an engineering crew from a rival city, and in a siege 6 months later used the plans to great effect by setting explosives under critical defense structures. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Convinced a young accomplice to take the fall for a crime they committed, on the logic that the character would be able to break them out later. Character instead got arrested for partying too hard in the next town over, and jumped a ship out of the country instead of trying to go back for their fall guy. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Persuaded several friends to bankroll them for a surefire gambling scheme, based on a plan to use advanced math to calculate the "true" odds of any particular play. Lost everything when they got too drunk to properly carry the "1". [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        While rummaging through a church for things to steal, they found an old bottle of wine, drank it, and put the empty bottle back in it's nook. The bottle was one of the earthly possessions of a man who ascended to a higher plane, and it's consumption was seen as a sign of his return. Several pretenders appeared, triggering a violent schism in the religion. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        When travelling, they met the last survivor of a pilgrimage, clutching a golden chest in his hands. They were attempting to return a holy relic to a temple, in accordance with an oath sworn by the founder of their order over 150 years ago. With their last breath, they begged the character to deliver the relic in the chest to their destination. The character, headed the other direction, chose to throw the relic in a creek and hock the chest for 10 gold. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        In a moment of cocky bravado, the character gloated over the fallen body of a dangerous litch, telling them that they were an idiot for not hiding their phylactery better, rattling off several examples. The lich then used a contingency spell to transport themselves and their phylactery away. The phylactery hasn't been seen since, but the lich has been a plague on the land for years... [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Accidentally fell in with a group of highway robbers and cutthroats, who told the character they were freedom fighters against a corrupt regime. The character found out after a week, but stuck around for a whole month because the "rebel leader" was just too hot. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Attempting to get a lover to leave them so as to not feel the guilt of initiating a breakup, the character went too far, gaslighting their SO to the point of actual madness. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Sold samples of their own blood to a group they knew to be demon summoning cultists as "virgin blood" (lol, no). They successfully summoned the demon, but completely failed at containing or dismissing it. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Got drunk and took a piss in a holy fountain, deconsecrating it. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Fiddled around with an elaborate sundial because they were bored, not knowing that it served an important role in timing the local planting cycle and triggering massive crop failure. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Agreed to act as a fraudulent guardian for a group of orphans who needed parental consent to join the Army. The "military recruiter" was actually an agent for a slave trader. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Hid the body of a dead man in a well, contaminating the only ready source of clean water within 5 miles of a small town. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Received a key to the city for services rendered, and then got drunk and lost it. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Sold a large pile of colored flour to a church, telling them it was rare medicinal powder. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Stole a statue from a town square and sold it for cheap to an art collector. The statue was actually the petrified body of a legendary hero, prophecied to return to life in the time of greatest need, and the "art collector" her ancient nemesis. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Yelled "do a flip" at a despondent man standing on a ledge. They did the flip. It was horrible. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Spent years convincing an old, half-blind noblewoman that they were their adult grandchild. When the real grandchild came to visit, the guards shot them as an impostor. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Knowingly gave a group of pirates a map of the harbor defenses of a city that had banished them for multiple crimes. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Blamed a rash of robberies they had committed on an in-city goblin community, giving their enemies a pretense to persecute and exile them, uprooting families that had been living there for generations and turning "Goblintown" from a thriving community to an urban blight. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Knowingly sold defective spell components to a group of student wizards, causing them to fail their final exams when the spells misfired. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        While drunk and in a fighty mood, played "devil's advocate" in an argument with a paladin, turning them Oathbreaker. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        After being saved from a shipwreck by a merperson, told a group of pirates where to find them in exchange for a fixed fee per fin they cut off. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Participated in a scheme to breed and train mimics to act as guard animals and security devices. It worked great for about 72 hours, and then people started getting beaten to death by their own nightstands. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Blamed a friendly old healer woman for cursing them, so they wouldn't need to explain certain symptoms of a STI to their significant other. The healer was a druid who was single-handedly responsible for keeping the Fair Folk at bay and placated, and after she was driven away as a witch they moved in on the town. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Sold swords with defective heat treating to a local militia, many of which shattered in their hands when they were attempting to defend their town from bandits. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Having come down ill before the night of a major party, the character paid a spellcaster to glamor them to hide the symptoms so they could go, carouse and steal. The party was in turn the epicenter of a massive disease outbreak, as many attendees were travelers from afar. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Deliberately triggered a trap on the way out of a dungeon to reduce the number of people with whom they would have to share the treasure. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Built a fake dungeon, and then spread about it at inns and taverns, so they could ambush the adventurers who came to "save the townsfolk" and take their stuff. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Bought a group of slaves on the intention of freeing them... and then changed their mind once they found out how good they were at keeping house and cooking meals. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Tuned out during a conversation with a significant other, giving them the "yeah, sure honey, sounds good" treatment when the SO was a young artificer asking for guidance on what ingredients to use, causing a large explosion. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
        Gave someone's name to the Inquisition because they figured it would be easier to rob their house when they were too busy being stabbed with hot irons in a dungeon to do anything about it. [/u/Vote_for_Knife_Party]
    doggos
        Volmusian Ember Hair - A breed derived from fire elemental stock, bred by druids as attack animals. Fiery red hair, maned, with a sturdy frame and short snout. 1d3 Fire damage/round if within 5ft and the dog dislikes you.
        Mutt of Tindalos - Possessed of the blood of creatures which exist outside of space-time; this canine does not move, it simply stutters & teleports up to 40ft in a round instead. They are off-putting creatures, emaciated and long-limbed with greenish-grey fur.
        Hemohound - Descended from the hounds owned by vampires. Sable-furred, with crimson eyes and bodies built for pursuit. Hemohounds feed on blood, and biting living creatures heals them. Each successful bite restores 1 HP to the dog.
        Cerberusid - Smuggled out from Hades itself, these stocky, well-muscled and snub nosed dogs have multiple heads for observing the comings and goings of the dead. Advantage on anything to do with multi-tasking or perception. Roll 1d6 - 1-3: 2 heads, 4-6: 3 heads.
        Dorician Pale Dog - Developed by fakirs for the purposes of curing diseases, these wane and mangy beasts are capable of taking diseases into themselves by licking the afflicted and transferring them to another through the means of coughing or sneezing fits.
        Dolchean Mole-hound - A strange breed of canine developed by dwarves to help them guard their subterranean farms. Mole-hounds have short white fur, huge reflective eyes, and massive paws. These dogs can burrow and dig at half the speed at which they can run.
        Sivardian Chaser - These huge, grey-furred, and wolf like dogs were bred by Hobgoblins to keep pace with and flush out their traditional Centaur rivals. Chasers move 20ft faster a round than a typical canine.
        Phantom Cur - Cultivated from canines repeatedly revived through necromantic means, these eerie hounds outwardly seem like normal members of their species, but they often go minutes without breathing or days without blinking. Their own proximity to death allows them to sense and affect incorporeal beings.
        Spell Terrier - Developed by generations of spell-casters to be the ideal Familiar, spell terriers are small enough to be carried on one's person and are possessed of luxurious hair suitable for petting. Spell Terriers can identify and retrieve spell components and magical items.
        Witcher Spaniel - A dog bred by mage-hunters to help them identify their targets. These spaniels are tall and long-bodied, with short dark coats and pointed features. Witchers can sense the presence of magic, and will growl when a spell is used in their presence.
        Ceirwannian Hunting Hound - Graceful and sleek of profile, these shaggy-haired hunting dogs are a traditional companion of elvish rangers, and are used to help their owners harry prey. Ceirwannians gain advantage on all rolls relating to stealth or ambush.
        Splay-toed Goblin Dog - Long of limb and short-furred with large digit pads, these dogs are used by Goblins as both draft and riding animals. Their feet allow them to easily bound and scurry up the broken terrain and caves in which their masters make their homes. Splay-toes ignore the effects of difficult terrain and climb half as their movement speed.
        Chardonian Water Spaniel - Savior of pirates and sailors the world over, Chardonian are mid-sized short-haired dogs which come in a variety of blues. Fiercely loyal, these dogs are trained to retrieve folk thrown overboard during sea voyages. Chardonian have been interbred with water elementals, and they may breathe underwater and swim as quickly as they run.
        Drowish Oozehound - Bizarre and terrifying creatures designed by the dark elves as guardians for their slave pens. These beasts tend towards bright and playful personalities, their fur replaced by semi-translucent globules of tar like ichor. A bite (or nuzzle) from an Oozehound necessitates a strength check to escape.
        Saoghal Cultivated Dog - A servant dog bred by the nobility to be a gentleman's best friend, these beautiful beasts move with the poise and elegance of an aristocrat. Their long fur is kinked into tight spools which must be brushed daily to keep from knotting. Saoghals are incredibly intelligent, watching those that treat with their owners carefully, barking or growling when they suspect that lies are being told.
        Doppeldachshund - Originally the product of a now obscure and likely mad arch-mage, this breed of dog is now chiefly treasured by cheap side shows and thieves. Doppeldachshund are able to briefly alter their form into that of other animals of their own approximate size. They can maintain an alternate form for only ten minutes before shifting back.
        Corantinian War Dog - Chosen from the fiercest and largest stock by generations of crusaders to foster a gargantuan canine which rivals a small pony in size. Corantinians have thick coats of white fur which braid themselves into thick protective cords as the dog matures. Corantinians have an extra Hit Die than a typical canine.
        Troll-blooded Laika - This particular land race was developed by goblinoid tribes to aid them in their hunts and raids. Interbred with regenerating creatures, these dogs are utterly fearless and unflinchingly loyal. They are a mid-sized breed and of average build, but they are terribly ugly, covered in patches of uneven and wart-ridden fur. Troll-blooded Laika regenerate 1/HP a turn. Laika eat double the amount of a typical dog.
        Poison Dart Dog - Inspired by the similarly named amphibian, a group of shaman deep within the jungles of Auyyuah have bred a line of canines capable of producing and expelling poisons. These dogs can at will exude a class 'M' poison. They are hairless and sleek creatures, with slick patches where the poison naturally pools.
        Platinum Retreiver - An offshoot of common hunting dogs, these somewhat dopey and friendly beasts can detect the presence of precious metals up to 60' away.

storybuilding stuff
    start of story
        Ask everyone to roll a Dexterity save immediatly, without any context. After they've all rolled, describe the scene. They're running away from a hill giants' settlement after stealing something valuable. The plan was to sneak in, take the object, and leave silently, but a giant caught them red-handed and had to start running for their lives. Now the giants are throwing huge rocks at them from the distance while they run down the mountain. Make them roll once or twice more before succesfully escape and nerf the rock damage a bit if it hits. NPC, yelling at a PC while running: FOR THE GODS SAKE TELL ME YOU STILL HAVE IT WITH YOU!
        There you are, studying the situation. Tension can be cut with a knife, silence, no other sound but your steps on the grass and the growls of that damn thing. You walk in circles, keeping an eye and distance between you, and them, and thinking how on earth could you have ended up in that situation. You were facing a wild manticore 30 seconds ago, but suddenly a group of bandits appeared from nowhere, interrupting the scene. The situation just turned into a three-way combat, and everyone is just waiting for the others to make a move. Roll initiative, my dears.
        The blizzard is hitting hard on them. They should've stayed in the village until tomorrow, but now it is too late to regret. As they walk through this narrow mountain pass, exhausted, deafened by the wind and almost blinded by the snow, one of the PCs slips. He/she manages to clutch to the edge of the cliff, but struggles to avoid falling.
        The party is being chased by a huge zombie horde in the middle of a foggy forest, when suddenly one of the PCs spots a small abandoned cabin. Getting inside seems like the best option in that dire situation. Anyways, the cabin is only a temporary solution because the zombies will end up entering one way or another; luckily, it has a small trapdoor leading to a basement...
        The PCs start tied in a ship's deck and one of them is about to walk the plank. Luckily, another PC just managed to get free while the crew is distracted with the show and mocking.
        The party are passengers on a ship that has come under attack by a sea monster, roll various checks in an attempt to survive. Eventually the ship is destroyed and the party will wash up on shore (whether they made it aboard a life raft or not). [u/ken_NT]
        The PCs stare dumbly at each other in a quiet corner of a chaotic battlefield. They have no idea whose on what side, but they have a bigger problem: one of the players receives a reply from a sending scroll that goes: "Roger that, Charlie Unit. Meteor Strike Inbound, eta 5 minutes". [u/Djinn_Indigo]
        An alarm is blaring. In the dimly-lit barracks, a flashing light covers the entire room in blinding crimson every two seconds. Before you’ve even fully woken up, you find yourself and your companions being aggressively shouted-at in a foreign tongue. [u/ccstewy]
        You feel like you've been running through the woods for hours, and your pursuers never seem to drop back very far. You come across a stream that seems to flow in about the direction you're trying to go, so you jump into it to try to hide your scent. Unfortunately, that narrow stream turns out to be a narrow but deep, fast-flowing river, and you're swept away on the current. Roll a Dexterity save for half damage as you bang against the walls of the narrow torrent/get projected over the edge of a cliff in a waterfall. [u/Chessie-Cat]
        The lunar festival is going swimmingly. Everyone is drinking and dancing and having a merry time. The PC's are enjoying the festivities in their own way. You notice that a fight has started near the band, and another one near the tables, wait another fight has broken out. As you look closer, the festival goers seem to be transforming into flesh craving demons. Chaos has erupted at this peaceful festival. Roll initiative! [u/WalkingOnWire]
        In the dazzling aftermath of the massive flash of the spell going off, you shake your heads and rub your eyes. Your memory of the previous couple of days is missing and some other ship is attacking yours....! Roll initiative! [u/PaigeOrion]
        The party is riding along, singing, talking and enjoying a fine day until. Twang! An arrow comes shooting out of the woods and burying itself at the ground at their feet. Figures move in the shadows and steel glimmers. A lone figure steps out with bow and cowl draw. [u/Paintedoreo]
        As you round the familiar hill, the woods surrounding your hometown become visible. Your mouth waters with the instinctive anticipation of the first pint. Before your smile can reach the full corners of your mouth, your heart sinks as a billowing cloud of smoke begins to rise above the top of the trees followed by the sounds of terrified screams. Unconscious of when you began, you realize your companions are also running toward home at a dead sprint while similarly drawing their own weapons. [u/Egochecks]
        The party is walking through the capital city. As they pass a shadowed alley, a young woman in servant’s clothing stumbles out of the darkness and into them, crumpling to the ground. A nasty wound stains her side and she clutches a cloth bundle to her chest. In distance you hear the bells of the city start to ring and hounds baying. She whispers “The [ruler] is dead! Please get [it/her/him] to safety. [Cryptic hint]. Go, I’ll lead them away!!” She climbs back to her feet and runs away. The sound of the dogs grows louder. [u/WSHIII]
        It’s a sunny day and the weather is perfect for flying. The airship the party has booked passage on catches the perfect wind and the sails snap and bell in the gust, carving through the sky. Suddenly a boulder smashes into the side of the ship - you’ve wandered into the territory of a stone giant clan and they’re looking to bring you down. [u/WSHIII]
        The air fills with an electric buzz and your teeth start to hurt. A portal explodes open next to the party, knocking them all to the ground. A glowing form tumbles out and the portal slams shut with a thunderclap. As the party regains their feet, they see the mortally wounded solar gasp its last breath then dissolve into glowing mist which swiftly dissipates. On the ground, covered in glowing ichor and formed from some unknown crystal, lies a larger version of the [cleric/paladin/monk]’s deity. [u/WSHIII]
        PCs are patroling snowy mountains when they encounter a stranded galley. [u/Destriant_of_Perish]
        PCs are at the funeral of one of the PCs' brother. Soon they realize it was a murder. [u/Destriant_of_Perish]
        PCs live in small village when everyone is forced to evacuate due to approaching invading army. [u/Destriant_of_Perish]
    twists
        The cult sacrifices are actually to keep a big bad from awakening
        The assassin who attempted to kill the king is actually the real king. The sitting King is a doppelganger
        The quest giver's spouse or kin or ally is actually pulling the strings and causing the chaos.
        The quest giver is actually the evil one. The target group is made out to be evil but are actually the innocent.
        The dungeon crawl is just a test by the mad wizard to check his security.
        The DMPC is undercover to learn the strengths and weaknesses of the party.
        The dimwitted pickpocket is actually a very talented thief in the thieve's guild that was hit with a Feeblemind spell.
        The ghosts haunting the old mines are living people trapped in the ethereal plane. u/MildlyConcernedGhost
        The hag's cabin is where her power comes from. It corrupts those inside, luring them to become the next owner of the cabin. u/MildlyConcernedGhost
        The ancient beast frozen in the ice isn't the threat, it's the huge ice elemental that swallowed it. u/MildlyConcernedGhost
        The party's fixer actually has no overarching goal or employer, but he or she is just giving the party assignments and paying out of their own pocket because they want to spend time with one of the party members - DM options: Are they in love with the PC? Watching them for nefarious purposes? Lost parent or guardian? u/WSHIII
        The dungeon crawl is a psychic torture by a mind flayer/intellect devourer/other psychic beastie designed to make the party (currently held in stasis) go mad. Delicious, juicy, madness. u/WSHIII
        The kingdom actually has no ruler - their sovereign is an illusion controlled by one of the courtiers. The real ruler died years ago and the court wants to maintain control. u/WSHIII
        The drow/duergar raiders aren't taking people as slaves - they're taking them to find out information about the surface world and are planning for a mass exodus. Something is happening in the Underdark that is bad enough to scare them out of the dark u/WSHIII
        The PCs' weapons are ALL sentient (having been hit by a Mass Awaken spell maybe?) and have been secretly making their own plans. And you thought that attacks hit or miss because of some silly dice rolls? u/WSHIII
        The party's fixer has been sending them on missions to kill lots of low level vermin, kobolds, goblins, etc. The fix is secretly a necromancer, building up an unseen army of minions and party is doing all the "prep" for them. u/WSHIII
        The palace intrigue/gang turf war/cult rivalry/religious war is secretly a staged amusement for the lords of their respective parties. The fact that the party has bumbled into it and is now making a mess of everything means that it's the most entertainment the lords have had in years. u/WSHIII
        While travelling on the road, the party finds an old woman who begs the group to destroy a demonic statue that is poisoning her land. The statue is surprisingly easy to destroy. The party later finds out that the statue was the only thing protecting a nearby village from the evil witch. u/Forsaken_Earth
        The local lord has a bounty on a thief who stole his family heirloom. In truth, the thief switched bodies with the lord in a dark ritual, and thus the thief is the true lord. The heirloom has the ability to return him to his original body, but he needs to be within a certain distance. u/Forsaken_Earth
        A travelling merchant asks to travel with the party for safety, he offers some gold in payment. He tries (and fails) to murder one of the party members in their sleep. It becomes apparent that he clearly stole everything he has from a travelling merchant. Delivering him to a local official leads to a reward. u/Forsaken_Earth
        The party is tasked with stopping the Big Bad from seeking out an “Acient Power”. While the campaign appears take place in a medieval fantasy setting, it actually takes place in this world’s far flung future. A cataclysmic event, hinted at throughout the campaign, rendered all technology inert. As a result, civilization became reliant on analog conventions; torches, horse, written word. etc. This information is all revealed by the campagin’s Big Bad just before the final show down. The Big Bad goes on to explain the “Acient Power” he seeks is that last piece of functioning technology. u/hi2jeb
        The campaign exists in the past. Skip 200 years to the present, all the players stop playing their characters, and start playing their characters descendants (same class & level). The players get to see the long term ramifications of their actions, good or bad. And exist in that world. u/Venom1991
        The cleric of {good deity} who's been giving the party small objectives to secure the good deity's victory is actually an agent of the deity's enemies, and the party has unknowingly been hindering the deity's plans. 8. The local lord with the bandit problem? He's actually been on the bandits' side all along, and has successfully fooled his subjects this whole time. u/Hack_Cubit
        The king's assassination was a ruse to oust sedition in the court. He now seeks to return and punish those who squabble over his throne. u/supersnes1
        The benevolent deity being worshiped by the church is in fact a distorted aspect of a god of destruction. These followers work to rebuild and resolve the lands destroyed by the followers of the primary destructive aspect. Neither side realises they are the two parts to the one whole. u/supersnes1
        Quest-giver is an imposter who was caught while the party completed the quest. They return and have to explain their actions to an angry town and the real Quest-giver u/DoctorHatDengMan
        The sweet old innkeeper's wife (unbeknownst to her husband) is actually a drug dealer and is the reason for all the regulars there. u/flail_snail42
        The power-hungry mage wants to become a lich so he can stay with his loved one (a deity) forever. u/flail_snail42
        An NPC close to the party is actually some sort of shape shifter whose true form is a slug. u/flail_snail42
        The most recently purchased magic item was actually stolen. *The "delivery" quest with an accompanying NPC is actually an "escort" quest and the NPC is a disguised important figure and being hunted/chased. (A-la Transporter 3) *The quest giver actually only wants the items you were asked to retrieve to foil their rivals plans. Rival is good NPC. u/That_guy__15
        The entire game was created by the gods (e.g. the players) for their own amusement. The final battle sees the PCs given power by the Elder God (the DM) and fighting to defeat the gods who control them in order to break free and act on their own accord (each PC takes on the player who created them). u/Snoop1000
        The players are sent on a quest to save the world-ending threat. However, while this threat is dangerous and probably evil, it is not doing anything that will actually cause the world to end. An influential guild is playing up rumors that the world is going to end to profit off of the panic it causes. u/bxs9775
        Yes, the princess is in a distant tower guarded by a dragon, but she was not kidnapped by the dragon like all the rumors suggest. Instead she hid herself in a remote tower and enlisted the services of a dragon to keep away intruders, so she could complete a magic ritual without interruption. Unfortunately, all the heroes coming to “rescue” her are getting in the way of her plans… u/bxs9775
        The evil scheme that the players overheard was actually a local bard discussing the plot of his/her/their next work. u/bxs9775 (edit by me: and an obsessed wizard fan is creating the plot points perhaps?)
        The BBEG's tower is actually a massive stone golem. The destroyed villages, decimated armies, and widespread devastation thought to be caused by a powerful BBEG was actually caused by the tower golem. The BBEG is surprisingly easy to defeat, only because most of his power is used to keep the tower golem under control. Once the BBEG is defeated, the tower itself attacks the players. u/jjjmills
        The ghosts of executed "criminals" that you have been trying to exorcise or defeat are actually just trying to warn the victims that have been dying. The real killers are the people who have contracted you to get rid of them. u/Th3R3493r
        All the invading bandits you have been contracted to kill are actually natives of the lands who were pushed out of their homes. u/Th3R3493r
        The peace-loving, beautiful, and shy druidess who has been avoiding fights but still healing your party is actually a warlock who is trying to free her patron who is at the center of the forest being held in statis by a coven of druids. u/Th3R3493r
        PCs realise that the magic item they are on a quest to fetch is going to be delivered to the BBEG. u/Thepinkrabbit89
        Their favorite NPC—who they’ve grown to love—is actually involved in organised crime or has a twisted perverted secret. u/Thepinkrabbit89
        There is a wispy young woman with a 3-month-old baby. She's broke and desperate and haunted and hunted: she was seduced by a nefarious duke, then turned out of the castle while pregnant. She has the baby in a stable and lives on the fringes of a rural community until she finds out that the duke's only son died of the flux right after her baby was born: now she's on the run from both the duke and his still more nefarious uncle. The duke wants the baby to make it his heir; the uncle wants to kill it. She needs protection. The child is in fact the spawn of a duke of hell and is destined to do something unimaginably horrible if it is permitted to live to adulthood. The woman has no idea, believing it's the human duke's baby as does everyone else but the uncle, who's sorted out the truth but of course nobody believes him because they assuming he's lying out of self-interest. u/felagund
        You are contracted to slay a somewhat large (150-200) nest of goblins/kobolds/mobs in the middle of a forest, as they pose a threat to a not-too-distant trade road. Upon investigating, you notice it is an agrarian village, and the goblins are all wearing crude silver jewelry. The village sits right on top of a silver deposit. u/RollinThundaga. Hired to do the bidding of someone selfish in a position of power who needs something done for their own reasons, but dresses it up as something good. u/Thepinkrabbit89
        The characters hear about a druid that has gone missing and are sent to investigate. Trail leads to a village. Village provides them with monsters throughout the area that may have killed her. Reality: the peasants got mad and killed the druid. Her magic made the area fertile and beautiful ... but it put hundreds of farmers out of work. They rioted during a protest and killed her on accident. Village leadership is terrified that the truth will get out. There are people on the village council that have bullied the rest into silence (using fear) and use the characters arrival to expand the villages reach. The monsters had all been tamed or befriended by the druid to protect the villages. As they are killed hordes of critters get wind that the areas protections are gone. Rats, goblins, and typical "prey" fantasy species wreck utter havoc on the land. The villagers do everything to themselves. As the situation gets worse people become more and more afraid of the PCs. u/primeathos
        Here’s mine: the players are hired to recover a kidnapped child by an old woman. As they pursue the child’s kidnappers, they find increasing signs that the child was not kidnapped, but actually rescued. If they reunite the child with the woman, they find that she is actually a hag who seeks to devour the child. The “kidnappers” are actually another band of adventurers who happened to rescue the child during an encounter with the hag.Alternatively, have it instead revealed that the child is actually the offspring of the hag. The kidnappers were genuine kidnappers, but they were only stealing the child due to its immense magical potential- if the child grows up, they have the potential to become a hag of unprecedented power. This can be a good quest hook, as the child would be targeted by numerous third parties interested in controlling this asset. Meanwhile, this could open up an interesting moral storyhook along the lines of the “baby orc dilemma”. u/CorenNayturus
        You are contracted by a small group of homeless people who claim to have been making camp in the nearby woods. They say that their camp has been ravaged and destroyed, and they were chased out. Several of their comrades were killed, and a few of them are sporting deep stab wounds. They ask you to find the culprit and kill them so they can continue to live in safety. On investigation, it turns out a Unicorn has ousted them from the forest for hunting sacred animals. u/drewmana
        A beloved local lord's daughter has been kidnapped; unbeknownst to him, she willingly ran off with a tiefling/orc/(insert hated species here) paramour in order to escape abuse. The players have the choice of protecting the daughter and starting a bloody campaign against her paramour's people, deposing the local lord and plunging the region into anarchy, or bringing her home to suffer the whims of her violent, alcoholic father again. u/ScruffleKun
        Your Party finds a necromancer who has been raising the dead of the nearby villages. The more you kill, the worse the harvest comes in. The undead are just being used as workers as the plague took a lot of lives and the necromancer (a former mayor of a now dead town) had to make a choice of let everyone living starve or raise the dead to put and tend crops in the ground. u/Th3R3493r
        The party is hired by the local church to burn a pit of plague victims to contain the illness. The bodies are covered in ash and you are given a large bag of oil and torch. When you arrive to the last one, a starving but healthy person who is trapped in the pit. They claim the church paralyzing members of a rival church and leaving them in pits to die from exposure. As they begin to climb to the top of the pit, they will die from an eldritch blast as a church priest and posse emerges from the nearby trees tells the party to burn the bodies quickly to prove they are not infected. u/Th3R3493r
        In an empty village a young milkmaid that's actually a disguised demon asks them to clear out a cave of goblins. Warning them of an alchemist's trap near the front of the cave that looks like a line of salt along the entryway. While offering them something to drink she recommends breaking the line from a distance if possible and gives them directions to the cave. After they slaughter the "goblins" the spell fades and they realize they're surrounded by the bodies of (orphans/gnomes depending on Session 0). The demon reveals itself, harvests the souls and disappears leaving behind 30 SP in a human skin money pouch. u/HWGA_Gallifrey
        The party are hired to steal a shipment from local authorities that are known to be oppressive towards their population. But after stealing the shipment they discover that it was much needed medical supplies to treat a terminal illness. The authorities they stole it from have no intention of replacing it, and those who hired them to steal it have no need for it, they were just going to sell the stuff at outrageous prices. u/MyEvilTwin47
        As the party gains favor and fortune within the kingdom, the King summons them to give them a special mission. Long ago, before the untimely death of the previous King, a high ranking court official was last seen escorting him to the room his body would later be found in. This court official went missing and had never been seen or heard of until a clue to their whereabouts was found in the neighboring kingdom. When the party gets close to a break in their investigation, they are ambushed and knocked unconscious. They all awake, bound and tied, in the presence of the killer. The killer explains to the party that the current King is the who committed regicide, and they were scapegoated to secure the King's support among the nobles. Turns out the current King is the BBEG who is after a powerful magical item and wanted an entire kingdom to help him find it. He sent you to find this person with the order that you'd kill on sight and tie up loose ends for him. u/mindless_confusion
        They are sent by a cloaked figure of an old woman to kill some pesky Shadows out in the woods. Her cabin borders the woods and she gets the worst of it. "It needs to stop." she begs them. The shadows are seen huddling together near the base of a tree. When they return the Hag thanks them for their service and is ecstatic at the eerie silence they've helped make. Those Shadows belonged to the villagers who hid them in the woods to protect themselves from the Hag. The entire village is slaughtered...no wounds, no blood, as if they died right in the middle of what they were doing. u/HWGA_Gallifrey
        The party encounters a dog in the forest that is barking at a rock. Upon inspection, the rock appeats to have a button. When pressed, a door opens in the rock. The dog goes inside and looks if you follow. The dog assists you in defeating the enemies (but is not too powerful. At the end of the day it's a dog... Right?). When you get through the halls into a big room there are a few guards standing near the walls (I'd say 4 or so, depending on your party) that ready their spears as you enter. Then, they say "Welcome back master, should we kill these intruders?" If the party looks around/behind them, they will see that the dog is grinning. The dog was the boss; it was all a trap. The dog is a shapeshifter. Depending on your story, you could choose to take the party prison instead, or just outright fight them. u/Blubber28
    Setting Builder
        Organizations

            villany
                What Sort of Place is it?
                    1 Drug Den.
                    2 Bar.
                    3 Dodgy Marketplace.
                    4 Racetrack.
                    5 Gambling Den.
                    6 "Philanthropic" Organization.
                    7 Brothel.
                    8 Arena.

                What Sort of People Frequent It?
                    1 High-society types, the elite.
                    2 Criminals, ne'er do wells and blackguards.
                    3 Working class folk.
                    4 Travelers, tourists, pilgrims.
                    5 Ethnically, culturally or racially exclusive.
                    6 People of a certain faith.
                    7 Petty Bourgeoisie.
                    8 All walks of life.

                Who Runs It?
                    1 Criminals.
                    2 Some sort of powerful and sinister being.
                    3 Some sort of powerful and benevolent being.
                    4 A member of the elite.
                    5 A guild or trade organization.
                    6 Outsiders, from another polity.
                    7 A church or other form of cult.
                    8 Individually owned.
                
                What is Unique About It?
                    1 Built in or atop the corpse or bones of some great beast.
                    2 The owners have connections to smugglers and can arrange the purchase of illegal goods.
                    3 The location is protected from magical intrusion, including scrying.
                    4 No matter the time, the place is never closed, they will always accept customers.
                    5 The place is protected by the powers that be, there is little to no chance of being hassled.
                    6 A secluded room in the establishment is home to a portal or gate to another dimension.
                    7 The location of the establishment rotates or shifts over time or by a set schedule.
                    8 It requires a password, certain style of dress or invitation to enter.
            
            Law
                What sort of place is it?
                    1 Barracks/Guardhouse
                    2 Customs House
                    3 Guildhall
                    4 Prefect/Sheriff's Office
                    5 Military Order
                    6 Noble's Court
                    7 Temple
                    8 Elder's Abode

                What quality is the help you can receive here?
                    1 The extralegal kind. Conversely it is difficult to get the help the place is ostensibly supposed to provide.
                    2 As one would expect of the place, but the means to gaining it is excessively bureaucratic and roundabout.
                    3 The place functions normally, provided that you can bribe your way in.
                    4 The assistance is of high quality and without strings, but only the favored may avail themselves of it. Who is among the favored is determined by the leader.
                    5 Low, and without much zeal. They cannot turn anyone away, regardless of social strata.
                    6 High, but only citizens in good standing with the community are able to use the services.
                    7 Average, only those of a certain class can use it, such as those of a certain ethnicity or faith.
                    8 Average, however it is hopelessly overworked and the waiting list is at least 1d6 weeks long.
                
                What is the leader like?
                    1 Short tempered and overworked, but competent and dependable.
                    2 Distracted and half-hearted, a product of nepotism.
                    3 Kind, but ineffectual and relatively powerless in their own organization.
                    4 Domineering and power hungry, will try to utilize players to help themselves.
                    5 Eccentric and slightly bizarre with a focus on a hobby entirely unrelated to their own organization.
                    6 Responsible and busy, a true delegator who may have other obligations.
                    7 Prone to risky behaviors and indulging in vice, often needs to be talked out of poor courses of actions by their underlings.
                    8 Gregarious, with an eye towards expansion. May try to recruit or pressure the players into helping them.
                
                What is unique about it?
                    1 There are no doors, banners, tapestries or decorations - the better to spot potential assassins or thieves.
                    2 A familiar spirit has been bound to the place. Though it cannot affect the corporeal, it can protect against other incorporeal threats as well as observe intruders and warn the residents.
                    3 The place was made to be as self-sufficient as possible, there are areas set aside for the cultivation of food, a well and more.
                    4 The building which houses the organization is one of the largest and most reinforced in town, it finds use as a citadel when the community is threatened.
                    5 The structure is multi-purpose and extremely important. Many members of the community often visit every day, even if they have no need for services.
                    6 This particular organization is important to the wider world, perhaps they are a regional headquarters, perhaps they are the site of a pilgrimage. Regardless, the organization is notably wealthier than the community around them.
                    7 The organization is in possession of a holy relic, such as the bones of a saint. Extraplanar entities cannot enter the building without grievous harm coming to them.
                    8 The stones of the place have been enchanted somehow to prevent the use of teleportation magics. No one may safely use spells such as Blink, Dimension Door or Teleport within a mile of the building.

            Regions or communities
                Resources of the Community
                    1 Aquifer.
                    2 Non-Precious Stone or Metal.
                    3 Timber.
                    4 Range land.
                    5 Fishery.
                    6 Sap/Rubber.
                    7 Pelts/Game.
                    8 Precious Stone or Metal.
                
                Relative prosperity
                    1 Nearly exhausted. The community is likely dying if this is the only major resource in the area. The resource itself has nearly petered out.
                    2 Last legs. While there are some reserves left, it has grown increasingly clear to everyone that the good times are gone.
                    3 Hard times. If any one was on the precipice of leaving, they'll probably do so now.
                    4 Rough patch. The easy work has started to dry up; outsiders trying to make their fortune will not be welcome.
                    5 Business as usual. Residents have long ago developed a routine, the extraction is steady and the methods are all well known and effective.
                    6 Rising tides. People are rich, there's always a hunger for new laborers and the community is building for the future.
                    7 Flourishing. New claims are being made all of the time, the amount seems almost endless.
                    8 Boom Town. The amount of material they have on hand is enough to support their own needs, as well as several smaller outlying communities.
                
                General level of hazard
                    1 Hellish. Procuring the resource is almost more trouble than it is worth. Perhaps there are hostile beings or spirits guarding it, or it is in an area of active environmental peril.
                    2 Miserable. There could be aggressive or predatory creatures which lurk in the area, or it could be in a place which is unpleasant to work in, such as an area with constant inclement weather.
                    3-6 Normal. It is as dangerous to gather this material as it would be in real life.
                    7 Safe. The resource is well-managed and maintained, perhaps there is competent management, or the area itself has somehow been changed to ease the work.
                    8 Arcadian. It is so easy to find or secure more of the material that is is nearly worthless locally.

                What is unique about it?
                    1 The resources is contested, whether by another nearby community, or some sort of population or force which guards it.
                    2 While the quality of the material is objectively as high as any other location, it is widely thought of as being cursed or bringing ill-luck.
                    3 The material isn't naturally occurring, it is being drawn from the ruins or rubble of some previous civilization.
                    4 An annual ritual or sacrifice is required to keep the spirits or beings which inhabit the area satisfied. The consequences will be dire if the oblations aren't performed.
                    5 The resource requires a special treatment or process to be rendered safe to humanoids. This process is a closely guarded secret.
                    6 A guild or another similar organization controls access. Competitors can expect serious reprisals.
                    7 The quality of the resource from this area is renowned far and wide. It fetches an unusually high price.
                    8 Gathering the resource can only be done on a certain schedule. Perhaps it is underwater some of the year, or the path to access it is cut off for weeks or months on end.

            Shops
                What kind of shop is this?
                    1 Bank, or another sort of financial institution
                    2 Smithy or Manufactory
                    3 Drover/Caravansary
                    4 Kiln/Glassworks
                    5 University or other institution of learning
                    6 Hospital or some sort of healer
                    7 A crafter such as a tailor or haberdashery
                    8 An artist, such as a painter, sculptor or poet. 50% Chance of having a Patron.
                
                How's the business doing?
                    1 Collapsing. Whether through the incompetence of the owner(s) or outside factors, the business is falling apart and is likely up to it's eyes in debt.
                    2 Dwindling. The flow of customers or clients has almost dried up completely, though this may be the fault of the owner, rather than the community dying.
                    3-5 Steady. The business is profitable, but not so much that the proprietor is well to do.
                    6 Busy. The day is constantly packed with things to do, people to help.
                    7 Growing. Customers or clients find that they have to schedule in advance to get service. The business is looking for more help.
                    8 Bustling. There's more work than there are hands, and any new clients will have trouble getting what they want in a timely manner
                
                Who runs the place?
                    1 A family business, perhaps the founder is still alive, but just as likely it has been going for several generations.
                    2 A number of proprietors, perhaps only a pair, but maybe as large as a board.
                    3 A sole owner, who may or may not have any employees.
                    4 A distant and far away owner, such as a merchant prince or a noble. They likely have local representatives to look after their interests.
                    5 The business is ran by the local government, or is an extension of a government monopoly.
                    6 A cooperative or group of merchants, teachers or workers run the business.
                    7 The ownership is contested. This certainly does not bode well for the future.
                    8 Ownership of the business is unclear or actively obfuscated.

                What is unique about it?
                    1 The owner is getting the majority of their stock or funding from an illegitimate source, such as from smugglers or by acting as a front.
                    2 The product or training that the business provides is widely considered to be somehow corrupt or scandalous in some way locally. Patronizing it marks you as someone willing to overlook that reputation.
                    3 The business has paid protection money to local criminals. Any harassment or theft on the premises is going to be met with serious reprisals.
                    4 The business or institution is famous; they could have made some legendary item or trained or saved some notable personage.
                    5 Due to reasons inscrutable to those on the outside, the business is only open during certain times, such as during the night or certain seasons.
                    6 Doing business here is bound by some custom that may not only be immediately obvious, they may only accept patronage from a certain ethnicity, social class or faith.
                    7 Coin is not accepted here, only barter or service.
                    8 The business has no set locale or storefront, they may even serve several nearby communities as well.
            
            prison
                "So what's the lowdown on this place?"
                    1-3 Bars, stones, cells and blocks. A typical penitentiary.
                    4 Somewhere desolate and isolated, perhaps the side of a mountain or the endless expanse of the steppe. No bars are necessary because there's nowhere to go.
                    5 A slum or segregated area of either an existing city or structure, or perhaps one now given over entirely to the purpose. The area is walled off and the perimeter guarded.
                    6 Exile. Prisoners are dropped off on some (supposedly) uninhabited island. They're likely still under a watchful eye, but it is much smaller than it otherwise would be.
                    7 This place is more akin to a religious community than a true prison. Prisoners are enrolled as initiates and are required to go through certain rituals to be released.
                    8 The prison is a labor camp, perhaps prisoners are forced to work at various crafts, farm or they're simply on a chain gang.
                
                "How about the Cons?"
                    1-2 This is a place for hardened criminals - thieves, murderers, rapists and robbers. The folk here are likely violent and skilled in the ways of criminality
                    3 Debtors, those who owe the powers that be enough that they've been thrown in gaol to work off their debts.
                    4 Political prisoners. Folk who have fallen afoul of whatever temporal authority controls the penitentiary.
                    5 The inmates here are prisoners of war, taken in battle or surrender.
                    6 These souls are the victims of a religious purge or inquisition. They could be heretics, or they could be worshipers of an entirely other faith.
                    7 This place was built to house a special kind of inmate, Magic-users. It has additional layers of security, of course.
                    8 They're ghosts. This place was meant to shackle the souls of condemned beyond the grave as a form of additional punishment.
                
                "What are the Guards here like?"
                    1 Vicious and unrelenting, they are a well-paid monolith of authoritative violence.
                    2 Lazy and indolent, they will not notice all but the most egregious violations such as murders or escape attempts.
                    3 They have been utterly co-opted by a criminal group; the true masters of this place are whomever you rolled for "How about the other Cons?"
                    4 The guards are prisoners themselves, generally those who earned trust through following the rules. The upper hierarchy may be normal guards, or perhaps there may be periodic checks to ensure that the population hasn't changed.
                    5 Members of a religious order dedicated to punishment or otherwise oppression of criminals and the condemned.
                    6 The prison is guarded by wild animals and the elements. There may be border guards or occasional patrols, but they are few and far between
                    7 There are only a few guards, but they are preternatural in some way, ranging from Cerberoi and Minotaur to Spirits or Elementals.
                    8 There aren't any. Some sort of eldritch force keeps people here, from a curse to even a form of spell.
                
                "What kind of help can I get here?"
                    1 A snitch, with wary eyes and open ears. They're a fantastic source of information, but they may also be informing others about you.
                    2 A smuggler, with connections to the outside and a means to get things in. Smugglers will do most anything before revealing their sources.
                    3 A tough, frightening and capable of coercing near anyone into compliance.
                    4 A killer, skilled and predatory. Willing to murder nearly anyone for the right price.
                    5 A fixer, with the ears of the administration or the guards. They can arrange for the rules to be bent - for a favor.
                    6 A crafter, able to take disparate materials and turn them into damn near anything, from weapons to drugs or drink.
                    7 A kingpin, able to organize other prisoners (at least some of them) and to bend them towards their own ends.
                    8 A seer, priest or other form of magic-user who is able to communicate with the outside, or if given the materials and seclusion, cast spells.
            
            the People
                What is their general character?
                    1 Martial.
                    2 Urbane.
                    3 Faithful.
                    4 Agrarian.
                    5 Reserved.
                    6 Mercantile.
                    7 Peaceful.
                    8 Decadent.
                
                How are they Governed?
                    1 By a monster or eldritch being, such as a(n)...1: Fiend/Celestial, 2: Aberration, 3: Dragon, 4: Undead or Spirits.
                    2 A noble or member of royalty.
                    3 A Council, perhaps of elders or potentates.
                    4 Anarchy, law & order has broken down, or perhaps never existed in the first place.
                    5 Criminals. They've overwhelmed the proper authorities, or perhaps it was their town to begin with.
                    6 A Cabal, such as group of...1: Spellcasters, 2: Militants, 3: Merchants, 4: Priests. The cabal may be popular or they may be despised.
                    7 An Oppressor, such as a...1: Nearby polity, 2: Far-away empire, 3: Tyrant, 4: Puppet governor.
                    8 Democratically.
                
                What are they known for?
                    1 Fine crafts.
                    2 Being the site of a great battle.
                    3 The grave of a great king or hero.
                    4 Luxurious hospitality.
                    5 Livestock.
                    6 Physical prowess, such as...1: Swimming, 2: Hunting, 3: Agility, 4: Strength.
                    7 Skilled warriors or soldiers.
                    8 Knowledge or learning.
                
                What unique customs do they hold?
                    1 They are bound to service or stewardship of a(n)...1: Fiend/Celestial, 2: Military Order, 3: Faith, 4: Monster.
                    2 These people are nomadic, whether by inclination or necessity, the community is where they are.
                    3 Currency does not exist here, instead "gifts" & barter are the rule.
                    4 Justice here is decided by...1: The mob, 2: Combat, 3: Augury, 4: Written law.
                    5 The people here dress themselves in strange clothes or odd adornments.
                    6 They dwell in an odd or otherwise unusual living space such as...1: In trees, 2: Underground, 3: On or under water, 4: An animal or some other huge beast.
                    7 Interactions here follow a sort of script or tradition; it is taboo to break with them.
                    8 Fear or hatred is held here towards...1: Spellcasters, 2: A certain faith, 3: Members of a certain race or ethnicity, 4: Outsiders
            
            The Cruel presence
                Where did they come from?
                    1 Veterans.
                    2 Rebels.
                    3 Bored Gentry.
                    4 Foreign Invaders.
                    5 Cultists/Fanatics.
                    6 Indigenous Population.
                    7 Criminal Gang.
                    8 Government Oppressors.
                
                How do they approach fighting?
                    1 Savage, all out attacks. The bandits will fight without regard to their safety or future.
                    2 Ambushes, supported by ranged weapons. These folk will run as soon as they are discovered or the tide turns against them.
                    3 Assassinations. Skilled in stealth and infiltration, they will never commit to any sort of direct attack, nor will they be caught together as a group.
                    4 Cavalry, whether that be on the backs of horses, or something stranger like wolves or vehicles. They favor hit and run style tactics.
                    5 Disciplined Tactics/Planning. These are not mere bandits, but soldiers. They will use any and all means at their disposal to launch more effective attacks.
                    6 Unruly and ill-disciplined mobs. Members fight and flee as individuals, trusting in their own judgments.
                    7 Performance. This is all an act to try and extract what they want. They act tough, but in reality they are cowards, who will flee at the slightest hint of trouble.
                    8 Swindlers. They do not attack in any direct way, but rather seek to get what they desire through guile and deception. They may pretend to be someone else, or try to worm their ways into the community.
                
                Why are they here?
                    1 Plunder/Wealth.
                    2 Purge.
                    3 Conquest.
                    4 Specific goal, like a person, piece of territory or item.
                    5 Generational rivalry.
                    6 Religiously motivated.
                    7 Political/Civil conflict.
                    8 Under contract to do so.
                
                What is unique about them?
                    1 Someone important from a nearby community is an informant for the group in regards to the comings and goings there. They're far more aware of potential heists, targets or attempts at reprisals against them.
                    2 These bandits employ animals or monsters, whether magical or otherwise, to help them with their work.
                    3 The group is led by or is employing a spellcaster of some sort. They may have an enchanted item, or they may have the occasional back-up of the spell user.
                    4 The brigands are led by a strange being such as a...1) Dragon, 2) Fiend, 3) Celestial, 4) Aberration.
                    5 The bandits themselves are some strange or exotic beings themselves such as...1) Undead, 2) Time/Dimensional travelers, 3) Magically summoned, 4) Underground dwellers.
                    6 The marauder's hideout is somewhere near impossible for a small group to assault; a mountain fastness, a fort built upon a river sandbar, or a ship which simply sails away.
                    7 The agents are drawn from the population of the town itself! A conspiracy of silence supports the members.
                    8 They are not here of their own volition, they have been forced into their current position by disaster or ill-luck.

            The cult
                What kind of Cult is this?
                    1 Based around a single charismatic individual.
                    2 A mainline faith, pushed to extremes.
                    3 A new faith or mystery, perhaps from a far away land or inspired locally.
                    4 Hereditary in nature, passed along family lines or just a single gender.
                    5 Keeps to the old one(s).
                    6 A secret society, or another form of cryptic organization.
                    7 Decadent and listless, the members of this cult are in it for the thrill.
                    8 A doomsday cult, these folk believe that the world is ending soon, if not any day.
                
                What are they trying to accomplish?
                    1 A genuine exploration of their beliefs and inspirations. Note that this could still have negative connotations.
                    2 Summoning something, like a(n)...1) Aberration, 2) Fiend, 3) People from the Past/Future/Another Dimension, 4) Celestial.
                    3 Upheaval of the status quo or current government.
                    4 Engaging in some act unpalatable to the rest of society, like...1) Cannibalism, 2) Proscribed sexual acts, 3) Excessive drug or alcohol use, 4) Fight Club.
                    5 The death of some important figure, or more broadly, a faction.
                    6 The destruction of a rival faith, or any other faith.
                    7 Support and enrichment of it's members, whether that be through legal or illegal means.
                    8 Exploitation of it's members; roll again and ignore this result if rolled again. The second result is what they tell to new recruits.
                
                Where is their membership drawn from?
                    1 Ne'er do wells; criminals, beggars & transients.
                    2 The elite of society.
                    3 Working class folk, the salt of the earth.
                    4 All walks of life
                    5 Racially, culturally or ethnically exclusive.
                    6 A certain profession, such as fisher folk, merchants or farmers.
                    7 An isolated or otherwise insular folk.
                    8 Those who have been brainwashed, chosen or ensorcelled in some way.

                How do they operate?
                    1 Out in the open. They are passive, and unwilling to commit violence - unless their faith requires it.
                    2 Openly, with hostility and great abandon.
                    3 Clandestinely, with a vicious streak towards any who stumble upon them.
                    4 Covertly, those who discover them are met with bribes, cajoling and religious arguments.
                    5 The cult attempts to masquerade as a more pedestrian organization.
                    6 They recruit openly locally, but their true home is somewhere far away and hidden.
                    7 Through a cellular structure, each cell is kept ignorant of what the other is doing, but there is a secret architect lurking somewhere.
                    8 Coordinated through dreams, they move seemingly without communication.
            
            The major holiday
                What sort of holiday?
                    1 Religious, explicitly performing rituals and celebrations in regards to a faith.
                    2 Civic, sponsored by or in celebration of the prevailing government or society.
                    3 Cultural. A sort of blend of Civic and Religious holidays, cultural celebrations tend towards jovial atmospheres and often draw upon local folklore or legend.
                    4 Commemoration, set aside for mourning or celebrating some grand event.
                    5 Celestial, celebrating or noting something like an eclipse, lunar cycle, comet or similarly sidereal event.
                    6 Seasonal, focusing on the passage of one set of weather patterns for another.
                    7 Environmental, coinciding with the return of some plant or animal to the area.
                    8 Mixed. This day draws upon several sources, roll twice on this table and weld the results together.
                
                How widespread is observance?
                    1-3 A particular faith, sect or culture.
                    4 A small region such as a few villages or towns, perhaps even a city.
                    5 A large region such as a kingdom or an empire.
                    6 Members of a certain profession or guild.
                    7-8 Members of a certain race or ethnicity.

                What form do the proceedings take?
                    1-2 Public feasting, drinking and celebrations.
                    3-4 People are gathered for stories, speeches, songs and other forms of public performance.
                    5 A procession, from a civilized area to a ritual site.
                    6 Somber rituals, observances and sacrifices (whether they be living creatures or otherwise)
                    7 A ritualized competition or combat that could range from bloodless sport to free-for-alls which result in the deaths of one or more participants.
                    8 Certain norms and taboos are meant to be challenged during this festival; perhaps folk dress opposite to their normal gender expression, act in strange or transgressive ways, or debts may be forced to be forgiven.
                
                How long does it last?
                    1 Only a few hours, such as during the daylight hours or through the night.
                    2-5 An entire day.
                    6 Several days.
                    7 An entire week.
                    8 A month.
            
            treasure
                Who hid it? Why?
                    1 It was an accident, a shipment lost to random chance or calamity. For some reason it was never reclaimed.
                    2 A noble family, displaced by a revolt or disaster, hid their secret somewhere only they could find it.
                    3 A group of raiders or pirates, storing a score until it was safe to retrieve it.
                    4 Members of a religious minority, fleeing persecution.
                    5 An extremely powerful figure, such as a culture hero or particularly skilled spellcaster.
                    6 The treasure was part of a tontine or related to the retirement of the members. Everyone died before anyone could retrieve it.
                    7 The society surrounding the hidden treasure collapsed, and its location was forgotten.
                    8 The treasure was important in some way -- perhaps it was the site of votive offerings, or the location of a guild's vault -- and it was guarded. While most of it's sentinels have died or vanished, some may still be guarding it.

                Where does it lead to?
                    1 An isolated and deserted island.
                    2 Deep inside a cave or another subterranean region.
                    3 A religious site, such as a temple or a shrine.
                    4 The middle of nowhere, a barren place, far from any civilization.
                    5 Inside an urban area, currently inhabited or reduced to deserted ruins.
                    6 The bottom of the ocean or a lake.
                    7 A castle in the sky.
                    8 A celestial body, such as a planet or other plane of existence.

                And what's hidden there?
                    1-3 Riches! Glittering gold and prizes. The intrepid explorers receive (3d100 x 5) GP.
                    4 Pandora's Lament. An extremely powerful monster has been bound to this site. Opening where it is held releases it.
                    5-6 Cache of weapons - 50% chance to be magical, 50% chance to be make of an exotic material such as silver, obsidian or ivory.
                    7 Cultural artifacts and personal effects. Worthless to most, priceless to the right buyers.
                    8 Magical paraphernalia such as scrolls and potions, maybe even a spellbook.
                
                What form does the map take?
                    1 The classic treasure map. Made of vellum, inked, and showing off a simple guide to the terrain leading to and around the score. 50% chance that the map is in multiple parts
                    2 The map is relatively well-known regionally and it takes the form of a local legend such as a story, poem or song.
                    3 A strange and bizarre device, such as a potion which makes one recall the memories of one of the people who hid it.
                    4 A cipher, puzzle or some other form of riddle.
                    5 The map is hidden within the patterns of a natural feature, such as a set of holes within a hillside, or the shadows of a grove of trees.
                    6 One of the people (or a descendant of one) responsible for hiding the treasure is spilling the location to people. The party are certainly not the only ones who have caught wind of it.
                    7 The map is split between a number of people, no more than a half-dozen, all of whom have a piece of it.
                    8 There is no map - there are only the remaining notes (and possibly spirits) of those who hid it. They must be searched or interrogated for the location.

            Disaster
                What caused this?
                    1-4 Random accident has conspired against the community. No one in particular is responsible.
                    5 The Gods themselves have been offended. A Sacrifice was not made, a sacred animal or a priest was murdered, or someone has committed some other terrible transgression. Further recompense may be necessary.
                    6 A dark ritual or curse is targeting the community. The calamity may the goal or merely a side-effect. This may only be a prelude.
                    7 A prophecy has come to pass. It was written in the ancient scrolls, and you were fools to have ignored them.
                    8 This is a knock-on effect, of another disaster. Roll again, adding another catastrophe on top of the first.
                
                What kind of catastrophe is it?
                    1 An invasion, whether in the form of bandits, a foreign foe or even something as pedestrian as locusts or weevils.
                    2 Plague, deadly enough that healing magic has no means to arrest it.
                    3 A natural disaster, such as an earthquake, tsunami or volcanic eruption.
                    4 Climate related disaster, such as an unusually long and intense rainy season, or a parching drought.
                    5 A weather related event, such as a tornado, hurricane or wild fire.
                    6 An explicitly magical event, such as a sourceless tune which forces listeners to dance or the dead beginning to rise from their graves.
                    7 Blight and pestilence. It leads to the the death of any crops and livestock which are afflicted.
                    8 A bizarre and fortean event, such as a rain of frogs or the waters within a river or lake turning to blood.
                
                What is the scale of the devastation?
                    1 Only a few families, or perhaps a couple of buildings.
                    2-3 The equivalent of a small town or village.
                    4-5 A city, or several villages or towns.
                    6-7 An entire region or province.
                    8 The entirety of a country, empire or kingdom.
                
                How is the community dealing with this?
                    1 Nonchalance. This event is a regular occurrence, to the point where most folk pay it no mind.
                    2 A doomsayer has appeared, promising to solve what vexes the community if they merely commit a few unspeakable acts. People are listening.
                    3-4 Mild panic. There are runs on stores, hoarding and small bouts of interpersonal violence, but no breakdown in law and order.
                    5 Severe panic. Looting, burning, combat in the streets.
                    6 Open revolution. The followers are blaming the leaders, and are planning on holding them responsible through violent means.
                    7 Mass exodus. Everyone flees the area as fear seizes them.
                    8 Resignation and apathy have overtaken them. The disaster seems inevitable, so they no longer see the point in struggling.
                
            Who killed?
                Who got killed?
                    1 Mayor/Village Elder/Chief
                    2 Magic User
                    3 Local Hero
                    4 Noble
                    5 Vagrant/Visitor
                    6 Notable Criminal
                    7 Well-to-do Citizen
                    8 Poor Citizen
                
                Who killed them?
                    1 Notable Criminal
                    2 Obscure Criminal
                    3 Well Known Citizen
                    4 Obscure Citizen
                    5 Kin to Victim
                    6 Vagrant/Visitor
                    7 Someone at the behest of another. Roll twice on this table, ignoring this result, as well as the following. The first result is the murderer, the second is the one who asked for it.
                    8 A number of people; this can be as few as a pair, as many as a conspiracy. Roll 1d6+1, that's the number of conspirators. Roll again on this table that many times, ignoring this result and the previous (unless you'd like the possibility of Dune level shenanigans)
                
                How'd they do it?
                    1 An animal, whether it be magical or otherwise. Kicked them in the head with a horse, had a dog maul them, hid a basilisk in their closet...
                    2 A directed weapon, from a candlestick, knife or firearm - perhaps even just a large rock - the variations are endless, but the results are the same.
                    3 Something which initially seems like an accident; a fall, drowning, or an overturned candle turned inferno.
                    4 With their bare hands, by strangling or beating them to death.
                    5 Poison, whether in their food, drink, or something more exotic.
                    6 A trap, whether that be a literal booby trap or sabotage to make something mundane into something dangerous.
                    7 Deprivation; this can be by starvation, dehydration or exposure. This also generally implies some sort of imprisonment or form of restraints.
                    8 Magic. A spell, a magical item, a curse, or some other manifestation of unnatural power.
                
                Why'd they do it?
                    1 Money
                    2 Romantic differences
                    3 Fury
                    4 Religious reasons
                    5 Compulsion - magical or otherwise.
                    6 Property
                    7 Secrets
                    8 Accident and cover-up
            
            Nice book?
                Who Authored it?
                    1 Precursors or the inhabitants of a previous reality.
                    2 The work of a deity, saint or otherwise somehow divine in origin.
                    3 A powerful mage or other form of spell caster.
                    4 An aberration such as a(n)...1: Illithid, 2: Aboleth, 3: Neogi, 4: Beholder.
                    5 An outsider such as a(n)...1: Celestial, 2: Fiend, 3: Elemental/Genie, 4: Fae, or someone possessed by one.
                    6 The culmination of the efforts of generations of scholars.
                    7 Author was taken by a eerie mood and wrote the work in a fortnight.
                    8 It merely appeared one day, fully formed.
                
                What Form Does it Take?
                    1 Tablets made of...1: Stone/Clay, 2: Metal, 3: Wax, 4: Wood.
                    2 Tome bound in...1: Leather, 2: Metal, 3: Ivory, 4: Loose Sheaves.
                    3 Scroll crafted of...1: Paper, 2: Hides, 3: Leaves, 4: Cloth.
                    4 Graffiti, Scrawling or Runes etched onto a...1: Structure, 2: Natural Feature, 3: Path or Road, 4: Cave.
                    5 Tangles of intricate ropes and beads in a language that may not still be known. May be read in the dark.
                    6 A puzzle box or similar device. The secrets within are whispered into the mind of those who solve it.
                    7 Scrimshawed upon the bones of a(n)...1: Humanoid, 2: Outsider, 3: Aberration, 4: Monster. May be read in the dark.
                    8 Woven into the fabric of a(n)...1: Article of clothing, 2: Tapestry, 3: Blanket/Quilt, 4: Tent/Yurt
                
                What Kind of Lore is Inside?
                    1 The true names of...1: Celestials, 2: Fiends, 3: Genies, 4: Fae.
                    2 Exhaustively indexed knowledge on an extremely niche topic such as Elven Architecture or Goblin Poetry. Worth a small amount to most, but a huge sum to the right collector.
                    3 A creeping form of madness which provides insight into the world. In exchange for losing one's mind permanently, the bearer of the work may ask it questions and gain answers 1d6 times per day as if they were using the spells Find the Path, Augury, Identify or Clairaudience.
                    4 A compendium covering the habits and weaknesses of...1: Outsiders, 2: Aberrations, 3: Magical Creatures, 4: Undead.
                    5 The true and secret history of a...1: Major empire, 2: Noble family, 3: Trade league, 4: Faith/Cult.
                    6 Prophecies relating to the...1: End of the world, 2: Death of a deity, 3: Fall or destruction of a major empire, 4: Death of a famous figure, such as a warlord or archmage.
                    7 Insight into a complicated and fraught magical process such as...1: Summoning outsiders, 2: Alchemy, 3: Reviving the dead, 4: Creating constructs such as golems.
                    8 Detailed accounting ledgers of a...1: Trade league, 2: Noble family, 3: Guild, 4: Town/City Council.
                
                Is it Trapped or have Guardians?
                    1 Animates a mouth upon its surface and bites those who try to read it without the proper password. 1d6+3 Bludgeoning damage. Bites again every 2d10 rounds.
                    2 Lets out a blood-curdling scream and flies away at 60' turn if read anywhere except...1: Under the stars, 2: Within a chamber with no natural light, 3: Upon unworked earth, 4: A place of spiritual significance.
                    3 Locked. If an attempt is made to force it open it begins to weep gallons upon gallons of...1: Blood, 2: Ink, 3: Water, 4: Ichor.
                    4 The work is a keystone or plug of sorts, if removed or reproduced then...1: The area containing the work shakes itself to bits in 1d6 minutes, 2: Undead begin to appear around where the work is held, 3: Animals of all stripes become hostile to whomever bears it, 4: Bad luck follows the bearer, the referee may impose disadvantage on 1d2 rolls per day at their discretion.
                    5 A cult or religious order is dedicated to safeguarding the work in some way. If it is stolen of copied without consent then they will surely seek to rectify the situation.
                    6 Magically bound to defend the work in some way until their destruction, the guardian takes the form of a(n)...1: Powerful undead creature, 2: Outsider, 3: Monster, 4: Construct.
                    7 Only certain type of folk are able to read the work, it is gibberish to everyone but...1: Non-spellcasters, 2: Followers of an obscure faith, 3: The mad, 4: Someone who has never taken a life.
                    8 The work itself is famous. While there is no one specifically looking for it, the very news of it changing hands may attract unwanted attention to those who now have it.

            mercenary/ military
                What kind of warriors are these?
                    1 Light Infantry, trained to do battle loose-order and to fight as raiders, scouts and skirmishers. They are equipped with a mix of ranged and melee weapons.
                    2 Heavy Infantry, troops meant to fight in pitched battle and in line, these folk are equipped with the heaviest weapons and armor that they can afford.
                    3 Light Cavalry possessed of fleets mounts and raged weapons. These troops are talented marauders and scouts and will eagerly run down any retreating enemies.
                    4 Heavy Cavalry, meant to shatter the enemy with brutal charges. These mounted warriors are heavily armed and armored, with mounts large and powerful enough to carry them.
                    5 A siege train, which includes transports, specialists and ammunition. These could take the form of cannon, rams, sappers or even stranger things.
                    6 Ranged troops, whether they are equipped with bows, crossbows or firearms, these soldiers will do their best to stay far away from the enemy and pepper them with missiles.
                    7 Privateers, using whatever kind of vessel is appropriate for the setting. Most commonly this means a sea-going ship, but this could also mean a river vessel or even something more exotic like an airship.
                    8 A mixed force, roll twice on this table (ignoring this result if it comes up again) to determine what kind of soldiers make up this varied unit.
                
                How numerous are they?
                    1 A small handful, perhaps just a dozen
                    2 Several squads, comprising a couple of units and several dozen troops.
                    3 A company, including several officers, which number a little over a hundred in total.
                    4-5 A cohort, hundreds of battle-ready soldiers and their attendant camp followers.
                    6-7 A brigade or legion, several thousand soldiers, along with their support staff, commanders and wagon train.
                    8 A veritable army, comprising ~20-30,000 soldiers, along with command staff and various support troops.

                Who leads them?
                    1 A noble, fallen from glory and perhaps even exiled from the land of their birth. Their leader is likely skilled at both battle and diplomacy, but they are consumed by bitterness from their state and will likely do nearly anything to rectify it.
                    2 These troops mutinied against their officers, and are commanded by the former ringleaders. the ringleaders have grouped themselves into a council, and will vote on important decisions. Discipline and uniformity is likely lax.
                    3 A soldier's soldier, someone who has fought their way through countless campaigns and has risen to a position of command. They are likely skilled in the arts of war and death, but lack tact.
                    4 A member of the nobility in good standing. Their troops are likely drawn from lands the noble's family controls. The Noble isn't likely a mere adventurer, they are looking to advantage their family or themselves.
                    5 These are mercenaries in name only, they are barely better than bandits in behavior and their leader is no exception. Likely a vicious killer themselves, the commander of this band keeps control through violence and bribery.
                    6 Founded as a money-making endeavor, the commander of this group is more akin to a merchant than a warrior. The leader is likely skilled at negotiating contracts and sniffing out profitable battles.
                    7 Led by a devout worshipper of a deity, the troops have been enticed or forced into the worship of their commander's god. Whether or not their devotion is true, their leader's is, and they will use the miracles granted by their deity to help them in battle.
                    8 A spellcaster, known for their strange and often baffling ways, leads this group by dint of their abilities. They will aid their folk with spells and mystical knowledge.

                How skilled are they? Are they loyal?
                    1 Rabble, hardly a cut above levies. They are cowards, who will run if the battle goes against them (-2 to all Morale checks), they are however extremely cheap (-40% to costs)
                    2 Decently trained and equipped, but they lack motivation (-1 to all Morale checks) and they have little care towards their own reputations. They will betray their employer if given a better offer.
                    3-5 Average pay for average skill. They have been trained to acceptable standards, but are nothing special beyond having a reputation for loyalty.
                    6 Well drilled and disciplined (+1 to all Morale checks) troops with an iron-shod reputation.
                    7 The elite, the cream of the crop (+2 to all Morale checks, +1 all Attack rolls). They are brave and unshakably loyal, but they are hideously expensive (+40% to costs)
                    8 Elite (+2 to all Morale checks, +1 all Attack rolls) soldiers who know all too well their own worth. They cost more (+20% to costs) but that coin does not win their loyalty. They fight for whoever pays them most, even switching sides in the midst of battle.

            subdemensions or planes
                How do you get in?
                    1 Sacrifice: 1 - Blood, 2 - Life, 3 - Wealth, 4 - Food/Drink.
                    2 Stars are Right: 1 - Solstice, 2 - Eclipse (any kind), 3 - No Moon, 4 - Full Moon.
                    3 Time: 1 - Daybreak, 2 - Noon, 3 - Sunset, 4 - Midnight.
                    4 Weather: 1 - Clear & Sunny, 2 - Windy & Raining, 3 - Snowing, 4 - Drought.
                    5 Feeling: 1 - Hate, 2 - Love, 3 - Fear, 4 - Pride.
                    6 Song: 1 - Local nursery rhyme, 2 - Bawdy tavern tune, 3 - Local dirge, 4 - Love song from a far away land.
                    7 Ritual: 1 - Worship, 2 - Combat, 3 - Lovemaking, 4 - Bargain.
                    8 Test: 1 - Puzzle, 2 - Faith, 3 - Riddle, 4 - Skill.

                What or Who is inside?
                    1 Prisoner: 1 - Outsider, 2 - Great Old One, 3 - Hero, 4 - Deity.
                    2 Treasure: 1 - Wealth, 2 - Arms & Armor, 3 - Books & Scrolls, 4 - Fine Art
                    3 Artifact: 1 - Guarded by a powerful creature, 2 - Surrounded by arcane and mechanical traps, 3 - Locked behind a devilish puzzle, 4 - Laying in the open.
                    4 Tomb: 1 - Memorial to a dead god, 2 - Monument to a vanished culture, 3 - Grave site of a powerful culture hero, 4 - Ossuary of dishonored dead.
                    5 Abandoned: 1 - No trace of anything, 2 - Signs of a violent struggle, 3 - Dusty and desiccated remains, 4 - Fresh & bloody corpses.
                    6 Community: 1 - Scholar's retreat, 2 - Precursors, 3 - Religious Sect, 4 - Squatters.
                    7 Threat: 1 - Powerful, hard to kill beast, 2 - Dangerous spell or magic, 3 - Alien invasion force, 4 - Deadly disease or virus.
                    8 Portal to another place or time: 1 - Future, 2 - Past, 3 - Somewhere nearby, 4 - Somewhere far away.

                What is the environment like?
                    1 Natural Terrain: 1 - Mountains, 2 - Forest/Jungle, 3 - Desert, 4 - Wetlands.
                    2 Fractured: 1 - Temporal Distortions, 2 - Floating chunks of land, 3 - Flatland, 4 - Ghost world, overlaid with reality.
                    3 Subterranean: 1 - Caves, 2 - Worked stone halls, 3 - Volcanic tunnels, 4 - Hollow Earth; roll again on this table and use another result.
                    4 Elemental: 1 - Air, 2 - Earth, 3 - Fire, 4 - Water.
                    5 Alien: 1 - Barren rock, 2 - Gas Giant, 3 - Space station, 4 - Comet.
                    6 Structure: 1 - Tent, 2 - Castle, 3 - Wooden abode, 4 - Skyscraper.
                    7 Void: 1 - White and featureless, 2 - Black and featureless, 3 - Unending and gloomy fog, 4 - Endless reflections of whatever is already inside.
                    8 Vehicle: 1 - A Cart or Caravan, 2 - Boat or Ship, 3 - Spaceship, 4 - Airship or some other flying contraption.
                
                Who or What made it?
                    1 Eldritch: 1 - A Wizard did it, 2 - Experiment gone awry, 3 - Psionics, 4 - Repeated plane shifting.
                    2 Cult: 1 - Long since vanished, 2 - Still active and defending the area, 3 - Forgot about their own creation, 4 - Actively trying to destroy the portal.
                    3 Deity, who is: 1 - Still active and watching the area, 2 - Alive, but has forgotten their creation, 3 - Long vanished, 4 - Dead, murdered by their enemies.
                    4 Precursor race, who are now: 1 - Long dead, 2 - Devolved into savagery, 3 - Nomads, barely clinging on, 4 - In some kind of stasis nearby.
                    5 Outsider: 1 - Celestial, 2 - Fiend, 3 - Great Old One, 4 - Interdimensional invaders
                    6 Natural: 1 - Leyline, 2 - Conjunction of the spheres, 3 - Overlaid with Astral location, 4 - Left over from Creation.
                    7 Technology: 1 - Crashed space ship, 2 - Long forgotten artifice, 3 - Byproduct of some strange engine, 4 - Experimental device.
                    8 Catastrophe: 1 - Battle, 2 - Death of a powerful Outsider/Deity/Magic-User, 3 - Destruction of an Artifact, 4 - Weapon of terrible power.
                
                How do you get out?
                    1 Song: 1 - Local nursery rhyme, 2 - Bawdy tavern tune, 3 - Local Dirge, 4 - Love song from a far away land.
                    2 Sacrifice: 1 - Blood, 2 - Life, 3 - Wealth, 4 - Food/Drink.
                    3 Feeling: 1 - Hate, 2 - Love, 3 - Fear, 4 - Pride.
                    4 Test: 1 - Puzzle, 2 - Faith, 3 - Riddle, 4 - Skill.
                    5 Ritual: 1 - Worship, 2 - Combat, 3 - Lovemaking, 4 - Bargain.
                    6 Fasting: 1 - Food, 2 - Sleep, 3 - Sex, 4 - Drink.
                    7 Relinquishment: 1 - Anything gained inside, 2 - Carried clothing, 3 - Any food or drink, 4 - Knowledge, in the form of a journal or log.
                    8 Magic: 1 - Casting a resonant spell, 2 - Praying to an appropriate deity, 3 - Death or destruction of an inhabitant or local object, 4 - Asking for permission from the plane itself.

                How big is it?
                    1 Fairly tiny, a couple of rooms
                    2 A small house, three or four rooms.
                    3 Huge house, eight or nine rooms.
                    4 Mansion, a dozen rooms.
                    5 Small building, a couple of blocks.
                    6 County fair or estate.
                    7 A country or small kingdom.
                    8 Small continent.

        Town roller

            d4 | Town Square
            Water Well
            Bonfire
            Open Market/Bazaar
            Statue or Shrine

            d6 | Lodging
            Relatively safe clearing near town
            Generous Citizen with Vacancy
            Open-Air Campground
            Spare Building (Barn, Empty Home)
            Communal Lodge
            Inn

            d8 | Food
            Plentiful wild game/fish
            Generous Citizen with Food
            Public Vegetable Garden
            Communal Potluck Meals
            Open Pit Barbecue
            Smokehouse
            Marketplace
            Tavern

            2d10 | Shops
            General Store
            Alchemist/Herbalist/Healer
            Blacksmith (Armor, Weapons, Tools)
            Carpenter (Boats, Buildings, Wagons)
            Clothing (Common, Fine)
            Enchanter/Hex Den
            Glassblower
            Leatherworks (Armor, Saddlery)
            Stables
            Exotic Goods (Carpets & Cloth, Jewelry, Perfumes, Curio)


            d12 | Economic Touchstone
            Crossroads
            Crops
            Livestock
            Docks/Harbor
            Ferry/Major Bridge
            Fishery
            Holy Site/Source of Magical Power
            Mill
            Mine
            Trade Hub
            Defense (Barracks, Defending a Strategic Location or Road, Gatehouse, Training)
            Production Industry (Shipyards, Ironworks)

            d20 | Landmark
            Wizard’s Tower (Active, Abandoned)
            College (Arcane, Bardic, Scholarly)
            Combat Training School
            Church/Shrine/Temple
            Fighting Pit
            Tended Gardens
            Guild Hall (Craft, Trade, Fighter, Thieves)
            Library/Knowledge Repository
            Lighthouse or Watchtower
            Racetrack (Dogs, Horses)
            Ruins (Castle, Cathedral, Shipyards)
            Sealed Cave Entrance
            Skirmish Aftermath (Neighboring Town, Invading Horde, Rampaging Beast)
            Spiritual Lodge
            Standing Corporal Punishment Fixture (Stocks, Gallows, Chopping Block)
            Theater/Amphitheater
            A River Runs Through It
            Build into a Hill- or Mountain-Side
            Built into a Canyon or Ravine
            Surrounded by Forest/Wilderness

        unique town features
            There is a unusually large concentration of sky iron (meteoric iron) in the nearby hills.
            In ancient times, these lands were flooded with lava from the nearby volcano. Today, the volcano lies silent, long since extinct, fertile soil is plentiful, and signs point to the possibility of veins of adamant (the main component of adamantine) underground.
            The water from the lake is not only extraordinarily pure, it contains minerals that help to promote good health.
            The nearby caves contain crystals made of concentrated magic.
            A dangerous portal to Yggdrassil (built to keep the baddies from comin out)
            An alchemy ingredient only farmed there like miniature bullette farms for their unfertilized eggs to make an omelette of digging giving you a burrow speed of 5' or 10' with a pick or shovel.
            Self aware water weirds gather fish for the nearby gnomes who then buy water from other sources with the fish money to feed the water weirds. They were influenced by the gnomish goodness long enough to change their attitude
            The hills around and in the village are actually giants’ skeletons, long since grown over in a graveyard forgotten.
            A giant domino piece. If the piece comes down the whole city comes down with it one building at a time.
            An abandoned cursed royal palace which has the corpses of the royal family and the previous king inside. People call the city the “Dead Capital” because of this.
            Has a giant sleeping monster under it, with parts of its claws, feet, mouth and tail in different underground places of the town (abandoned houses basements, sewers, etc...)
            A shrine to an unknown god, that gets regular blessings and sacraments
            A legend of an animal that saved a child from a lake, and the village was the original settlers who protected the animal out of respect
            Some unique flowers that make a honey that had unique properties
            A bio-dome/micro climate
            Highly Magical city that binds underneath a sleeping tarrasque - Stolen from somewhere else
            The village is protected by an invisibility bubble in the middle of a forest
            The village is only accessible by a lifting bucket, as it is in the middle of a tight mountainous land - think the Greek Meteora monastery
            The town is a thieves guild operation center and has all kinds of subterranean tunnels leading outwards, and connecting major buildings
            A giant spire enables ordinary people to cast Sending across the continent
            An ancient battle between giants and Dragons have filled the area with giant skeletons and weapons. People have used these as a foundation for their houses.
            The entire town is built around a school that teaches magic. As a result everyone can cast some magic.
            For some reason, the chickens grow real big here. Like turkey-size, not T-Rex size. Eggs are bigger, too. Nobody knows why.
            Eons ago, a gargantuan semi-magical whale died here. Its blubber has seeped through cracks in the rock under the earth, and can occasionally be found dripping from cliffs on the side of the hill that formed above the carcass. The blubber can be used for lamps, greasing axles, and many other uses. There is a thriving mining industry exporting the blubber to the nearby towns and cities, but it's becoming harder and harder to find usable veins of blubber.
            A pleasant song constantly plays on the very edge of hearing. The town is tranquil and peaceful; arguments are resolved amicably, and fights never break out amongst the residents. If outsiders come into town and attempt to fight, they will find that any lethal attacks or spells suffer a flat -5 damage reduction. Nonlethal attacks are unaffected.
            The trees in the forest surrounding the town are slightly sentient. Unusually fast-growing, they built up a surplus of dried and seasoned branches still attached to the tree. Anybody walking through the forest holding at least one twig of dry firewood will find branches dropping in neat circles around trees near them. There's no need to wear a helmet: the trees are careful not to hit anybody. In return, the villagers divert a portion of their manure and compost to fertilizing around the trees, and allow their goats to graze in the forest, eating plants that compete with the trees. When the town is about to be in danger, the trees will start dropping healthy branches with leaves, alerting villagers in time to build defenses.
            A large geyser or hot spring.
            The center of town is always raining. No one knows why. It's suspended that is magic from an ancient wizard, and no one is able to stop it.
            A feral cat that lives in town. All the people worship the cat, despite the fact that it seems like a normal cat.
            A medium size boulder. Nothing particularly special about it. Just a kinda large rock
            Cliff dwellers who mine guano from an extensive network of deeper, bat infested caves, and who exports fireworks.
            A cosmopolitan atoll inhabited by folks who are comfortable living both above and below sea level.
            A town atop a mesa that breeds and trains griffons and other winged mounts.
            A giant metal rod has been left in a field over the ages people tried to investigate it but had no luck in finding out why it was there. Eventually people built a town around this pole and now there can always be sure of a thunderstorm in the town. The townspeople used this to their advantage and are now leading in the use of electrical appliances
            An obelisk at the center of town fairly hums with magical power. All the townsfolk can tell you about it is that it brings good health and prosperity to the town. You learn that they’ve never had a blight to their crops in the town’s history, and neither flood nor drought afflicts then either. A child skips happily around the town square, proclaiming it is her birthday. Indulgently, you ask how old she is today, and you’re shocked when she proclaims herself to be 50 years old today. The other children chime in with their ages, and you’re surprised that the older teenager minding them proclaims herself to be 96 years old! The people of this town know no illness. They know no hunger. The river of time flows slowly around them, and the elders remember fondly the founding of the town hundreds of years ago. They all attribute the town’s happiness and good fortune to the obelisk, but none seem to find this odd.
            The town is built on a literal mountain of bodies and populated by friendly undead residents.
            Thick heavy forest with dangerous creatures that refuse to pass the tree line where the town was built. There are ancient glowing stones dug deep into the ground in a circular pattern around the city and nobody knows the origin of them as it has been lost with time.
            Built on an island in the middle of a river. The river splits in two, creating a sizable chunk of land before merging below the city again. a Rock escarpment in the upstream portion of the island provides a base for a considerable citadel with which to observe (and tax) the river traffic.
            The town is built next to a giant mining pit. The mining company has long since moved on because the lode of copper went dry. The pit is wide and deep. The town has a bad habit of casting things to get rid of into the pit. Offal. Chamber pots. Criminals. You know... garbage. Once a year, however, on Hextor's Eve, things cast in the pit tend to come back.
            A town build around the harvest of Giant Bee honey. The fields are well pollinated and the honey the bees produce is known far and wide to be a delicacy but harvesting it is not for the faint of heart...
            Wolfpine. A big pine that smells like wet dog. Keeps wild animals from wondering into town
            The town is built on top of an unusual “island” that occasionally moves, looks suspiciously like a turtle shell and freshly boiled fish are often found along the beaches of this “island”. The townsfolk all worship some strange turtle-like deity.
            The town is built along the edge of, and in the sides of, the place where the god fell (an impact crater, visually) - the god's residue still lingers, harvested by magic-users in secret, and guarded by priests.
            A cabal of evil wizards created a permanent gate to the nether realms. They were defeated and the gate locked by a group of adventurers, but they weren't able to fully close it. The energies that leak out around the lock attract evil beings, who in turn attract heroes to fight them, and who in turn attracted shopkeepers who knew the real way to become rich wasn't to go adventuring but to sell swords to the adventurers.
            The town exists at the exact center of a large anti-magic zone, making it ideal for people on the run from some magic-user or merchants who don't want to see a fourth business go up in fireballs.
            Long ago, the avatar of a agriculture deity was sacrificed here. The fallout from her death fertilized the land and has ensured good crops ever since.
            The town is built up around an oasis which provides a vital resource not found anywhere else nearby. This could be water in a desert, air in an undersea kingdom, or just dependable rules of reality in a chaotic far realm.
            A gigantic corpse of some elder god floats in the void. A mining colony sprung up to harvest body parts for all manner of alchemical and magical reagents. Adventurers come to bid on the lucrative contracts to protect the miners from still active antibodies and parasites.
            A fishing village is built mainly upon the side of a gigantic karst just offshore, accessible by wooden stairways and rope ladders. Those with particularly strong ties to nature (or geology) recognize that this karst is not made of stone, but is actually the petrified remains of a titanic tree that once rose out of the ocean.
            At the center of a large crater there is a large spring of fresh water, the only source of drinkable water within a hundred miles (a desert, tundra, swamp, or arid savanna). The crater itself is lush and green - nearly tropical, even - and the people enjoy a comfortable existence. However, the inhospitable landscape around the crater leaves the townsfolk unable to travel, and news barely ever reaches them.
            A geyser at the center of a village deep within the taiga erupts, with clockwork regularity, at noon every day. In the winter, the townsfolk gather around the geyser to enjoy the warm steam from its eruptions, and during the spring children frolic underneath the spout of water and play.
            A mining village has sprung up around the massive hole left in the ground by a passing elder purple worm. The worm disrupted hundreds of thousands of gold worth of ores and precious gems - though only the most experienced miners and spelunkers can safely traverse the deep tunnel.
            Giant metal pumps from ages long ago keep the endless subterranean caverns filled with locked vaults and adamantine doors beneath the city dry enough for explorers to delve. For 300 years, adventurers and archaeologists have flocked here, extracting untold wealth every time a vault is successfully opened.
            Lava from the mountains flows under the town, giving rise to several hot springs.
            The city is at the edge of a rain-forest, a forest made of literal rain. This is their primary means of water collection, and by extension, agriculture. They must traverse the treacherous rain-forest and its amphibious residents, including the frog-men ninja clans.
            The town is plagued by sky-stompers (you could replace sky-stompers with dragons if you prefer), giant, glistening, photosynthetic monsters that hover in orbit, only occasionally dropping to the planet for a quick breath, water, other nutrients, or mating. The entire town exists on moving structures, and astrologers and geomancers are trained to predict the drops and move the town to a nearby but safe distance from the dropped sky-stompers. For as much as a hassle as this can be, for the brief period of time the sky-stompers land, they often bring with them items or resources of scientific or religious interest, or of practical value, from far above. A religion has also formed around the sky-stompers, with many believing they are messengers who come and go from the celestial realm itself. Scientists believe that energy can be siphoned from the sky-stompers, which could lead to full-scale industrialization. A fantasy and/or solarpunk setting.
            A bottomless pit with an intricate cave system with fertile soil and bioluminescent bacteria meaning free real estate for farming
            A spring gushes forth from the center of town, providing a nearly unlimited supply of sweet fresh water. The town has a legend that many centuries past, a nature spirit disguised herself as a homeless traveler and was given warm reception by the town. In return for their kindness she caused the spring to burst forth. Since that time, no wanderer is ever turned away by the townsfolk, some saying that to do so would cause the spring to dry up.
            A massive telescope like device fell to pieces on the edge of a large desert. The angel, and still in tact glass dome created a massive terrarium full of strange exotic woods and creatures. The village has built up around the metallic walls, and use the various game and lumber as their livelihood. Upkeep on the glass dome it top priority.
            The Town is ringed by a large wall made out of living trees: in fact a specific tree known as a "Walking Tree." As it grows, it sends out branches that will eventually root into the ground and grow another trunk. The Villagers, over centuries, have carefully pruned and guided the growth of the tree until it has encircled the town. Now the roots are deep in the earth, while the trunks are twisted giants blocking all entry. Two large gates have been carefully maintained as arching openings in the wall (though canny carpenters have fitted swinging doors to the arches). Some of the branches have been sewn into walkways that mimic battlements and provide protection and security to the defenders. Due to its great age, at this point the bark is nearly as hard as stone, heavy with moss that denies fire a purchase, and eerily beautiful.
            The city is built on a extremely wide solid rock plateau. Carved into the ground are massive teleportation circles that surround the city. When activated (through some strenuous magical means) it teleports the whole city into a sealed underground cavern with no entrances or exits. Essentially making it an escape bunker until whatever danger was threatening the city passes.
            The ruins of a temple lay in the city center. Abnormal about this temple is the alter to an unidentified god that constantly sprays fresh clean water from a pot he holds into a fountain beneath him giving the city an unending supply of clean water.
            It's built on the back and in the arms of an enormous golem like giant creature who one day started walking out of the side of the mountain where the city originally was built centuries ago. It walks at a pace slow enough to not be felt much by the residents. Perhaps it's destination is important.
            There is a huge intricate sun dial that as well as telling the time for the locals has a tally that is ceremoniously completed every summer solstice. However this coming summer an ancient carving of a skeleton lies in the next available tally spot. There are many rumours of what this foretells but most agree it is the end of times.
            The whole village lies on a rotating stone bed one mile in diameter. Local dwarven miners dug exploration tunnels to determine the cause of this turning. One by one curses, misfortune and death befell anyone who was involved in the mining exploration and thus all efforts have ceased.
            This village is built in a monstrous towering evergreen tree with an incredibly ornate spiral staircase that traverses around the outside of the bark and a working pulley lift system to transport resources up and down the centre of the trunk. Each of the 50 or so branches can support two or three huts and there is a clear hierarchy of wealth. The lower branches are occupied by the poor labourers whilst the very canopy is the residence of the wealthy.
            A village situated in the middle of a gas marsh. The small town is built on an artificial bill and the gates are secured at sunrise when the marsh fills with noxious gas.
            The city is built around a wizard's tower. Every wizard that has taken up residence there has supported and cared for the townsfolk. The town itself is littered with small magical artifacts made by wizards of the tower in days gone by. Examples are a magically turning water wheel that brings water up from the bottom of the well and local hospital that the current wizard makes weekly visits to.
            A unique breed of sea creature frequents the area of this fishing town. When properly prepared, parts of this creature can be used to create potent healing tonics, while if prepared another way, it can be used to create potent poison. The Assassin's guild and Healer's guild in this town are continually at odds, trying to control the supply of the creatures for their own uses.
            A thriving city built around the corpse of a Terrasque felled generations ago. No one has determined a means to permanently kill it so the City Corp of Miners harvest and despose of matter as fast as it regenerates. Rumor has it that if it were permanently killed it would manifest elsewhere to wreak havoc, that is why more powerful magics are highly regulated in the region.
            A huge ass meteor crater that has a lake in it, with an “island” at the centre
            Hellgate - A quaint village built inside of a cavern, inhabited by tieflings, demons, and warlocks. In an adjacent antechamber there is a massive adamantine gate carved with images of debauchery and torments, a pilgrimage site for all who worship the infernal. The town is filled with shops that sell pentacle charms, goat-headed statues, brimstone candles, and other religious paraphernalia. Once a year, the villagers hold a Doomsday Parade. They march through the streets carrying battering rams, which they take to the antechamber and knock on the hellgate itself. Afterwards, there is much drunknenness and merriment.
            Starfell - A remote town built around an strange wreck in a crater. The inhabitants of Starfell are of an unknown race. They are hospitable but aloof and will not answer questions regarding their nature or that of the wreck. Outsiders are welcome to visit the markets and taverns in the crater, but exploring the ruined structure is forbidden. Any character that is attuned to living things will notice that there are a number of faint life signs emanating from inside the wreck...
            Splinterpoint - A city that was fractured across multiple realities in a long-forgotten cataclysm. Most of the main streets and markets are in our universe, but beware of entering strange doors or alleyways--they can leave you stranded in a parallel reality if you don't know how to find your way back. The city is filled with the ephemera of other universes: there is coinage bearing the faces of leaders and nations that never existed; there are books filled with spells and alchemical formulae that don't work here; there are pieces of magic and technology that are utterly unknown, and will cease to work if taken far from Splinterpoint.
            The Crawl - A town built on the back of a massive land snail. The Crawl has a single main road that winds in a spiral up to the peak of the shell. Most of the time, The Crawl stays in the wild areas far from civilization and trade routes--most believe it is nothing more than a legend. The few explorers who manage to find it can trade for healing snail-slime unguents, pearls, and knives and jewelry crafted from nacre.
            Long ago a band of heroes battled a necromancer and were able to defeat him by turning him to stone; the now stone necromancer stands on the hill overlooking the town, covered in graffiti. His finger still points to the town's center.
            A chain, with links as big as the city itself, is anchored to the earth around the city's borders and protrudes into the sky; nobody knows what it is attached to on the other end.
            A high wall, made entirely of what appears to be skeletons (either made of or possibly coated in metal) with outstretched hands, as though they are reaching for something, that stretches as far as the eye can see; the wall itself exudes a powerful fear aura which deters locals from approaching, peering over, or going around it.
            A very large tree, which, when rested directly under for at least a long rest, permanently bestows the plant sub-type on the resting PC/NPC. This change in sub-type can only be reversed with a wish spell; the spell will automatically fail however, if both the afflicted and the caster are not directly under the tree.
            A nearby field is full of hundreds of Tenser's Floating Discs which wander the field aimlessly, allowing wildlife to appear to defy gravity. Nobody knows where they came from or how long they have been there, but they range in appearance from completely transparent/translucent to covered in dirt and other sparse natural phenomena. Anyone that is in physical contact with one of the discs may mentally control it at will, but it will not leave the borders of that field.
            A neighboring village has balls of floating light appearing intermittently that cause anyone that sees them to stop what they are doing, stand in place, stare blindly into the distance, and babble (and sometimes drool) gibberish to themselves for hours. This is a daily occurrence the villagers have turned into a sport they lovingly refer to as "babble-ball" where the last man standing that has not laid eyes on the orbs that day wins. Chikoh is the reigning champion who has not "been babbled" for the past 22 days, since he was last caught with his pants down babbling with the butcher's wife.
            This village has an idiot. This idiot is not just any village idiot, mind you; he is bound to the land, magically speaking of course. When he is happy, the weather is agreeable, crops are plentiful, etc. When he is feeling bad the weather is extreme for whatever season it currently is, wildlife becomes sparse and hostile, etc. The villagers fear that should he die, the land would die with him, so he is kept indoors and tended to hand and foot like a god in order to keep him safe and happy. He likes to get out and cause mischief though, whenever he can.
            This city has a large pedestal in the middle of downtown there a glass orb sits with an object inside. This object is constantly shifting form to resemble the various currencies of the world. Rumors circulate that if the orb is ever broken whatever currency it is currently in the form of will disappear world-wide, others say that if it is broken whatever currency it is in the form of will erupt forth from it. As a result of these and other rumors, the city guard and local mages college have formed a unified front to defend the orb from any attempt at breaking it open, though all attempts have proven ineffective since a visiting mage from a neighboring city experimented by dropping an elephant on it and it was undamaged.
            On the outskirts of town there is a giant metal dome. Inside this dome is a series of smaller metal domes. (like a nesting doll) At the core, rests the still-beating heart of a hill giant that once tended the land with utmost care. The heartbeat, however faint, echoes through the layered domes and grants a calming effect on those that hear it.
            This desert oasis has its own permanent portal to the elemental plane of ice located just left of the pond in the palm grove. Very popular tourist attraction.
            A simple farming village with really fertile soils. Because after battling at the same exact place for thousands of years, the grounds are fertile due to the excess punts of blood and bone that the ground soaks.
            The only known vein of living silver, a crucial component in the making of Great Weapons, lies beneath the mines that this village supports.
            Millenia ago, the ancients knew better ways to survive, explore, and travel the great vastness of the Sky-Void; than capturing and enslaving Air Elementals to provide lift and thrust to the Great Ships of Etheria. Now, an entire civilization and the lives of every being depends on finding elemental Alcheras, holes in reality where the elemental planes poke thru, entering them, and capturing short-lived elementals, then getting out before the Alcheras close. This is one of the only known stable alcheras ever found, deep inside a floating Island known as "The Respite", built up over the years from the floating hulks of several hundred Airships of War moored around a small chunk of floating stone a quarter mile across. Ships everywhere flock here for water, fresh elementals, and repair, and the weaponry bristling aboard the Respite keeps it firmly in the hands of the ruling elite.
            There are remains of an intelligent, prehistoric life form in the centre of the town. When people have touched the remains they gain some sort of change to their self be it they gain magical powers or they lose a limb. The town is based off of the ‘blessing’ of the forgotten one. Some people are lucky, others are not.

    interesting combats builder

        fighting power disparities
            THE DISTANT FOE
            A summoner is hidden far away and will continue to summon enemies.
            A summoner is hidden amongst a crowd of innocents and will continue to summon enemies.
            A sniper is far away and has a bead on the characters.
            The foe attacks from a superior height advantage.
            The foe strikes and hides/becomes ethereal.
            The foe attacks in the dream world.
            The foe attacks with many illusions.
            The villain attacks by leaving traps.


            **THE ETERNAL FOE**
            1. The enemy has a very high AC and a way to impose disadvantage.
            2. The enemy has a very good saving throws.
            3. The enemy has a lot of hp and many resistances, but a few specific vulnerabilities.
            4. The enemy just regenerates at 0hp unless a specific action is taken.
            5. The enemy regenerates unless a specific action is taken.
            6. The enemy respawns unless a specific action is taken.

            THE ALTERNATE FOE
            Killing the foe will prevent the players from getting what they want. He has to be defeated in a specific way.
            The foe is a mind controlled ally.
            The foe is fighting on terrain advantageous to them and the hero is at danger from that terrain.
            One of the enemies is merely a simulacrum.
            There is a curse that requires a very specific set of actions to be taken or not taken.
            The goal is a race to the thing the villain is trying to get to. Success is just slowing the other down.
            The battle is in a town and killing/maiming would have worse consequences than losing.
            There are multiple powerful foes that can only be defeated if they can be tricked into fighting each other.
            There are multiple foes that are enemies themselves. The heroes must balance stop them from killing each other.
            The battle takes place in an environment where some cooperation with the foe is necessary to survive.

            **THE POWERFUL FOE**
            1. The foe’s attacks cripple.
            2. The foe is overwhelming in melee.
            3. The villain is attempting to force the hero to use a specific tactic, and is powerful enough to be dangerous despite this self-imposed disadvantage.
            4. The foe can read minds and predict every move.
            5. The enemy leaves wounds that fester.  They attack and run before striking again later.
            6. The villain has overwhelming minions that will leave if they are defeated.
            7. The villain is invulnerable save for a weak point on their body that is difficult to reach or expose.
            7. The villain has overwhelming power over the hero (minions mostly) and they have to wait for the right time to strike.

            THE WEAK HERO
            There are innocents that the villain is attacking, or perhaps just one target.
            The heroes have been fighting for a very long time and are greatly weakened.
            The villain has corned a single hero who needs to get help or just survive long enough to win.
            The villain has a powerful attack but it needs specific circumstances to pull off.
            The hero can’t afford to use all their power yet.
            The circumstances require the hero fight honorably, even when the villain doesn’t.

        fight premises
            Faction war
            Battle between nations
            Battle between monsters and humanoids
            Battle between humanoid races
            Crusade
            Insurrection (u/DiabolicalSuccubus)
            Gangland war (u/DiabolicalSuccubus)
            Police action (u/DiabolicalSuccubus)
            Feud (u/DiabolicalSuccubus)
            Tribal raid (u/DiabolicalSuccubus)
            Colonial "expansion" (u/DiabolicalSuccubus)
            Peasants revolt (u/Brand_News_Detritus)
            War of succession (u/Brand_News_Detritus)
            Clash between noble families (u/Brand_News_Detritus)
            Battle between two gods and their followers (u/Brand_News_Detritus)
            Battle between two archdevils and their minions (u/Brand_News_Detritus)
            Barbarian raid (u/Brand_News_Detritus)
            Pirate raid (u/Brand_News_Detritus)
            Honorable duel (u/Brand_News_Detritus)
            Trial by combat (u/Brand_News_Detritus)
            Siege of a city (u/Brand_News_Detritus)
            Siege of a castle/fortress (u/Brand_News_Detritus)
            Battle in the Blood War
            Battle between heaven and hell (u/World_of_Ideas)
            Battle of mages (u/World_of_Ideas)
            Humanoids vs Kaiju (u/World_of_Ideas)
            Kaiju vs. Kaiju (u/World_of_Ideas)
            Sea Battle (u/World_of_Ideas)
            The living vs. the undead (u/World_of_Ideas)
            Planar Invasion (fiend) (u/MalarkTheMad)
            Planar Invasion (Aberation) (u/MalarkTheMad)
            Aimless undead siege town (u/MalarkTheMad)
            Followers of the same god with contradictory beliefs (u/RollinRawlin)
            Dwarves "Balancing the books" for an insult that occurred centuries ago (u/RollinRawlin)
            Wars of succession (u/RollinRawlin)
            Mock-battles using cloth-wrapped blades (u/RollinRawlin)
            Race war (u/MacheteCrocodileJr)
            Tournament (u/MacheteCrocodileJr)
            Sacrificial war (u/MacheteCrocodileJr)
            Raid (u/MacheteCrocodileJr)
            Proxy war (u/MacheteCrocodileJr)
            Class war (u/MacheteCrocodileJr)
            War for resources (u/MacheteCrocodileJr)
            War of nationalism (u/MacheteCrocodileJr)
            War of unification (u/MacheteCrocodileJr)
            Cold War (u/MacheteCrocodileJr)
            Battle of attrition (u/MacheteCrocodileJr)
            Battle of annihilation (u/MacheteCrocodileJr)
            Battle of breakthrough (u/MacheteCrocodileJr)
            A card game-based duel (u/bladeraptor3)
            Pirate mutiny (u/PodrickTheDefiler)
            Magic v Non-magic (u/PodrickTheDefiler)
            Airship/flying battle (u/PodrickTheDefiler)
            Civil war (u/Bagonhead1)
            Two gods sending followers to fight (u/Bagonhead1)
            A race for treasure (u/Bagonhead1)
            Economic war between companies (u/Bagonhead1)
            Two powerful families fighting each other (like Romeo and Juliet) (u/Bagonhead1)

        combat goals
            TDM - Combat in D&D is clearly the focus of the core of its mechanics as well as much of its content, however, the objectives are rarely given the variety they could receive. Typically, the only practical objective of battles is the elimination of all hostile actors. This almost always manifests in a fight to the death—taking prisoners or accepting a retreat is a rare occurrence. This is perfectly acceptable in some fights, but if used in every battle, it can lead to the feeling that combat is bland or soulless—simply a numbers game about dropping the enemy before they drop you. I present to you a series of alternate combat objectives that you can offer your players to break of the monotony of what I will call “Team Deathmatch” combat from now on.
            Guardian - The simplest variation on Team Deathmatch style combat is to assign outsize influence on a single combatant—a VIP. It’s probable that you’ve created VIP combat objectives before without really thinking about it. After all, a boss fight can basically use a VIP combat objective if the boss has minions that don’t need to be defeated to achieve victory. However, this isn’t all you can do with VIPs. An escort mission, where the PCs escort a hapless NPC ally, is a genre staple, but it’s fallen out of fashion for a reason. A ‘reverse escort mission’, where NPC allies act to support the PCs, or a PC focused escort mission, where one of the PCs becomes the focus of a battle seem to be options that feel generally more fun to play. In the latter case, you use this focus from a characterization perspective—find an element from the PC’s backstory or personality and make the combat a way to explore that facet of the character. Perhaps a barbarian warrior needs to prove that they’re tough enough to remain standing during a battle or a cleric of a light god is channeling the force of their god—the only thing enough to push back the darkness that threatens to consume the entire party. This can be a great way to put the spotlight on a specific character and allow them to shine (sometimes literally).
            CTF - A classic variation on Team Deathmatch is Capture the Flag—instead of protecting a VIP, you’re fighting over an inanimate McGuffin, like a magic rune or bag of gold. As the MacGuffin trope is an extremely versatile tool in writing, this is an extremely versatile objective in combat design! Maybe once the party defeats the warlord, her underlings will try to grab the body and escape to resurrect her! Maybe the party’s goal is to steal a magic gem that’s guarded by a horde of eternally reanimating skeletons! Maybe the party has reached the end of the dungeon at the same time as a rival adventuring party, with both approaching the artifact contained within from opposite entrances to the final room! Now, in many Capture the Flag combats, battle may eventually degenerate back to a Team Deathmatch state, but simply having an objective can force battles to happen in circumstances that aren’t ideal to either side. Besides, it’s not like there’s anything wrong with Team Deathmatch combat, and the times it doesn’t lead to that can lead to some very hectic chases and clever uses of non-damaging combat abilities.
            COTH - If VIP seeks to control a person, and Capture the Flag seeks to control an object, King of the Hill seeks to control a location. Now, this location can start under the control of either faction or start as initially neutral depending on circumstance, and each situation leads to a very different type of encounter. If the location is initially neutral, this functions like a Capture the Flag scenario where the dominant strategy of ‘just run away’ isn’t possible. If possible, try to make ‘tanky’ characters like paladins and fighters really feel dominant when the battle reaches maturity, but favor speedsters like monks and rogues during the initial phase of battle. You can do this by applying a two turn ‘countdown to victory’ for controlling the location uncontested, and deliberately setting up the scenario so it takes a ‘normal’ character one-and-a-half movements (two turns, with an action left over) to reach the location. This means that fast characters can get in an initial advantage but can’t win the scenario outright. A reasonable scenario like this might be taking a bridge. One side wants to hold it so that it can be destroyed, another side wants to hold it so that an approaching army can cross. A ‘defensive’ King of the Hill might involve the PCs holding a specific door against enemies that want to burst in and assassinate whoever’s inside. An ‘offensive’ King of the Hill might involve the PCs trying to remain inside a ritual circle to disrupt the summoning of a dark god. The potential combinations are nearly endless, just realize that, just like with the Capture the Flag variant, the PCs will come up with all sorts of janky strategies to completely circumvent fighting the encounter. To a certain extent, let them. That’s part of the way that D&D is different from a video game. It’s part of the fun!
            TD - Leaving MacGuffins behind, what if enemies didn’t all attack at once? This is Wave Defense, and it’s probably the most common of these suggestions in actual play. Still, I figure it’d be worth mentioning here in part because fighting one big battle is more fun than fighting a bunch of little ones. However, it’s easy to overwhelm PCs though the use of the action economy (a lot of enemies, few PCs). The solution is to throw the enemies at them in waves! This also can make combats last longer than the traditional three round length. That’s not all, however. The ‘alternate objective’ comes in with what I call the ‘Cross the Finish Line’ objective for enemies, which is a classic component of the Wave Defense in other game. Perhaps the party is defending a wall breach against attacking soldiers, or a holy gate against a horde of demons. The enemy can’t attack all at once due to the size of the gap, so they come in waves. Either it’s defeat a certain number of enemies or hold out for a certain amount of time (another alternate combat objective) in order to achieve victory.
            FFA - Another sort-of alternate combat objective is the Free for All, in which survival is focused on as the goal over body count. Though it’s become popular in the modern consciousness with the Battle Royale genre, the Deathmatch is a long and storied tradition in video games which can be applied to your D&D game with the appropriate level of worldbuilding. A classic of the mega dungeon is the existence of multiple warring factions within the dungeon. Perhaps this comes to a head with a battle between two factions? If either faction wins decisively, it makes the PCs lives much harder, so it falls the the PCs to ensure that any victory is pyrrhic. Perhaps an otherwise normal battle is interrupted by a wandering monster looking for an easy meal? Perhaps the Big Bad’s underling sees the climactic battle with the PCs as the perfect opportunity to betray their boss an eliminate both groups in one fell swoop? The Free for All is the perfect gift for the Diplomacy player in your game group—a challenge in which strategic thinking and diplomacy RP becomes just as essential to winning an encounter as optimal character design and tactical ability!

        plots based on challenged
            primary
            Combat	A powerful warlord
            Clever/Intelligent	A grandmaster of a strategy game
            Magic	An intellect dissolving cloud
            Environmental	A shortage of necessary resources
            Society/City	A powerful and dangerous political change is occurring
            Survival	An inhospitable area
            Social	An affluent socialite with dirt on important people
            Beyond Your Station	A tyrannical ruler
            Beyond Your Control	An elemental power
            Beyond Your Understanding	The spawn of an extradimensional deity
            War	An army of mercenaries
            Religion	A false bishop
            Political	A Spymaster
            Flora	A Tree of Life
            Sentience	An intelligent, brain-eating group of person
            Dragon	Ancient Dragon
            Deity Drama	A missing god
            Undead	A rogue Reaper
            Prophecy	A “The End is Nigh” Oracle
            Family Drama	A close loved one of a PC
            Visions from a Dream	A dream has shown a PC what will happen
            Non-Combat	A constantly watched law enforcement official
            Backstory	An important person in a PCs backstory


            secondary
            Combat	That has a counter to most attacks
            Clever/Intelligent	That cannot be killed/resolved by normal means
            Magic	That nullifies magic or reflects spells back at the caster
            Environmental	That is in an environment hostile to the characters
            Society/City	That wants fewer prisoners
            Survival	That can thrive in circumstances and environments no one else can
            Social	That has something that can shift the balance of power
            Beyond Your Station	That is the key to toppling an empire
            Beyond Your Control	That can never be completely stopped
            Beyond Your Understanding	That has gained power from an experience beyond the veil of space and time
            War	That will get what it seeks one way or another
            Religion	That seizes faithful souls
            Political	That makes people disappear
            Flora	That regrows endlessly
            Sentience	That expands a network of thralls
            Dragon	That rules under threat of sheer power
            Deity Drama	That lost control of their domain
            Undead	That wants a less chaotic world
            Prophecy	That faith will see succeed
            Family Drama	That has influential ties to a PCs family
            Visions from a Dream	That shows terrible events happening simultaneously in different locations
            Non-Combat	That has a dedicated group of people at their beck and call
            Backstory	That is tied directly to a key event in a PCs backstory


            Tertiary
            Combat	Has unmatched equipment or resources
            Clever/Intelligent	Cannot be solved/defeated by intellect alone
            Magic	Can constantly disguise or hide itself
            Environmental	Is changing the environment to better suit its needs
            Society/City	During a local election
            Survival	The weather is inhospitable
            Social	Is surrounded by nosy people
            Beyond Your Station	No one in authority believes you
            Beyond Your Control	Is on a short timetable you cannot slow
            Beyond Your Understanding	Is pulling another dimension into an unstable union with this one
            War	Is regenerating its ranks quicker than they can be destroyed
            Religion	Is seen as a messiah by a multitude of people
            Political	Has spies everywhere
            Flora	Has nature on its side.
            Sentience	Hides behind the veil of society
            Dragon	Owns the royal hierarchy and government in place
            Deity Drama	Has the faithful trying to deny it
            Undead	Sends kills to Purgatory
            Prophecy	The McGuffin needed to succeed is unknown
            Family Drama	Is guilt tripping a PC to do what they want done
            Visions from a Dream	PC(s) lose something every time they deviate from the vision
            Non-Combat	Challenges a character to a test of skill
            Backstory	Drastically changes a character’s understanding about something from their past
    encounters
        street encounters
            A homeless urchin approaches the party and claims that he used to be a great magician. He says that if the party were to give him a gold piece, he could make one of them disappear. The urchin has a teleportation sigil on the ground in front of him that is incredibly difficult to see and only activates with his command word, which happens to be 'PRESTO!'. The character standing on the sigil is teleported to an alleyway 3 blocks down the road, into a trash pile. [/u/dndspeak]
            Three semi-attractive ladies boldly harass a PC saying that s/he slept with all three of them. Creating a diversion for a pickpocket to snagged the purse of the PC's while they are distracted by the ladies. Once the pickpocket is gone they apologize and say that the PC looks like someone they know. [/u/Austiniuliano]
            Down the street, a person is being chased by the city guard. The guard are yelling for the thief to stop. As the thief gets close a 2nd thief causes a distraction to the guard such as overturning a wagon full of manure. The pair of thieves round the corner close to the PCs. what do the PC's do? [/u/Austiniuliano]
            As you pass an alleyway, a male goblin rushes out frantically and flags down your group. “Help, help, my wife is giving birth! Please, someone help us!” You look past him into the alley, and sure enough, there is a pregnant goblin grimacing and bracing herself against a crate. You get to name their firstborn if you help out, and the father will buy your party a round of drinks at the tavern he works at. [/u/ASzinhaz]
            A charlatan offers to give a party member some fancy jewelry to advertise their business. Little did they know this jewelry has a scrying enchantment and will be used to see where the party is staying and how well defended they are and rob them that night. [/u/11110000110011]
            Roll a DC 15 Dexterity check to not get hit with the contents of an emptied chamberpot. If anyone in the party fails the check, the party rolls all Charisma checks at a disadvantage until the unlucky ones take a proper bath. [/u/ASzinhaz]
            You see an older man yelling at his apprentice for making some mistake. The apprentice seems near tears because he's trying to explain himself but can't get a word in edgewise. [/u/jheiner227]
            You are walking down the street when you are bumped violently aside, but when you look for the perpetrator all you see is a stray cat which seems to part the crowd wherever it goes (It's actually a dragon casting major illusion to better mingle). [/u/callhimbob]
            A child with an obvious injury begging for money pleads to the party for money. Later that day the party sees the same kid running around playing tag. [/u/callhimbob]
            A shopper in the market starts going mad trying to bite the other patrons. Minutes later the shopper collapses with no memory of what happened. (In my game the person had been possessed by an animal spirit) [/u/callhimbob]
            The party comes upon an ongoing street performance of a popular play. It's an enjoyable show, until the actors start looking for members in the audience to call on stage (whether that's because they're malicious or they pick the most socially awkward member of the part) [/u/callhimbob]
            A group of miners are protesting outside of a noble's estate over poor working conditions [/u/callhimbob]
            A gaggle of students run up to the party and demand that the oddball (genasi, orc, kenku, etc...) come back to the university with them so they can win the scavenger hunt they're competing in [/u/callhimbob]
            You come across 4 old men sitting and playing cards. If you want to join, they let you, but because this is what they do with their lives, they are very good. [/u/jheiner227]
            You see a man/woman locked away in a prison cairrage, they beckon to you they are innocent and will compensate you handsomely should you aid in their escape. [/u/Oniguumo]
            A street performer is making music, hoping that people will pay him. If he's very good, there's a large crowd. If he's bad, people walk by, averting their eyes. If the party is musical, he's happy to perform together and split the take. He may not be honest about the split, though. [/u/jheiner227]
            A friendly looking man in light brown robes approaches the party. He is surrounded by 7 golden birds. He offers to read the fortune of the party in exchange for enough coin to buy a meal and bed for the night (I usually use 5 GP). If they acquiesce, he asks them to ask a question and he answers using the Divination spell. A successful perception check (DC 15, ARC skill of +5 or higher automatically succeeds) will reveal that he hasn't actually cast any spell, but his answers are always truthful. Once he is out of sight of the party, he disappears. [/u/[deleted]]
            A homeless man/woman approaches begging for food and or shelter for the evening. Party agrees, they'll wake up and a large sum of money sits by them but he or she is gone. If they refuse, then days later they hear in the news a man shown kindness in a person's time of need. Billionaire gives man money. [/u/SychsisOPhrenia]
            A raving madwoman stops everyone she sees, telling the story of how she was the mistress of the Mayor or King. Her mind is broken and her speech is rambling, but the stories she tells are very consistant and convincing. [/u/Alphachicken]
            A voice calls out from a darkened alleyway, it sounds in distress, but is quickly muffled. [/u/Kiyohara]
            The cobble pavement collapses in a major street revealing a dungeon (or unknown sewer beneath. In a short period of time a large portion of the city guard will come to inspect and clear crowds. A single old crippled man will climb from within the hole and collapse once he reaches the light [/u/mechanical_banana42]
            A parade blocks traffic while many people stop what they are doing to watch. [/u/Kiyohara]
            A circus strongman flexes and struts in a chalk ring. A halfling barker stands on a soap box, challenging anyone walking by to test their mettle against the steel thews of Kourteous the Mighty, Terror of the Ring! Best out of three clinches wins. [/u/nlitherl]
            A very large wild animal calmly walks down the street. People run away and shout, but the beast seems uninterested in them. [/u/Kiyohara]
            A merchant offers the exact same items the party already owns, but if they buy anything they will find the exact object missing from there bag. If confronted about it, the merchant will flee leaving the party with all the items, but there bags are empty (they have one of each item again). The players can buy and keep two of any item by taking it out of there backpack and holding it while buying the duplicate. [/u/Sappique]
            Several acrobats occupy a part of the street and display great skill and dexterity in their movements and contortions. [/u/Kiyohara]
            A tower full of boiling molasses/oil/etc groans and collapses from atop the roof of a local apothecary/wizard. Any caught in the rushing wave of scorching liquid stand to have the flesh melted from their very bones! [/u/revderrick]
            The doors to a brewery explode open and thousands of gallons of beer rush out and swamp the streets. Many townsfolk quickly gather buckets, pitchers, and other containers and start scooping up what they can. [/u/Kiyohara]
            Two gentlemen or women, surrounded by guards seem to be getting into a bit of a fight. They're yelling loudly and making convincing swings at each other. They position themselves, and as one swings with all his/her might, the other ducks, and they manage to knock over one of the guards, dashing out of the circle as quickly as possible. As they pass your party, one of them tosses you a mysterious object as they pass. Along with the object is a hastily scribbled note that reads, "MIDNIGHT, <name of landmark in your city>, MEET". [/u/TheDirtyDeal]
            Two merchants stand nose to nose screaming at each other, their carts are intertwined and they are blocking traffic. Their horses seem to be nonplussed and nibble at nearby grass. [/u/Kiyohara]
            You find a potion seller that had all the labels to his potions torn of in the middle of the night by a trickster rouge that has been terrorizing the city in recent weeks. To make matters worse, due to the "discrete" nature his clientele, all of the potions have been bewitched so they are immune to the use of an Identify spell. He is desperately trying to sell the rest of his unusable stock at a discount to anybody passing by. Each potion is 20gp or comes in bulk packs of 12 for 200gp. Roll a d20 to determine what the potion is. 1| Sorcerer Spirit: A random magic effect from the wild magic surge table occurs. If a Wild Magic sorcerer drinks the potion, roll twice on the table 2| Chug Jug: Gain 4d10 temporary hit points for 1 hour 3| Potion of speed 4| Potion of sluggishness: instantly grants 2 ranks of exhaustion 5| Potion of resistance (resistance chosen randomly) 6| Potion of vulnerability: works identically to potion of resistance, but grants vulnerability instead of resistance 7| Temperance Tonic: makes all alcohol consumed for the next 1d4 days taste vile 8| A non-magical sugary carbonated drink 9| Potion of healing 10| Potion of Poison 11| Potion of Growth 12| Potion of Diminution 13| Potion of Animal Friendship 13| Potion of Animal Hatred: All undomesticated animals are hostile on sight for one hour Perfume. Smells nice, tastes horrible 14| Holy water 15| Unholy water (all healing magic is half as effective for the next hour) 16| Dragon pepper hot sauce: Make a DC 17 Constitution check. On a failure, the user is incapacitated for 1 hour. On a success, the user gains a fire breath weapon attack for 1 hour. Any character with resistance to fire automatically succeeds on the check 17| Discount potion of water breathing: Works like a regular potion of water breathing, but removes user's ability to breathe air for the duration. Lasts one hour. 18| Cheap whiskey [/u/Jacknerik]
            A man runs by, screaming, seemingly battling an large octopus that has latched itself to his head and is spraying ink everywhere. No one recognizes the man and fewer know where one could find a large octopus. [/u/Kiyohara]
            You bump into a figure in a sharp travelers cloak. The figure either places a magic item in your pocket that is being hunted by the town guards or the figure steals a magic item from you and runs. Upon finding the figure either way you come to learn they are a royalty among the criminal underworld and want to hire you for their next big score. [/u/TaleBinder]
            A skilled bard is performing in a local noble's garden. The sounds can be heard clearly outside and a small crowd of passers by has stopped to appreciate. The Noble's guards are debating if they can/should disperse the crowd. [/u/Kiyohara]
            The party hears an alarm bell ringing loudly a few blocks out of sight, which is quickly picked up other alarm bells around the city. Large flagpoles around the party's section of the city of quickly raise up orange flags, and a general call of "code orange" is taken up by everyone nearby as citizens rapidly pack up stalls and evacuate the streets with practiced ease. The ground begins to tremble by the time all nearby citizens are tucked into alleys or taking shelter indoors, and within seconds of the street clearing, a stampede of brightly colored oxen round a corner and barrel down the party's street. If the party has taken shelter, they are trapped where they are for the next 30 seconds as the small flood of animals passes by them, after which the locals quickly go about setting up shop as if nothing had happened. If the party is in the path of the oxen, they take 3d6 bludgeoning damage and are dragged 40 feet in the direction of the stampede for each turn that they remain in it, with the stampede counting as difficult terrain in any area it occupies. If the party manage to get someone to explain the situation, it is revealed a powerful but unstable sorcerer named Wizbo often conducts strange "experiments" in his "wizard tower", and that the particular section of the city he belongs to has adapted and developed a warning system to alert the locals to incoming magical shenanigans. In this case, a code orange indicates actual potential danger and advises citizens to clear the streets and take shelter indoors until the alarm has passed. [/u/ThePragmaticPimp]
            A local baker has created a new type of baked good and is giving samples to everyone. From the sounds of appreciation, it is quite good and there is already a line to both try the food and to enter the store. [/u/Kiyohara]
            Some of the citizens are exchanging messages in thieves cant. Messages like “it begins in 30 minutes” and “get in position”. 50% chance it’s a daring heist and 50% chance it’s a flash mob. [/u/Patergia]
            A horse, saddled and with a large pack slowly ambles down the street, the stays and ties having clearly been broken. Surely the owner will want it back. [/u/Kiyohara]
            The Laughing Prince, a controversial thief, has been captured. Half of the populace think he's a hero of the people; the other half think he's a ruthless cutthroat. His public execution is scheduled for midday in the town square, and the crowd on both sides is getting increasingly reckless and ugly... [/u/Courtholomew]
            Several guardsmen can be seen checking strangers to see if they paid their gate tax or if they are residents. Most people seem to have a piece of paper indicating one or the other. [/u/Kiyohara]
            A fire has broken out in the Market District, and is growing fast. The party can work to put out the fire, can try to alleviate the panic, or perhaps try to pick up some abandoned items for a *substantial* discount... [/u/Courtholomew]
            A well dressed man accompanied by two rough looking guards is politely inquiring if anyone has paid the Thieves's Guild Tax and if they need to renew their licenses. As soon as he spots the party, he smiles widely and approaches. [/u/Kiyohara]
            It's the Regent's/Mayor's birthday and the streets are awash with celebrations. An amiable man wearing the city colours and crest persuades (DC15 CHAR) the party to go on a discounted city tour (subsidised by the city council) of some of its less famous sites with his colleague sat in the box-seat of an elegant carriage. It is in fact a dodgy scheme to eek money out of travellers. The coachman venerates the cities beautiful attractions, recklessly hurtling the rig through the foot traffic. He deposits you at the first stop. A temple. Here a weasely monk attempts to persuade (DC10 CHAR) the party to generously donate to the temple and depart with earthly possessions. The coachman will be very encouraging and optimistic about the next stop being enticing, and is according to the coachman a renowned tailors. In the dingy shop a short scowling man will stalk the players as they browse the store, seizing any opportunity to try and convince them to buy his garments. At this point the players will have little sense of where they are without some means of navigation. The coachmen is adamant that the last stop will make it all worth it. The final stop from the outside appears to be a theatre with elaborate decorations and promotions. An attractive host recieves them at the doors, and leads them down a dimly lit hall, through another set of doors and into an empty auditorium. She tells them to take a seat at the front by the stage before retreating to the double doors and locking them. (2d8+3) thugs rise from the concessions stands with loaded crossbows aimed at the players heads, and the amiable man strides out on to the stage. He demands the party's valuables in exchange for their lives. [/u/ArtyNinja]
            One of the PCs trips over something in the street.Reaching down they find a coin purse, heavy and clinking. Just then an angry voice bellows, "My money! I've been robbed!" The crowd steps back and a well dressed noble points to the party and screams, "Thieves!" [/u/Kiyohara]
            A frail looking stray cat follows you no matter where you go in town, the cat seemingly following you with intent [/u/forgoten_mad_man]
            A cloaked figure ask's where the local library is. You can hear the muffled sounds of chewing paper while he talks. And in his wake he leaves shreds of pages. [/u/KeenanAXQuinn]
            A loud, colorful troupe of dwarves enter the city square; they pitch a tent and within a few hours, they announce that the traveling unarmed fight championship will be held - all who deem themselves worthy can try and earn a goblet full of gems and honor, for a small fee. Inside, a large, wooden octagonal platform sits on the center stage... but there is a trick: it stands a few feet above the ground, balancing and tilting on a stout pole on its center, and a ring-out is an immediate disqualification. The tricky dwarven fighters have specialized on pushing off opponents as soon as they enter, and those who are hardier and can hold their ground and reach the finals find that the surface starts to spin, using centrifugal force to slide them off (the champion, of course, doesn't even try to fight and just holds to the post) [/u/VaranusNiloticus]
            A group of city guards are clustered around the entrance to an alleyway. They look concerned and serious. One guard exits the alleyway, and abruptly bends over and vomits with gusto all over the pavement. If any approach, they are waved away — "Nothing to see here. Go about your business." [/u/garumoo]
            A sign outside a shop selling manuscripts is crooked and jutting out into your path. If straightened or moved, a shelf of books falls over, knocking over another shelf of small paintings. Four servant boys appear in fresh finery. In the distance, the wail of a siren. [/u/garumoo]
            In a nearby back alley, an observant party member spots a lone cur, that whimpers and withdraws deeper into shadow. With skill checks, a player approaches to find:A hungry stray grateful for a bite, that reveals a secret tunnel it uses to navigate the city. Or the hungry "cur" is companion to a Ranger, judging by the collar he wears. Another Ranger can communicate with him, following him to an injured/dead/captured fellow ranger.The "cur" is a formidable hound badly treated by his owner. It might be a wealthy arrogant merchant, an animal handler in a traveling circus, etc. The hound can become a follower/familiar/companion. [/u/NorthEasternNomad]
            A nearby building explodes and trees rapidly grow from the rubble. Bystanders explain that this is the third attack like this in a month, and that they are the work of an anarchist collective of druids that believe cities are blasphemy upon nature. [/u/Jacknerik]
            Near the wizard's college is a stand selling ice cream. Occasionally, the bound elemental keeping it coll will try to break free, causing the cart to shake. The bored teenage girl running the stand takes no notice of this. [/u/911roofer]
            A miniature stage is set up on the side of a street, within it, small illusions tell the story of great adventures slaying a beast like a magical puppet show. A crowd of children sit on the floor in fron of this and adults stand a little further behind. When it ends, all the kids run off to wherever they're going, and a member of the party feels their purse get a little lighter in the commotion [/u/BobaPhobic]
            A child runs up to you and tries to sneakily stab you. •Her eyes pierce through her long black hair that covers her face. This little girl stares at you. You can feel an evil and malicious presence. [/u/BeboTheMaster]
            A doll or easel falls from a nearby multi-story building and nearly lands on the head of someone in the party! Anyone who looks at it feels a faint sense of unease, but it also looks expensive and valuable. You can hear an argument from the loft whose window it seemed to have dropped out of, and soon enough someone will lean out of it and ask the party if they can bring it upstairs, since they aren't finished with their artwork. If pressed, the artist says that he has other matters to attend to and can't come downstairs, but it's urgent that he get that piece back and soon. Is he just rude and bad at interacting with other people? Is he afraid of the outside? Is he in danger, or is he luring the party into some kind of trap? Will he even reward the party for giving him his work back? It's up to the DM. [/u/archDeaconstructor]
            1d4+1 Students of the nearby wizarding academy try out their newly learned spells in the alleyway and accidentaly a firebolt hits the party members. [/u/AdmiralCita]
            A man with a strange accent whose clothes incorporate the bones of animals is convincing nearby townsfolk to join him on a hunt on the morrow. Given the way that people are talking about him, he seems to be very convincing and jovial. He's just finished talking to a couple down the street, and he's eyed your party. He seems to be headed your way! [/u/archDeaconstructor]
            2d6 of friendly drunken hobbits ask the party to join their celebration of their newborn family member. They offeer good ale and raspberry flavoured tobacco.qq [/u/AdmiralCita]
            A bald man in robes is busy eating from a plate while also kickboxing a couple of brawny-looking folks in the regalia of the city guard. He seems to be making a fool of them. Given the crowd of onlookers, you're not sure if this is some kind of performance or just a hilariously failed attempt by the guard to arrest this man. [/u/archDeaconstructor]
            3d6 of spectral butterflies briefly circle around a party member with the highest wisdom and then fly away. People say it brings good luck, but noone knows. [/u/AdmiralCita]
            A famous, beloved explorer will be delivering new relics to the local museum or gallery, and wants to unveil them all in a brand new wing of the building in a few days. One of the menial guilds has backed out on contract, though, so she's short on manpower to actually set everything up and guard the exhibition until opening day. If you're interested, she's hiring- and she'll pay handsomely. Suspiciously handsomely, for menial work. [/u/archDeaconstructor]
            Random friendly dog happily brings a leather pouch containing 1d6 silver pieces and 1d4 human fingers. [/u/AdmiralCita]
            You come across several guardsmen hoisting a large battering ram so they can heave it against a gate. It seems the city official whose mansion is behind that gate is unwilling to leave- not only are the gates barred, but the window drapes are drawn down, and the doors are bolted shut. They were supposed to show up for an important meeting yesterday, and were going to make a speech today, but no one's heard anything from anyone inside. Most of the locals are worried- though some seem to be happy about it. [/u/archDeaconstructor]
            The players hear humming coming from underneath a manhole cover. If they open said manhole cover, they find a male gnome with a monocle and a top hat. He explains that he was trapped down there in a storm and that the manhole cover is a portal to a different realm. If the players walk into it, they end up in limbo. [/u/ThatMedian]
            A man in beggars robes appears. 7 tiny canaries with him. He asks the players to spare some food or coin. He is actually Bahamut in human form. If they help him, he grants them his blessing. They have advantage on WIS rolls for the next hour. If they don’t he moves along. If they attack the canaries become Wyvern. After players are subdued Bahamut gives them a lecture on justice and charity. [/u/BraveEagle]
            A city-guard is busy giving a lecture to a newbie. They use the players as an example, either positively or negatively, depending on their status in the city's eyes. For example: "Stop and Frisk" if the party are scofflaws, or "Soliciting Bribe" if the setting is somewhat fascist or corrupt. If the city views the players positively, the interaction is along the lines of "Did you see that ludicrous display last night? (Sports)" or "Good day, Squire" or something germaine to the overall plot. ("You be safe out there, I hear the masked bandit has struck again!") It could also be used as a way for the guards to deliver an message/invitation to the players: "Stop by the Station, the Lieutenant would like a word with ye". In an espionage campaign, the Player-Guard interaction may be used to communicate with the team secretly; falsely arresting and then slipping a message, or dragging in to talk in a theatrical manner. It could also be used as an intimidation tactic by a well connected political figure who controls the guards and has made enemies of the players... ("This is a message! *smash!*") [/u/MaxSizeIs]
            A gaggle of urchins hurries through the crowd city streets towards the party. One of them makes eye contact, before hurrying past and heading a round a corner. The city guard pushes their way forward asking everyone if they saw which way the kids went. [/u/Tounsley]
            The noonday bells only chimes twice before the rope holding the bell snaps and it plummets down the steeple, landing with a resounding gong, blowing the temples door open, and making many townsfolk believe there is devilry afoot. [/u/Tounsley]
            While walking by the stocks, one of the prisoners recognizes someone from the party, and asks a favour. Could be something as simple as scratching an itch they can't reach themselves, or perhaps something more involved, [/u/Tounsley]
            A intelligent huge mimic on a sturdy roof top of a one story building with other several buildings snug down on both sides. The mimic mainly stays on the edge of the roof draping a part of itself down the side of the tight alley side outside wall. It forms itself as a wet metal ladder. As an added incentive the mimic drops coins from pervious victims a few at a time to bait its ladder. When someone graps hold of the ladder (both hands and a foot hold), the mimic exudes its adhesive and grapples by rolling up its ladder/self at the same time. The mimic eats atop the roof. [/u/jjskellie]
            A woman is being attacked by thugs. If you ignore her cries for help she gets taken away. If you help her she takes you to her home where she and her sisters reveal themselves as succubi and try to kill you [/u/LordoftheFaff]
            You see a drunkard stumbling about. He greets your PCs in a friendly if overly affectionate manner before shuffling off singing at the top of his lungs. [/u/Sobek6]
            There is a striped carriage with the number 53 on the side that is someone moving uncontrollably without any houses (or driver for more modern RPG). [/u/need-original-name]
            A War-priest with a flaming sword steps in your way. He's limping and looks beaten up but holds himself proudly. "So here it ends." he speaks as a bewildered look slowly enters his face. "You're not them. I'm very sorry, please go along." [/u/MerionLial]
            A small critter (of the DM's choice) appears to be causing chaos, as everywhere it scampers people flee in horror.[/u/Ever_Impetuous]
            You stumble upon an alleyway chat and discover one stall in a nearby busy market is rigged to detonate in a Fireball when a specific noble approaches. [/u/Ever_Impetuous]
            You step in some viscous green goo... and it slithers away from you into a nearby sewer grate. The ground rumbles.[/u/Ever_Impetuous]
            The street is literally alive. This part of the city was built over a large Earth Elemental but it doesn't seem bothered to carry people to their destinations. However, it decides to block the adventurers from entering the street. [/u/Ever_Impetuous]
            A bird plummets from the sky right on a party member's head (1d4 physical). There is an arrow right through it... and a missive attached to its back. Someone didn't want this getting to its destination [/u/Ever_Impetuous]
            A street magician decides to turn your party's most anger-prone member into a joke. He uses prestidigitation to cover them in slick oil, change the color of their hair, and untie their shoelaces, all while mocking them.[/u/Ever_Impetuous]
            A piano crashes down 1d4 meters away from a party member. It must have been pushed off the balcony of that nearby building. But who would toss a piano out of a balcony?[/u/Ever_Impetuous]
            A person explodes in a gout of fire. Then 2 more nearby. A creature is possessing these victims before they ignite. Then the creature turns on the players! It could be that the victims (or at least one of them) are connected somehow. Are there more victims throughout the city? It's clear that the heroes must find this out before it happens again! [/u/MaxSizeIs]
            Household "Otto-Servant" warforged automatons have recently become a trend among the well to do. Their inventor sends a message to the players asking for help using an unassuming middleman as as a messenger. It seems the inventor fears for their life, as they narrowly escaped a lethal attack by one of their inventions! Tales of similar attacks spread like wildfire the following days - copycat attacks seem to be happening! Can the players protect the life of the inventor, and discover the conspiracy behind the attacks? [/u/MaxSizeIs]
            A rag-picker with his towering cart of discards rushes into your path. They stumble on a cobblestone, bringing the entire trolley crashing down on the street. You see glints amongst the strewn linen and furs ... [/u/ArtyNinja]
            A promoter catches sight of the party and seizes the opportunity. Each player must take a DC 10 CHA check or have a wrist-band for the all new bar 'The Whore's Shoe'. [/u/ArtyNinja]
            A throng of protestors block the road, bearing banners with slogans such as "Ditch the Witch" and "The hag's a hack". The leaders of the group, a human druid in am impressive headdress, and a dwarf Bard with a powerful voice are getting the frustrated crowd riled up with a powerful speech about the decadence, intransigence and failures of the powers that be. [/u/ArtyNinja]
            A few guards march past with a scrawny street urchin in tow. The child is manacled and clearly in pain. [/u/ArtyNinja]
            An unkempt mage is staring at a lamp-post, seemingly transfixed. He stands with a relaxed posture and smells of ozone.[/u/ArtyNinja]
            You spot a fruit seller dragging a cart through a solid wall and vanish. Inspecting the wall it appears to just be the solid outer wall of a general store.[/u/ArtyNinja]
            A street artist is making portraits for a reasonable price. The images seem to have a life of their own, with the faces smiling and winking at passers by. Some complete examples on the flagstones around him showing detailed backgrounds and activity but no actual muse. None the less the frames have the 'depicted' individuals name painted in gold letters. [/u/ArtyNinja]
            3 drunk students from the mages college are causing a ruckus in the street, causing hijinks and hilarity with their cantrips. One of them takes issue with the PCs, mistaking them for a reviled enemy. The gang tries to assert their dominance, and challenges the enemy and their 'minions' to a fight. [/u/ArtyNinja]
            A pack of (2d4 +2) rabid dogs bursts from an alley , directly in the path of the party. [/u/ArtyNinja]
            A chieftain born aloft on his vast shield by the shoulders of four tattooed warriors is rushed through the crowd, tailed by a Dwarf with a winged helm and a Goliath in striped pantaloons. [/u/ArtyNinja]
            A man in long white stockings with a glamorous golden quiff and accompanied by a small white dog disturbs the party to ask them if a hairy man with a black beard wearing a tricorne hat has been through here. Apparently the man has stolen something very dear to him and must be found at once.. [/u/ArtyNinja]
            A masked figure in a billowing black cloak leaps across the street from one rooftop to another. Their polished black mail gleams in the light. A smaller figure in a colourful leather jerkin with a quarterstaff strapped to their back jumps after him. [/u/ArtyNinja]
            You walk past an elite's compound as an angsty looking teenager emerges from a side-gate. They glance at the players and slouches off. After a minute or so banshee like screams emerge from the building... [/u/ArtyNinja]
            A building is being demolished on the street. The wrecking crew are on a break. [/u/ArtyNinja]
            A panicked crowd stampedes down the street. In the havoc you see innocents stumble and be crushed by the terrified crowd. Through the wails and screams you can hear one word: Giant. [/u/ArtyNinja]
            A sewer collapses into a sinkhole during heavy rains. Half of a neighborhood is now thirty feet underground. In a poor one: many people may be trapped beneath the rubble and possibly drowning.. but only a few heroes care enough to try and save the victims. Will those greedy land-developers get their way and clear out those dirty poor people once and for all? Was this part of a planned attack? In a wealthier neighborhood: a few gold-pieces and trinkets hint that the sinkhole may hide a treasure cache; a wealthy noble might mourn the loss of their precious object-d'art and pay the heroes to delve the hole to retrieve it. Anywhere: a small horde of 3d6 low-level semi-intelligent sewer monsters emerge, shouting abuse at the "sky-demons" who just invaded their home; swarms of vermin; slip-and-slides; and a labyrinthian network of secret tunnels! [/u/MaxSizeIs]
            A drug addict pleads for money from the players. He is suffering from the shakes, with his eyes darting in separate directions. He stammers unintelligibly in a hoarse voice, wringing his hands desperately. If the players don't help him out, it is revealed the addict is possessed by a Shadow Demon. He has the same stats as a commoner with +2 to DEX, INT, and CHA. He has the same resistances, immunities, vulnerabilities and abilities as a Shadow, and knows the spell Deeper Darkness and Shadow Evocation. [/u/ArtyNinja]

        mountain encounters
            It is migration season, thousands of goats are making their way up the mountain. They are blocking the path the party wishes to cross. To try and pass through them may cause trouble
            (Prep needed for exploring the city ruins) The remains of an abandoned city lies quietly in a valley between two great mountains. Evidence for the city’s collapse is not well hidden and perhaps even a bit devious in nature
            Friendly Stone Golems patrol the mountains in order to help smaller beings climb to the top. They cannot speak and often throw giant boulders for fun. This can be lead to serious misunderstandings of course
            (Prep needed if exploring the kobold city) All of the mountain peaks are covered in snow, all but one. The odd one out is home to a dormant volcano that is home to a small civilization of kobolds/goblins who worship an efreeti who only appears to the kobolds in the shape of a dragon. The efreeti is tricking the kobolds into thinking it is a dragon and would like to keep its ruse going.
            Birds in the cliffs nearby have grown to the size of lions due to their lack of competition when it comes to hunting prey. They are intelligent and offer wisdom or mockery depending on their mood
            (Prep needed if party wants to do how the Grinch stole Christmas) You discover the cavern of a ghoulish green furred beast that is plotting to attack a nearby town and ruin their festival. This information is easy to discover as there are plans strewn about all over the place
            There is a dimensional rift cracking through the stone of this portion of the mountain range, gravity occasionally reverses, and other spontaneous magic effects occur
            A ski resort operates on a hidden slope, it is run by Goblins who desire rare metals
            (Prep needed if they want to explore further into the mountain) A PC has a near fatal slip which leads to the discovery of an abandoned mineshaft within a deep ravine.
            A rickety bridge must be crossed in order for the party to continue on their journey. In the canyon walls is a harpy nest. The harpies live here and attack anyone who attempts to cross the bridge. If they kill the harpies their nest is not easily reachable, but if the party manages to climb into the canyon the harpy will have a few small trinkets they have collected from travelers who were not so lucky.
            A lone monk sits peacefully atop of the peaks. They claim to have mastered the art of reversing time
            Due to a magical accident hundreds of years ago the mountains radiate elemental energy. Random combustion is not uncommon and neither are Elementals
            In the middle of the night a bear has dug into the party’s packs and has stolen the underwear of one party member.
            Shattered statues of gold litter the snow, neglected by time. They appear to be adventurers rumored to have gone missing a few months before
            A powerful spirit guardian visits the party at night and attempts to lead them to their destination. They either take on the form of a four headed deer or a small white fox
            Atop the highest peak is a pool of clean spring water. Rumors say that those who drink from it will find their true love within a week. It is a well sought after ingredient for potion making
            Medicinal herbs grow all around the rocky slopes of this area, they are believed to be able to cure any illness. But they are guarded by poisonous ants who use it to feed their queen. If the party tries to mass collect the herbs the ants will attack.
            Every few weeks a strange light emanates from the mountains in the dead of night
            Abandoned minecart rails and minecarts run through entire range and can offer a quicker, but more dangerous, way to travel
            A stoic Cloud Giant lives near in the peaks of the mountain, they know where the party needs to go to finish their quest. But they will only give directions if they can make the giant laugh. They haven’t laughed in almost a century (This can either be really difficult or really easy to achieve)
            Nomadic Bards offer a detour through the mountains. They claim to know a, “Secret Tunnel”, they plan to get the party lost in the cavern network and then rob them.
            A crazed old hobgoblin challenges the party to a shield surf race down the snow packed slopes. The first to the bottom gets a prize.
            (Prep needed if exploring the dwarven forge) Within the mountain is a dwarven forge and after a serious accident molten metals begin exploding out from the natural vents and caves.
            Beautiful crystals line hard to reach cliffs. If your players are fortunate enough to collect some they will unfortunately discover it begins growing on exposed skin
            Rock insects have infested the entire range. Their camouflage allows them to be nearly invisible, watch your step of face their wrath
            Wounded and dying of exposure, a warrior lies slumped in a pile of snow. She is incredibly strong and is hunting a Warlock who they have sworn to kill.
            Strong winds threaten to force the party off the side of the mountain. Is it the wrath of nature or perhaps a supernatural entity?
            Fairies dance around a roaring waterfall. They act friendly and offer to heal the party, but beware.. They like to trick people into taking leaps of faith from the waterfall. If the a member goes to the bottom of the waterfall there is a small chest at the bottom of the pool, but they need to survive the jump first.
            (Prep needed to build stalactites villages) Numerous quarries line the mountain range. Villages are littered throughout, all of them are hanging upside down like stalactites
            A never ending fire burns within a crater. Travelers often come here to collect the flame, it is rumored that a god crashed here eons ago.
            The only effective means of travel is a long winding road that forces the party to walk in a single file line. It is not much of an issue until an Orc party discovers the vulnerable party and sets a trap for them from the high ground.
            In a ravine the party is passing through there are a series of large stone pillars that are blade shaped. They cut through anything that touches them. The “blades” are razor sharp and they say that they were once the weapons of gods. Several Griffons will swoop overhead and use the blade pillars as a natural trap to kill their prey.
            Deep within the blizzarding alps a lone peak is laced with flames. It is home to an ancient Dragon and a Sorcerer who worships and protects their master
            Roll for which player who is going to be kidnapped by a Giant. Have fun!
            A range of glass mountains shine brilliantly in the light. Their reason for existing is unknown
            Clouds swirl around the peak, they are dense and have an almost unnatural appearance to them, as if they were stairs leading up to the heavens, if the party chooses to walk on the clouds they discover an Aarakocra city that is built around a portal to the plane of air. They guard this portal to protect the material plane.
            Avalanche! The party are now trapped in a monster’s den. For a more dramatic challenge, all but one player is unconscious
            A sickly looking child is wandering alone in the cold, they speak incoherent gibberish. If the party help this child and let them travel along, after reaching a safe destination they will reveal themselves as a spirit of the mountain, rewarding the party with blessings or treasure
            The mountain pass is long but not too difficult to traverse. However, this specific path is looping over and over again without end. A wizard is playing a prank on the party, by using illusions to force the party to go in circles. He likes to test how long a party will continue before they realize it. After the party figures it out he wishes to test the most intelligent member to game of intellect.
            Flail Snails emerge from the mountain caves at night, their shells lighting up the dark night. They are dangerous but can be easily tamed
            A meteor blasts through the summit, the debris rains down upon the party. It is quite deadly if they are hit. The crater is smoking and is home to a new mysterious plant
            Smoke blows up from a dozen chimneys atop a bizarrely shaped house. It is home to a shy alchemist who collects rare materials from the alps
            Clockwork animals occupy the area. They act like regular animals… All except for Archimedes the glitchy owl. A loud creature that claims to have been created by a space demon, a small crashed spaceship can be found if the party spends the day searching the mountainside
            (Prep needed if party follows to find the city) Civilians are traveling all throughout the mountain pass. With all of their belongings they venture toward a developing city in the valley. It’s a great/safe place to make new connections
            Spider webbing covers the entrance to a cave. Within the webs a sign reads, “Fortune readings in exchange for beautiful cups or tankards.” Sounds trustworthy enough. Inside is an old tabaxi that has trained two phase spiders. If she does not like the offerings made by the party she will not allow them to leave.
            An icy spring protected by a fey spirit who will become angry at anyone who attempts to drink out of it
            A camp of miners ask your party to sit down and join them for drinks. They are fascinated by the life of adventure your party leads
            Poisonous mist swirls around the sierra, be careful not to lose consciousness while it seeps through your skin
            (Prep needed if the party wishes to go to the monastery) Built into the side of the jagged stone, a Monk Temple sits peacefully amidst the storm
            Bound to the mountain, a hellish warrior slaughters anyone who enters their domain. They warrior cannot leave his domain (DM discretion how large this area is) They are horrendously powerful and would wipe out any unsuspecting low-level party
            Hosting a prestigious singing competition, a Purple Dragon with a tie and top hat invites all to watch this once in a lifetime event. Gods, Spirits, Giants, Beholders, etc.. are all participants
            A campfire burns brightly on the side of the road, no one is around. Food is roasting, bottles left unopened, treasure left untouched. Do you search for those who set up this camp or take it for yourselves? It is another party of adventurers who may be on the same quest as you, but for different purposes.
            The party comes across a range of cliffs that have the appearance of blood cascading down the sides. The "blood" is an overgrowth of Ruby Blushroses and Undead Bloodroses, which make the area beautiful up close but also sinister. If the party enters the cliff area the aroma of the Bloodroses becomes distinct and the area is heavily populated with undead. Party will be attacked as they try to leave. Those that die in this patch of the mountains become part of the undead that wander within the smell of the Bloodroses. You become attracted to the smell as part of the undead.
            Atop the highest peak is a pool of black liquid. Rumors say that those who drink from it have visions of the future. It is a well sought after ingredient for potion making
            Frozen in ice a monstrous beast is slowly thawing, it is extremely powerful and once loose it would wreak havoc on all the countryside
            During a storm the party while looking for shelter sees an old temple. In the middle of the temple is an altar with an opening that exposes open sky. If a party member approaches and touch the altar lightning will strike the altar and course through the party member. PC takes 3d10 lightning damage, but the party member’s eyes begin to glow as they have gained newfound powers. They’ve been selected by a powerful deity to carry out a prophecy
            Thrown from the top of the mountain, a wooden chest filled with cursed magic items has been disposed of, never to be found again. Well until you rolled this random encounter
            Hidden away from the rest of the world, an observatory keeps track of planetary movement, stars, and unusual phenomenon. The observatory is run by a elf who is part of a secret organization. The elf is unwilling to part with his secrets that reside within the somber halls.
            Single Large Obelisk Stone: The Obelisk is home to the Stoneman. A fey who can earthglide about and loves to insults adventurers. At the base of the Obelisk is a table with pies. The pies are made up of dirt and fungi. Each pie has a different effect. One pie might heal you. One pie might poison you. Roll 1d4 for number of pies, and a D6 for the pie's effect.
            a. 1 - Fully Heals the player
            b. 2 - Turns hair grey, stays this way for 3d4 days,
            c. 3 - Player’s legs grow twice as long, gain the spell JUMP, cast once a day. Lasts for 1d4+2 days,
            d. 4 - PC starts to vomit uncontrollably for 1d4+2 hours, after which it receives resistance to poison for 1d4+1 days,
            e. 5 - Player grows an extra set of arms. Last for 3d4+1 hours. Gains a climb speed of 10ft,
            f. 6 - Lose 2d4 hit points. Last 1d4+1 days
            60. Stone Well with Arcane Ruins, drinking the water grants the drinker the spell feather fall for one day
            61. Dragon Temple, Archway is cut into the mountain. Inside is a 6ft egg that is all stone. It is on a platform with pillars all around it. There is some weird language write on the walls and the pillars. This is a copper dragon egg, but the mother is away from the nest…for now.
            62. A rope with pitons, old, hanging in the wall above. If the party climbs up to the where the rope ends a set of good climbing gear and a Human mythril pocket watch can be found in a crevice on a ledge with the skeleton of the poor Human, hand bones still stuck between a boulder and the cliffside.
            63. Ancient Stone Pillar that is destroyed.
            64. Cave opening, if Players come inside have a swarm of bats come out at them.
            65. Players come upon a large nest. Inside the nest is 1d4+1 eggs. There is nothing else in the nest right now. Roll d100, 50+ a Roc will show up in 1d4 hours if the eggs are taken and is very angry.
            66. Party finds a cave roll a D6 to determine what is in it.
            a. 1 - Empty
            b. 2 - Small Cave with ancient writing
            c. 3 - Animals (DM picks, suggestions: Saber Tooth Tiger, Bears, Wolves, Snow Leopard, Deer, Rams, Moose, Foxes, Squirrels, etc. )
            d. 4 - Monster (Use Kobold Fight Club to make Medium-Deadly encounter)
            e. 5 - Old Straw Bed, Tattered Blanket and Warm Clothes, Blackened Fire Pit
            f. 6 - Locked Chest 50% chance of being trapped
            67. Half-Ogre (Brakor), He Lives in a small hut and is Neutral. Around the house is a bunch of bird cages. The Ogre is not going to be hostile to the PC. He protects animals and lives out here because he was rejected by his village.
            68. The party finds in a forgotten cave a body of a great hero placed in the isolated mountains to be naturally mummified encased in ice. The mummy was bound by cairns (large pile of carefully placed stones) that have since collapsed, releasing them as an enraged undead.
            69. The party comes across several druids who follow Silvanus (God of Nature) who are making a holy pilgrimage to an ancient grove high up the mountains. If the party decides to join them they can watch an ancient ritual to Silvanus which only occurs once every 50 years. All manners of beasts and awakened plants will join in the ritual.
            70. The party finds tracks of a large bear and several smaller tracks that are very recent. A mother Bear w/1d4 Cubs will appear from a nearby forested area, they will be nervous and will defend their territory from the intruders.
            71. A bunch of friendly Mage College kids are on spring break and are heading into a cave to do some spelunking, maybe a monster lurks in the cave and the party has to save the kids. Give each kid 2-3 cantrips that they know from Mage College to help in the fight.
            72. Abandoned Mine with lantern, buckets, pickaxe, and shovel present roll a D6 to determine the type of mine
            a. 1 - Picked Clean
            b. 2 - Copper
            c. 3 - Silver
            d. 4 - Mithril
            e. 5 - Lead Ore
            f. 6 - Adamantium
            73. A slow strain of smoke gives hints of a campsite. Roll a D4 to determine who is at the campsite.
            a. 1 - Empty - Recently vacated
            b. 2 - Hermit who is tracking the migratory patterns of local birds
            c. 3 - Bandits who were recently attacked by a monster, they are injured and in need of assistance. The monster will return in 10 minutes.
            d. 4 - Thugs who are hostile and will attack on sight
            74. A mountain man, is pilfering through a couple of recent corpses scavenging for food and supplies, he is desperate and there is a wild look in his eye.
            75. The party finds on the mountain slopes the skeletons of a giant and a dragon, still locked in mortal combat
            76. The party find a hidden Dwarven watchtower carved into a mountain face. They are not initially friendly if the party goes to investigate, but can be persuaded to let the party in with the right negotiation tactics. (Dwarves love their mead, ale, and spirits)
            77. (Prep needed if party chooses to explore the city) A metal shack has a faint shimmer in the light, inside you discover a hideaway for Deep Gnome Guards. They are playing cards and are willing to make bets with anybody. If friendly enough they may let the party pass through into a Svirfneblin city that is located below the shack. A long deep elevator shaft can take them to city.
            78. The party find a small waterfall that is always frozen. A group of Ice Mephits live here with their pet Polar Bear. If anyone goes to investigate the waterfall closely they will warn the party to stay away, if the party is persistent they will let loose their pet.
            79. (Prep needed if party wishes to investigate the fort) Ruined, abandoned fort heavily fortified in the mountains
            80. The party uncovers a wrecked and frozen hull of some great ship, how did it get up in the mountains?
            81. An elk stampede is coming towards the party. The elk are startled because of Orcs riding Worgs that are hunting the herd, they are hostile if they encounter the party
            82. The party's path is covered in thin ice that could become treacherous to try and cross
            83. A sudden blizzard hits and the party has to make skill checks to attempt to find their way in this blizzard, if they fail they can become disoriented and may need to stop and find a nearby shelter
            84. Heavy snow hits which halves the speed of the party's march this day. It also becomes extremely cold and if the party isn't prepared may suffer levels of exhaustion
            85. A mountain with snow on the top, mid way is covered in cherry blossoms, and the bottom mostly mud and rock. The mountain will look like a god dropped their giant Neapolitan ice-cream.
            86. The players spot a man at the peak of a mountain, standing unmoved by the strong wing staring away at something on the horizon. If they approach him the man explains that he's a sorcerer and is about to spread his daughter's ashes in the wind, with an enchantment on them to grow a maple tree wherever they fall. If they let him, they find the path ahead of them later to be filled with these trees, and occasionally find creatures embedded in them.
            87. Party comes across an Archeologist and his small band on a dig. They are uncovering a monstrous leviathan that may have come from the far realms. If the party helps out the Archeologist a PC may have visions from the far realms and suffer madness as they uncover an artifact. Or they get some boon from the artifact as the artifact can tap into a small amount of a Great Old One's power.
            88. Fresh water mountain stream with small flakes of gold, a prospector is at the stream. He is friendly unless the party tries to steal his gold in the stream.
            89. A Fey Goatman is herding his sheep through the mountains. The fey has lost one his sheep and asks the party to help him look. The Goatman warns these sheep are more unique than what the party is use to. The party can search for the sheep. The sheep are hard to catch as they have the ability to dimension door across the mountainside. A dispel magic, counterspell, or a well timed grapple might be able to help corral the sheep. The Goatman will reward the players for helping him out.
            90. A broken bridge appears before the party with a rushing river beneath. The party needs to figure out how to cross the bridge without falling into the rapids and possibly get hypothermia. A troll or other monster might be living near the bridge.
            91. They find a traveler almost frozen to death, will they give him rations? Lose time by trying to help him back to the village? Leave him to die?
            92. Mountain pool with some beautiful flowers on a small island in the middle of crystal clear pond. There is a statue in the middle. The statue is protected by a Water Genasi and its friend Water Weird. The Genasi is sitting cross-legged meditating on the island. There are sapphires at the bottom of the pond that are easily visible through the clear waters. If a person tries to enter the water the Genasi will warn not to disturb the water, the statue does not like that. If they persist and enter the water to get the sapphires then the water will freeze solid trapping the person underneath the ice or the PC is stuck in place halfway in the water. The Water Weird appears and the Genasi begrudgingly pulls out its greatsword, Roll initiative.
            93. A black knight stands in the path of the party and does not let anyone pass. The black knight will demand a duel. Feel free to add in any Monty Python references you deem necessary.
            94. A Dwarven patrol. Will warn of common dangers in the mountains.
            95. A Hill Giant patrol, which will attack.
            96. Rock slide which has collapsed part of the road. Party must either turn around and waste several hours with an alternate route, or make some climb checks to avoid some damage/being trapped for awhile in a small ravine.
            97. Owlbear wandering by itself. It is quite hungry. With a large amount of food offered, it will follow the party around for a bit and help out for a little while if the party befriended it, if not enough food is given it will see the party as food.
            98. Two mountains that started as one, but now have a giant circular gap in the middle, presumably from a meteor blast. The two mountains converge at a singular point, and that point has a chunk of meteor balancing perfectly on it. If the players decide to interact with the meteor and disturb the balance whatsoever, the two mountains start to collapse and the players must restore the meteor for them to stop
            99. Mountain goat. Will chew on any clothes of any character who comes nearby and will be generally friendly. Can readily climb up and down the mountain with no problem, but cannot carry a humanoid rider. Cannot act like a pack animal, either.
            100. Party comes upon a cave housing a family of Winter Wolves. The beasts will growl warningly if the party tries to enter, and will attack if the party tries to force their way in. The party can continue on past the entrance, but the beasts will follow the party (perception rolls or just general sense of being stalked) and will ultimately attack the party at night if not dealt with beforehand.

        dungeon encounters
            [1] A talking wolf in literal sheep’s clothes offers a wheel of cheese and a magical item for a handful of gold
            [2] The ground crumbles beneath you revealing another level of the dungeon made of sand
            [3] Glowing butterflies dance around the party gently resting on their shoulders. They seem harmless enough, but slowly they begin to drain away the party’s life force
            [4] Introducing the Demon of Doors, each door leads you to a room full of, you guessed it. More doors! You can escape this room but only if you’re able to survive.
            [5] A shrine flooded with purple liquid holds an important clue for an upcoming quest
            [6] It appears this dungeon infested with monsters and ghouls is also home to a blind dog with incredible luck. Keep this ole girl around her luck might rub off onto you as well
            [7] Shit! You’ve run into another group of adventurers who are looking for the EXACT same magic item. Each one mirrors a certain member of the party
            [8] Creeping behind in the shadowed corners of the halls, a Goblin stalks the party. They are sketching portraits of all the members, thinking they are beautiful. But they are too embarrassed to admit it
            [9] Impaled on a stalagmite, the skeleton remains of a warrior holds a valuable shield with a burdensome curse. Voices appear inside player’s heads if they attempt to dissuade them from looting
            [10] Beyond some hanging moss a forgotten grotto lies in wait. Time does not move while players explore the remains
            [11] Sleeping in an alcove a vagabond slumbers restlessly, they are surrounded by rare alcoholic drinks and assorted potions
            [12] You doofus! One of your players trips and pulls a hidden lever. Suddenly this dungeon begins to rattle as it becomes animated. Turns out this place is really the innards of a mechanical leviathan
            [13] Everyone’s stomachs jump as the room’s gravity completely reverses
            [14] Create a brand new mimic, the dumber the better. (Examples: Torch, Loaf of Bread)
            [15] A small room has an opal table with a map of the dungeon carved into it. Miscellaneous tabletop miniatures of the same material in various locations. What do you suppose happens when someone moves the pieces?
            [16] Success! After defeating the boss players attempt to steal the golden treasure but it begins to melt as soon as they touch it. It is very hot and begins flooding the chambers dramatically
            [17] There is a colony of octopus and spider hybrids, they are weaving a web of dripping ink. Despite their appearance, they love visitors and are quite friendly. But they hate magic
            [18] Behind this door is… A food court? Anybody want Subway or Taco Bell?
            [19] A magical item in one of the player’s inventories floats out and begins approaching something unknown
            [20] Pools of water lead act as dimensions to other realms. This lasts as long as the player can hold their breath, otherwise they are teleported back
            [21] Two fiendish gargoyles sit atop stone slabs. Oh, and of course they’ll come to life. And no, I’m not talking about the gargoyles. It’s time to fight some angry slabs!
            [22] Glyphs glow radiant blues and greens, touching these glyphs will grant you temporary powers, these powers range from useful to useless
            [23] Covered with tarp, a dusty brewing stand holds some bottles of colorful liquids. Alone, these potions don’t have much of an effect, but maybe when combined…
            [24] Punk goblins host a concert for anyone willing to spare some silver
            [25] A necrotic artifact sits beneath a stream of water, its aura is alluring. Anyone who touches the artifact becomes attuned to it, permanently. It has great benefits, but can also be unpredictable
            [26] As soon as you enter into the dungeon, an animated hand puppet offers cryptic advice
            [27] Wandering the halls, an immortal raccoon drags a giant wardrobe around proudly. The wardrobe supposedly grants access to another world. The raccoon can summon almost any object it desires from within, but you don’t seem to have as much luck
            [28] Frogs are everywhere. They worship the Frog Queen who resides deep within the depths of the cavern
            [29] The entire hall is lined with flowers that grow gems and crystals, they glow beautifully
            [30] You discover the remains of an ancient civilization! Turns out they had some pretty interesting alien technology. No, DO NOT let your wizard have the gun
            [31] Seemingly normal stairs leads your party into a strange labyrinth of stairs that defy the laws of reality
            [32] Magic bugs blend into the stone walls and floor, but when disturbed they swarm and form stone fists that attempt to grapple members of the party
            [33] Blue flames erupt from the cracking walls. Now is a good time to run
            [34] Yup. It’s time to introduce the snow snakes. And they are ADORABLE
            [35] Sentient rocks attempt to warn the party of a great danger, unfortunately they cannot speak
            [36] A grumpy beast known as Peter Moss wants you out of their part of the dungeon. They are hiding a hoard of treasure maps and tissue boxes
            [37] Party stumbles onto the boss already dead as they looting, a group of investigators arrive and frame them all for murder
            [38] A false wall reveals a series of tunnels that lead to an underground city. The inhabitants have always lived here, and did not know there was anything above them. They assumed they were the only culture in the world
            [39] A real estate agent attempts to sell the dungeon to the party for, “A total steal”
            [40] That magic item you’ve been thinking about giving your players? Yeah, it’s time
            [41] Seven doors in a circular room contain varying dangers and paths toward the rest of the dungeon. One door is chained shut, within it a cursed book floats ominously in the air. It obviously exudes an aura of evil and will grant the player forbidden knowledge
            [42] A trio of iron golems have made their home below ground after being abandoned by their master. They are scared of all other creatures
            [43] Constructed with defense in mind, this dungeon has many puzzles and locks that are operated and activated with wind. Fiendish air elementals mess with the party’s progression
            [44] Will-o-wisps dance playfully about. Are they here to help or hinder?
            [45] An ancient wishing well with an ornate design holds coins of a forgotten civilization. If anyone takes the coins out they will be struck with a curse… Or illness because that water is nasty
            [46] A monster dance club has just opened up and the toll is relatively cheap
            [47] Floral beasts hide within a rock covered field of flowers. If you inhale the pollen you may become subject to their charm
            [48] Beneath the cobbled floors a society of Imps have made themselves a home. They like the trick and tease the players as often as they can
            [49] Beneath the cracked brick floors a society of Fairies live in secret. They like to assist and encourage the players as much as possible
            [50] You’ve discovered a mystical portal! Various other portals are scattered throughout the dungeon. Perhaps if you can learn to navigate them it will prove quite useful
            [51] A bloodthirsty doppelganger takes the form of a child, pretending to be lost and alone
            [52] The traps and puzzles in the next room can be easily broken/deactivated by a specific member of the party. A magical trap for a Wizard, a massive stone that can only be lifted by a Barbarian, a small hole only accessible to a Druid, etc..
            [53] Goblins assault the party from the shadows, a direct hit! Wait a minute… It seems that the mysterious potions they have been chucking, are potions of restoration. What fools! We are now stronger than ever!
            [54] An adorable pocket sized water elemental takes a liking to the party, leaving behind their lonely flooded portion of the dungeon
            [55] In the hands of a dead adventurer is a powerful magical gauntlet and three mysterious cards. These cards offer game altering consequences if activated, they are known as the Deck of Many Things
            [56] A band of treasure hunters prove to be quite the annoyance for the party
            [57] One hundred and one sentient fish school together to form a monstrous warrior. As long as you don’t steal their giant magical pearls, they might even offer protection or guidance
            [58] A room reveals a concert hall where demigods of all sorts watch an intriguing and strangely irresistible performance. Be careful, or you’ll be stuck here forever
            [59] The entire next section of the dungeon is slowly shifting around making navigation quite difficult
            [60] A pedestal waits silently in front of a large archaic door. It’s mechanisms are impossibly complex, requiring an orb to activate the pedestal and door. Within lies a trial, a Modest Test of Strength where a mechanical beast attempts to best you in combat in exchange for treasure
            [61] Magic energy radiates from the center of the dungeon. Players are randomly polymorphed into various creatures/animals for a short period of time
            [62] A swarm of severed hands attack the party and attempt to steal their magic items
            [63] A monster controls every aspect of the dungeon. Temperature, lightning, enemies, traps, etc… They are known as the Dungeon Master. And if you discover their control room, you now guide the dungeon however you please
            [64] Players discover a seemingly abandoned library full of magical tomes. Books that increase Stats and lost and powerful spells
            [65] The boss of the dungeon is disguised as a Beholder/Dragon/Lich. But in reality they are a gecko who just wants to be left alone
            [66] The dungeon itself is slowly being consumed by a black hole, tread carefully
            [67] Party discover a magical door that can be used to pass through walls of five feet or less for convenient travel. But, the door is cursed and may sometimes lead the players somewhere unexpected
            [68] An ancient aberration trails behind the party tricking them with illusory magic in attempt to steal their memories
            [69] “You are the chosen one…” the Demon mutters as light strikes the arm of a player. They have now obtained a magical glowing tattoo that appears to be a map. The map leads to a timeshare scam down in the tropics where other ‘Chosen Ones’ also appear
            [70] A group of teen goth ghost hunters accidentally try to capture the party
            [71] Carved with impressive detail, a small golden totem with eyes of emerald beckons to the players to touch it. If two creatures touch the totem, they swap souls. Hopefully there isn’t a spider nesting on the backside…
            [72] Players discover a room with a diorama of their main town with dolls resembling important figures
            [73] An earthquake rocks the foundation of the dungeon causing it to slowly begin to collapse
            [74] Lycanthropy you say? Of course. Roll for which player is now being hunted by a Werewolf
            [75] Reward your players! Let them discover a hidden room full of treasure. No tricks, just sweet sweet loot. They deserve it after rolling some of these encounters!
            [76] A family of toll troll’s are scattered throughout the dungeon and force anyone who wants to pass to pay a hefty tax. If the party assaults any of these trolls, they will be held accountable and be summoned to troll court
            [77] As soon as the party sets foot in the dungeon three guardians activate. They defend this dungeon and it’s master. They are a tough fight, never fight more than one
            [78] Night of the living Furbies
            [79] The entire dungeon is submerged in water. A hungry beast looks to the party for a snack
            [80] Twelve decaying statues fill up a room representing the Zodiac. Each one offers a unique blessing that lasts for twenty-four hours. Only one blessing per player (Gemini allows someone to split into two, Libra grants inspiration for one who pursues justice, Cancer turns them into a giant fucking crab)
            [81] Every adventuring party wants a baby Dragon for a companion! Give them a golden opportunity to save an abandoned egg, doomed to perish without their help
            [82] A magical hole sits quietly high above the party. Occasionally magical items and other junk are tossed down from it. It seems you’ve discovered a wizarding college’s trash room
            [83] The soul of a demon is trapped within a crystal ball. Of course they attempt to trick you into releasing them, but simply holding the crystal ball grants you a special ability. Sorry buddy, but looks like you’re stuck in there forever!
            [84] Stone golems are protecting a temple, they are indestructible and hit hard. But, they have a glowing core that is connected to a source. Destroy the source, and they will go down
            [85] The flickering light of a small lantern dances across an underground lake, beside it sits a peculiar old man who claims he is fishing for keys
            [86] An open cavern made entirely of a crystalline structure is before you. You can grab spare deposits of this cavern but if you make too loud a sound, the ceiling will begin to collapse
            [87] What appears to be glowing treasure turns out to be an important artifact of a divine deity. They assumed the player who grabbed it is a follower of theirs and is now attempting to send them on a righteous pilgrimage as a test of faith
            [88] What’s scarier than a shark? A cave shark. With legs and an incredibly good sense of smell
            [89] After a nonlethal cave in, one party member was struck on the head and knocked unconscious. Now they have random visions of the past and future
            [90] Lost and afraid a drunken teen necromancer wanders the tunnels aimlessly. You’ve met Xanth the Wizard. He’s a Neutral Good Human but his addiction to alcohol is quite troublesome
            [91] Gelatinous cubes that try to sell you reasonable health insurance. They wear suits and ties
            [92] An interdimensional prison contains notorious and sometimes ancient evils. This includes a Lich, Vampires, Demons, Deadly Criminals, etc.. Nobody is supposed to know of this place
            [93] Descending lower and lower into the dungeon slowly weakens all magic. A source of great anti-magic lies at the bottom
            [94] The study of a con artist contains a mass collection of false treasure maps, all forged by the con themself
            [95] A burial chamber contains the preserved bodies of aliens. Most of their belongings have been destroyed or looted, but a undiscovered plasma gun remains with a few charges left
            [96] You stumble into a Kobold elementary school. They are very friendly
            [97] Prehistoric beasts are perfectly preserved in some amber are discovered on the ceiling
            [98] Neglected elixirs and potions sit atop an alchemy table, but whoops! Somebody bumps into it. Rather than an explosion, this colossal mess forms into a living monster. They are either dangerous or very friendly
            [99] “What the hell? Is that a tavern? No use in neglecting this golden opportunity, drinks are on me!”
            [100] Various segments of the dungeon alter the moods of the party members. Happiness, Gloom, Frustration, Apathy, etc… Hopefully the party don’t end up killing each other while navigating the long and confusing tunnels
            1 This wing of the dungeon seems abandoned, it’s covered in webs and rat droppings. You hear a crackling and a clinking from deep within it. If you go in, you find a small, golden-scaled kobold in an empty room. He’s holding a bag of copper coin, throwing them into the air and laughing to himself. He’s surrounded with bear traps, strings and poorly-hidden holes. The wall behind him is full of small holes. He hears you approaching and turns with great speed, eyes wide open. It dashes inside one of the holes, you hear shuffling noises, and a few moments later he comes out, without money. With a big smile he says in a squeaky voice “Wellcome, guests. Welcome to Ratleg shop of great things to buy, the richest merchants probably ever. My holes are filled with incredible treasures, want to buy or sell anything? No stealing, No touching.”
            2 The room is filled with goblins, but none of them seems interested in fighting. Some are playing cards, one is lazily dangling on a hammock, others are eating and others again carrying around items. These goblins are minions of the dungeon owner, but the pay is bad and the job is difficult. When the players attacked, the goblins smelled how things would go, and they went on strike. At the moment, they are stealing everything that isn’t bolted to the dungeon floor, ready to leave. If the players want, the goblins are willing to trade with them.
            3 You hear a rough, violent screaming from a trap-door. Down a 3 meters deep shaft, you see an orc. Well-armed and muscular, wearing leather armour, the orc stops yelling when he notices you’re not the dungeon owners. The orc is a ranger, he tried to attack the dungeon alone but got captured. If the players free him, he promises he will help them kill everybody in the dungeon and then leave. Is it true? Probably.
            4 The corridor is blocked by a large gargoyle, sitting on the floor. He raises a hand, and tells you “Halt! None shall… eh, whatever. Look, can you just leave? I know it’s a pain, you probably got places to go, stuff to do. Not me, I just sit here, not letting people pass. Go me.” The gargoyle was gifted to the dungeon owner by a friend. He doesn’t like his job, at all. He’s old, tired and depressed. It’s not even a rooftop! Who puts a gargoyle guarding a corridor? Absurd. He can be befriended.
            5 The room is occupied entirely by a large bear, chained to a wall. Emaciated and wounded, there is dry blood on her fur. The bear was the original owner of the dungeon until it was stolen from her. She was shoved in a room and left to die. The players can save and befriend her. She won’t follow them once they leave the dungeon unless they really work for it. She’s wearing a worn leather collar with a small pouch, it must have belonged to some druid or ranger, many years ago.
            1 A group of drows exploring near the surface was ambushed and massacred by the dungeon owners. One of them survived and is on a vengeance quest. They will try to murder anybody they find, even the PCs. Maybe they can be reasoned with, after a good beating.
            2 The dungeon boss has been executing their minions, placing their heads and bodies on spikes to scare and motivate the others. The dead minions didn’t appreciate, and have come back as vengeful undeads, but are still impaled.
            3 There is a hole in the middle of the dungeon, it was here before anybody occupied it, and nobody knows what it’s for. The only thing the locals know is that, sometimes, people disappear near it. Also, it’s said that kicking someone else inside it can bring great luck. Perhaps a reward from whatever dwells at the bottom of it?
            4 A section of the dungeon suddenly collapses, the rock and earth become mud, suffocating its inhabitants. It’s a Dao, an earth genie. The dungeon is getting close to his hidden underground mine, and he’s removing it, using magic to reshape and destroy the dungeon until it’s entirely cancelled, with everybody in it. The genie is a shapeshifter and could be doing this while pretending to be a regular dungeon monster.
            5 A section of the dungeon is walled off. Something lurks in there, in the dark. Some dungeon occupants started disappearing a few weeks ago. Some are still trapped in there, somewhere. Sometimes you can hear their cries for help echoing through the empty halls.
            1 On the dungeon walls there are “warning” posters, telling the locals to stay away from dangerous individuals, some are local NPCs the players have met, some of the players are also in there, with their adventures being described comically, the way an outsider with limited information could have seen them.
            2 Tiny, cute and fluffy creatures are used in the dungeons as servants: butlers, cleaners, cooks etc, they are very meek and will continue working while the players fight, too scared to stop until the dungeon boss is defeated, and they kindly ask the players to not accidentally hurt them while they run around the battlefield with plates of food or brooms.
            3 There are traps in the dungeon, but in one area they have been deactivated to be cleaned and fixed, they are all exposed with buckets and rags next to them.
            4 The players find a document and realize the dungeon has been sold to the bad guys by the local government.
            5 A goblin jester has been working in the dungeon, entertaining and annoying the owners. Once the players start fighting, noticing they are stronger, the jester insists to join them and starts following them. Then asks to be paid. If threatened, he just runs away.
            1 The boss starts the battle already wounded, their room trashed. There is a dead drow assassin in a corner of the room.
            2 There is a floating stone pyramid in a room of the dungeon, with some of the inhabitants worshipping it. If they are killed around the pyramid, they are instantly brought back as undeads. After a while, or if the pyramid is attacked or investigated, it fizzles and disappears.
            3 There is a corridor filled with enemies, lit by torches. Suddenly, all the flames go away, and unnatural darkness fills the area. Nobody can see through it. The players feel something cold and slimy brushing them, going towards the dungeon exist. Then, the lights turn back on. All the enemies are dead, cold, eyes-wide-open in terror.
            4 There is a table filled with food, in the middle of the dungeon. Some of the inhabitants are gorging themselves on it. No matter how much they or the players eat from it, the food never seems to end. It’s high-quality food, and of animals and plants from all over the world. If the players leave to come back later, they are unable to find this room again.
            5 In a section of the dungeon there are some rather elaborate graves covered in flowers and candles. They are very well kept, and the dungeon inhabitants seem afraid of getting close. There are no obvious marks that indicate who’s buried there, or at least none the players recognize.

        Ocean encounters
            [1] Whirlpools plague the seas causing everyone to go under. You awaken to find yourselves starring in an underwater Game Show
            [2] Pink fog looms in and puts everyone on board to sleep
            [3] In the middle of the ocean a barnacle infested bridge stretches out for miles. Where does it lead?
            [4] Mysterious metallic orbs float in the water, contact with these orbs is not advised
            [5] An archipelago of volcanic rock is within range. At first glance it seems to be nothing special, but upon a closer look a stranded party can be seen. Do you offer them assistance?
            [6] Too many days out at sea is causing one of the party members to suffer from a bizarre sickness. They keep attempting to jump into the water to “answer the call”
            [7] A peddler of fruits and artifacts pedals on a water bike toward the ship with awful sales
            [8] Another lonely night under the stars as the ship crashes through the waves. One of the players finds themself unable to rest as a shooting star goes by. They are inspired
            [9] A ghoulish ship festered with skeleton warriors fast approaches. It seems as if they are about to attack, but it turns out they just like to prank passing ships before hanging out to drink and party
            [10] Lionfish swarm the ship. And no not the fish, I’m talking about the half-fish, half-lions
            [11] Message in a bottle? Nope. A demon in a bottle. They are willing to do anything for their release
            [12] Powerful storms plague your crew for three days. Strong winds blow the navigator’s map off the boat, forever lost to the sea
            [13] It seems as if you have sailed into a Giant’s port town. Unable to turn back you must make do with your current situation
            [14] A ball of flames strikes the water twenty miles out, the steam causes the scene to be unviewable. What could it possibly be? Certainly not aliens?
            [15] While leaving the docks out to your ocean adventure, someone has accidentally placed some dangerous crates aboard the ship
            [16] The perfect tropical island appears into view. It is not a mirage, it is not cursed. It’s perfect
            [17] Sky pirates appear for some wild shenanigans
            [18] While fishing for some food someone manages to snag a Treasure chest full of magical books
            [19] Despite the sturdiness of the ship, leaks have become very common as of late. The source of this continual damage is a magical sea slug with a stomach of steel
            [20] While admiring the largest and most brilliant coral reef you’ve ever seen, you suffer a surprise attack. The source of this assault is the reef itself. It is a sentient monster known as Brain Coral, it’s psychic attacks are lethal
            [21] Mermaid Pirates with a thirst for sailors tail your ship
            [22] A juggernaut ship approaches. So large in fact, the entire ship is kingdom with its own laws and government
            [23] Every night eerie whistling haunts everyone aboard. Despite all efforts to ward off the ghost, nothing has worked. The source of the whistling is an unfamiliar stowaway
            [24] Greedy lobsters keep sneaking aboard to steal the ship’s gold
            [25] Everyone shares the same dream, a mysterious fire engulfs the ship and everyone aboard is captured within
            [26] While fishing someone manages to snag a fancy ring made of seashells. If anyone is to put this on they are accepting a marriage proposal from a mermaid or deep sea monstrosity
            [27] Rumors circulate around the ship about one of the players, soon nobody aboard trusts them
            [28] A sleepy sailor accidentally steers into another, smaller ship in the night. This collision completely destroys the other ship
            [29] A strange harbor town is located in the middle of nowhere, it is surrounded by water on all sides. Everyone in the town is superstitious and they speak in tongues. Be very cautious…
            [30] There has been a bounty put onto you and your crew. The attackers are relentless and can transform into sharks
            [31] Without warning a hurricane strikes the ship and is swallowed up and flung far away. Everyone loses consciousness. When you awaken, you find yourselves on an island made entirely of gelatin
            [32] In the distance a colorful object floats in the sky. The floating object is a dinner table with balloons attached. Strange beings are eating and laughing merrily. It seems to be some sort of party
            [33] Supplies have taken a hit, your crew won’t last more than a week. A few days pass slowly but on the fourth day you arrive upon a small island with a hut in the center. It seems lived in, perhaps they can offer some assistance
            [34] The ship you purchase/rent for your journey is actually alive and communicates from the bow’s figurehead which is designed like a strange serpentine dragon
            [35] Far away from civilization you spot two colossal beasts brawling in the middle of the ocean. The battle is intense and could put your entire crew in danger
            [36] The food on board is infested with poisonous spiders
            [37] An entire armada of walrus pirates looms nearby. If you cannot escape from the armada, be prepared to present to them some sort of offering in exchange for your freedom
            [38] A sudden drop in temperature hits, a fortress of ice nearby is the source. Inside is a powerful mage with abundant treasures
            [39] Floating in the water is an unusually large fishhook. It grants the user the ability to change into any animal. But the hook is cracked making it difficult, if not impossible, to control
            [40] An unknown inky substance wades in the water, within it are hundreds of dead creatures of the sea. The ink continues to appear for many miles. Someone is behind this
            [41] Your ship crashes into seemingly nothing until the illusion dissipates and a grand island is revealed. It seems to be someone’s home… And they didn’t want anyone to find it
            [42] A hammerhead shark attacks the ship like a battering ram. The attacks are powerful as its head is encrusted with diamond
            [43] While scanning the horizon a leviathan rises to the surface, they approach curiously. Have no fear, for this is a gentle giant
            [44] A society of narwhals square off in a fencing tournament. Care to join?
            [45] Elemental islands are discovered in the distance. One of fire, one of ice, one of lightning.
            [46] Sea urchins attach themselves to the hull. They are harmless until provoked
            [47] As you travel into uncharted territory, a guardian of the ocean halts your travel. Is your quest worthy or will you be sunk to the bottom of the sea?
            [48] Curious merfolk call out to your boat. They are fascinated by objects from the surface, specifically paper
            [49] New discovery! An island that is entirely purple, this includes the plants, the sand, and even the living creatures hidden within
            [50] Navigation leads your journey toward a cursed battlefield, all evidence of this battle is now below the sea. A vengeful spirit possess someone on board, they attempt to stir up a mutiny
            [51] Everything aboard the ship seems to be in the wrong spot. “Did someone redecorate? No? But I could have sworn…”
            [52] A wizard surfs on top of a gigantic manta ray, doing tricks and tons of other cool magic shit
            [53] The legends were true. A leviathan that hunts and consumes ships. Unfortunately, you’re next on the menu, escape is impossible. As you are swallowed, you discover a society living within the beast
            [54] Floating chunks of ice are actually chunks of sugar. The source is a wasteful candy/sugar factory out on the sea
            [55] A floating flea market passes leisurely by. Most of the items for sale are incredibly rare
            [56] Horns sound off in the distance, it seems a yacht is challenging your ship to a race. The prize for winning is grand
            [57] Ever since you left the docks, this ship has been falling apart. Even if you attempt to get another ship, it seems your party is cursed to ruin every ship they touch, even enemy ships
            [58] Glowing fish and impossible aquatic life can be spotted around the ship. All of them are undiscovered
            [59] Something inside a party member’s inventory activates a passage into the sea itself. This leads to an underwater country. Where on earth did you get the key? I’m sure the rulers of this secret country want to know
            [60] You’ve caught an abomination! A fishy beast from the greatest depths of the sea somehow ends up in the boat. Anyone that consumes this disgustingly delicious looking fish will be permanently granted underwater breathing. This includes gills and some scales
            [61] A ship made entirely of gold sails silently by. The ship is eerily empty
            [62] Mutiny! Do you accept this trade of command, or will you fight for the captain?
            [63] Fairy scavengers board the ship in the middle of the night demanding your valuables! Gold? We don’t need gold, give us your best seashells!
            [64] The discovery of a new country awaits your crew. Unfortunately a plague ravages the ports
            [65] Among the wreckage of an unknown vessel a waterlogged cat is spotted, still alive. This friendly fellow happens to have a treasure map hidden in their collar
            [66] Friendly mermaids offer to weave a magical sail, one that can travel three times faster than a normal sail. Despite the heavy cost, this purchase must surely be worth it?
            [67] Ten miles out from shore unnatural seaweed extends above the surface grabbing all that pass by. It is essentially a ship graveyard
            [68] A society of snails live upon a surprisingly large piece of driftwood. They worship the wind
            [69] Emerging from the waves, a Hippocampus approaches with a request in exchange for a wish. But their request is very strange
            [70] In what seems like a dream a devilish fiend sells you a treasure map. Upon waking up, you cannot find the map. But you may notice the chart is now tattooed on your back
            [71] An unidentified flying object crashes into the water. Is it a wizard, alien, or something else?
            [72] Knowledge is power! Friendly creatures have floating libraries navigating around the great oceans of the world. Discover some very special books within these salty shelves
            [73] Two powerful mages hold a grand battle that brews up a nasty storm
            [74] Sentient bandit eels pay you a nasty visit
            [75] The skies have cleared and a beautiful rainbow glows in the distance. As you continue navigating, the rainbow appears closer and closer…
            [76] A goddess of the sea performs a fish orchestra. She invites herself aboard the ship for a chat after the show
            [77] Like a video game, water textures begin glitching out mysteriously. Below the surface a castle dwells
            [78] A floating village is occupied by quiet and welcoming folks. But a dark secret resides behind their simple exterior. Stay vigilant
            [79] Right off the shore of a tropical island, colorful fruits bob aimlessly. The weird fruits are actually a blessing in disguise. They have adapted to their environment and grow and reproduce in water. They provide essential nutrients
            [80] After months of cruel travel, you curse the sea! The sea responds by attempting to kick your ass
            [81] Red lightning cracks and bleeds into the billowing storm clouds. Ghostly ships turned upside down barrel through the darkness, appearing in all shapes and sizes
            [82] Without anyone noticing, a cute seabird has joined the crew! Unfortunately, they hate one person on the boat and defecate on them constantly
            [83] CRASH! Something has hit the ship! You go to inspect the damage but are stopped as a mysterious force bashes into the ship once again. Do you fight or attempt to run from this assailant?
            [84] Two warring factions seem to appear out of nowhere and you are trapped in the middle!
            [85] Crew members begin noticing a ghastly woman hobbling along the deck. They see her in their dreams
            [86] A monstrous steam powered vessel puts your rinky-dink dinghy to shame
            [87] Rocky waves cause the cargo below deck to smash into the wall revealing a secret compartment
            [88] Today fishing has been tremendously fruitful! We shall not starve for a month!
            [89] Today fishing has turned into a nightmare. While fishing you feel a tug as something begins to drag you into the water for a delicious snack
            [90] Colossal flowers have grown from the bottom of the ocean. They are ominous but breathtakingly beautiful
            [91] Floating out only a few miles out crates float by unattended. They contain zoo animals
            [92] The Bermuda Triangle is real, as are the legends of course. Try not to die
            [93] Coconut pirates with sleeping darts attempt to steal your greatest treasure!
            [94] As the blackness of the night’s sky blends into the sea, loud humming rattles the boat. You feel a sense of nausea. You discover haunting lights glow beneath the waves before shooting off and disappearing forever. Is this an omen?
            [95] An isle with strange architecture atop. It seems to be a classic dungeon, surely great treasures lie within
            [96] “What is this? Oh. I think I pulled some sort of plug… Oh no. It’s the ocean! We ruined the planet!”
            [97] A musical string of islands known as the Arpeggio Archipelago is home to a Dragon. This Dragon has cursed these lands so all that step on the shore must sing or suffer the consequences
            [98] The coolest pirate goblin rides on a one eyed dolphin selling weapons and sea urchins. And yes, the only weapon they sell is the Swordfish
            [99] Rowing in on a tiny raft two businessmen ask to board. They want to buy your ship in exchange for their rowboat. Of course this is foolish and you will decline. But little did you know, while you discuss business with one, the other is stealing planks one by one
            [100] Okay… Hear me out. Curse of the Werewalrus. Thank you
            1 A large sea creature emerges not far from the player’s boat. It’s wounded and floats about very slowly. Shortly after, sharks and other creatures start attacking it, attracted by its blood. If helped, it will accompany the players on the rest of their trip, protecting or even dragging their boat.
            2 A beautiful siren is leaning on a rock in the middle of the sea, playing an instrument and singing a delicate song. If approached, she explains that she would like to move to the big city to become a famous singer and is looking for a ride to the nearest port.
            3 There is a floating town in the middle of the sea. Simple huts on rafts, connected by ropes and bridges, around a hundred people. Its inhabitants live in harmony with nature, mostly fishing, farming some plants that grow on the water surface and farming pearls. They move around following the currents and sometimes move over trade routes to meet merchants.
            4 Something emerges violently from the sea, right below the players' ship, almost overturning it. It’s a large brass sphere. From it, a wet man with a long white beard covered in crabs, shrimps and algae emerge. He explains he had an underwater lab, but he messed up and it collapsed. He barely escaped. As his escape sphere starts sinking, he asks if the players can kindly give him a ride to land.
            5 A woman wearing goggles and a scarf riding a hippopogriff (half hippopotamus, half hippogriff) lands on the boat. She explains she was forced to take a detour by a storm, and her beast needs some rest and asks if they can let her stay for a while. In the meanwhile, she’s got some trinket to sell, or they could do some sparring.
            1 The players pass through an area of the sea where powerful currents go in apparently random directions, creating a sort of labyrinth that any ship will have to cleverly navigate trough. It’s clearly not natural, as the currents form precise 90° angles.
            2 A group of noblemen merefolks emerges, asking to meet the “exotic surface dwellers”, visit the players' ship and, if they don’t bite, they would like trying to feed them.
            3 A fog of cloud covers the sea, and in it, the players see strange images: battles and assaults between ships, but they’re very old. Ancient fights. Echoes of sailors and pirates from the past. Except, one of the figures in the fog seems to notice the players and acknowledge them.
            4 The players are stopped by a patrol: under the area of sea in front of them, a battle is going on. Two armies of underwater civilizations with mages and sea monsters. The players should wait for a few hours to not get involved. Every now and then, in the distance, they can see an underwater explosion, or the water turning red, corpses and flotsam. Sometimes an enormous tentacle emerges. They will have to sail through the mess. Also, pay a toll to the patrol.
            5 There is a large statue of some kind in the middle of the ocean. It holds a stone slab with a list of names. Legend says, a thousand meters below, on the bottom of the sea, is a cave. In that cave, a hero and her companions died to stop an aboleth. The gods created the statue with their names as a memorial to their sacrifice.
            1 The players find a floating bottle, inside it is a message in an unknown language. The bottle is nearly two meters long, and so is the message. Only a giant or something of similar size could have used and written something like this.
            2 There is am an area in the ocean with no wind, no currents and no fishes. The water is perfectly immobile, it’s an area a couple of hundred meters wide, a perfect circle. Even during a storm, this zone is perfectly calm.
            3 A whale emerges near the player’s boat, stands there for a few minutes, then disappears. The players may notice the whale is wearing a tiny hat and monocle.
            4 An island is visible in the distance, but it’s not marked on any map. If the players move towards it, the island doesn’t get any closer, it remains at the same distance. If the players move, the island remains at the same distance and relative position compared to the boat. No matter where they go, it’s always there, barely visible at the horizon.
            5 When the players look at the water, they notice the reflection of their boat is different from reality. It’s a different boat, different flags, and their own faces reflected in the water are different. They may not even be of the same race. After a while, the reflection isn’t of a boat at all. They see fields, or a town, the inside of an inn.
            1 Multiple anchors fly out of the water and land on the boat, blocking it. Undead pirates and merefolks, climbing on the chains, attack the boat.
            2 There is a monumental graveyard. It’s just there, floating in the middle of the sea, large stone crypts with stone roads, heavy gates and statues. It seems to be slowly but steadily sinking, the players don’t have much time if they want to explore it.
            3 The water under the boat freezes. A weird guy completely naked except for a shark skin covering his head rushes towards the boat screaming something about a toll and tries to climb over the ship side.
            4 There is a splash, and something jumps out of the water, landing on the ship bridge. It’s a merfolk, wearing cuffs, with a big wound on their side, barely stitched up. They explain that sea elves are looking for them, and ask the players to help hide them and lie to the elves. They’re a wanted criminal, but it’s all a misunderstanding, really. They have no money right now, but soon they’ll pay the players back for sure.
            5 A great rainbow fish emerges from the water, its dorsal fin waving hypnotically. The sailors are enthralled by it, and start climbing down the ship to swim towards it. As the players attempt to resist, the fish eyes start to glow.

        Extraplanar encounters
            1 With a popping sound, an eyeball appears in mid-air. It rotates, looking around the room, then fixes on some apparently unimportant object. Then, a blue tunic appears around the eye. Then, two spindly arms. One holds a blank scroll, the other a quill. The thing, staring at the object silently, starts writing. There is no ink, hard to say what it’s writing. After a few minutes, it disappears.
            2 You hear a bubbling noise. In the middle of the room, in mid-air, something is dripping water, as if there was a hole just floating there. Rapidly, the hole gets larger and a lot of water flows out, but it doesn’t last long, and soon it’s just a drizzle. Through the hole you see somewhere else, a window to another place, maybe another plane. Wet stone, dripping chains, iron grates and the sound of the sea.
            A voice comes from the hole “Hello? Hello? Anyone here? I’m trapped, help me and I will reward you. I’m quite wealthy, okay? Hi? Hello? Fucking- if this spell failed again I swear…”
            3 The players find cultists performing a ritual, they’ve opened a portal and they’re trying to summon something. Problem is, whatever is on the other side, doesn’t want to come. As the cultists chant, trying their best to keep the ritual going, the cult leader is in front of the portal, begging, screaming, pleading, on the verge of tears. The entity on the other side seems adamant that it just won’t happen, for now.
            4 As soon as the villain is defeated, a lanky devil appears in a cloud of sulfur. It has a long grey beard, a floppy hat, long pointy black shoes and a staff. It laughs, spinning in mid-air. “Finally, I can get all my stuff back.” A horde of imps with sacs appear and start shoving everything in them. Books, furniture, cutlery. They throw every possible loot in the bags and disappear somewhere, as the large devil laughs and spins “You’ll never be done paying your late fees, you asshole!” it yells at the body.
            5 There is a hooded figure kneeling in a corner, crying and sobbing, covering their face with their hands. If the players try to approach, the figure shows their face: where the eyes should be is just a hole, a dark abyss that seems to go down hundreds of meters, cold and terrible. The players can hear a scratching noise echoing in the distance, then hands start crawling outside the hole in the person’s face. Hundreds of long, thin, pale arms, entangled with each other, pushing each other, with hands that claw and grab towards the players.
            1 There is a crackling, terrible smell of oil and sweat fills the room, making your eyes burn. A door opens, and you see a monstrous creature: a tall, insect-like humanoid, with six thin, hairy limbs, large compound eyes and long fangs dripping with black oil. In one hand, it holds an empty sac. In another, a scale. “A debt must be repaid. Baalzebul, The Perfect, Lord of the Seventh, demands what is due.”
            2 A group of masked individuals barges into the room, breathing heavily. They are covered in leather and spikes, with contorted, demonic, red masks covering their faces. They all hold strange weapons, blades with way too many curves and spikes to be functional. “Oh, finally.” You hear one of them say. They all appear quite excited and cheerful, if tired. “Hey, look, we’re sorry but we have to kill you. We have a murder quota and, well, we’re really behind. Nothing personal, really, normally we’d never do such a sloppy job but we’re in a terrible hurry so… yeah.”
            3 A geyser erupts out of the ground, making everything shake. Rocks, dirt and scolding water rain all around. From the column of water emerges a fish person, followed by a second, then a third and a fourth. They are all wearing scale armour and wielding weapons that appear to be made out of coral. “The hour of reckoning cometh, driers” Yells the first fish person. “Soon the great sea will flood your entire, miserable, water-less lands and the great elemental water will take its rightful place atop the world. Prepare for your humid demise, dry fiends”
            4 A deafening roar shakes the entire building, followed by the crashing of stone and wood. As you get close, you see a large portal, on the other side of it you can see a luxurious forest with enormous trees. You see a massive creature, similar to a lizard, but a hundred times larger, with a colossal jaw and tiny arms. It’s on the ground, its weight crushed a wall. There are many wounds on the beasts, spears and arrows sticking out of it. Standing triumphantly on top of it is an enormous dwarf, muscular enough to be mistaken for a short ogre, and twice as hairy. Barechested. It has an axe in one hand, and a spear in the other. Around the beast, numerous slender people wearing wooden masks and green cloaks. They all have bows, spears or hooks. “Bloody heavens what a majestic hunt. My blood is lava.” Screams the dwarf. “I’m damn pumped, this isn’t enough. You!” he yells, pointing at the players. “You look strong. Fight me. You are being hunted by Doborovir Ironcrush, greatest hunter in Ysgard. Be honoured, and put up a good fight as I skewer you!”
            5 A door opens, and a trio rolls out. One is a tall, cloaked figure wielding a long sword. The other look like regular folks, a male elf wearing a jacket and a dwarf woman in a dress. The three are fighting, grappling and hitting each other. “Get out of my tavern, you freak!” screams the man in red while dragging the cloaked one to the ground. “The dwarf looks around and says “I don’t think we’re in your tavern anymore, Gerard. Or in Sigil, for that matters.
            1 There is long, high-pitched noise, then a flash of orange light, then a very large, decorated, brass sphere appears in mid-air, it hoovers for a while, then it crashes down making everything shake. A door opens and two dwarves with bronze skins and flaming beards roll out. A third, larger Azer walks out behind them, screaming profanities, and starts kicking the first two in the ass, yelling something about a goblin smacking his face on the instruments being able to make better calibrations.
            2 You were the only people in the room, you are sure of that, but all of a sudden you notice an intruder. In a corner is sitting a hooded figure. Its long, blue robes cover its body entirely, and it’s perfectly immobile. In front of it, a tiny table. On the table, several items. They all seem… wrong. Slightly misshapen, the wrong colour, the wrong smell maybe, but you can’t pinpoint exactly what. All you know is they give you a strange uneasiness, and a bizarre crawling sensation up your spine when you stare at them too long.
            3 The ground explodes, and from the dust emerges an elf holding a golden and white flag. She’s wearing a very elaborate, snow-white armour that resembles a swan, a long white cape and a scimitar hangs from her golden belt. “Beware, fiends and evil-doers, holy retribution cometh on alabaster wings! Come forth, a righteous bulwark awaits. Reveal yourself, and ye shall be crushed ‘till no bone is left unbroken, no blood is left unspilled and no muscle is left untorn! A scorching for the ages up your sinful a- oh, well met, travellers.” Every word is screamed at the top of her lungs.
            4 Growing out of a corner of the room, like a sort of repugnant tumour, is an orange, pulsating sac filled with liquid surrounded by tendrils. Next to it a pale humanoid, naked and featureless. Its face is completely blank. It wiggles its long, slender fingers toward you, and on its face appears a slit that turns into a disturbingly large mouth. It speaks “Heeelllooo, ladies and gentlemen. Mmmmh. Adventurersss, I take it? How quaint. Sssay, perhaps are you wouuunded? Tired? This here pod contains the best healing juices you’ll eeeever find. In but a minute you’ll be good as new, for a minuscle fee. The soothing sap, glopping and stirring, plip plop. It’s a very pleasant experience if I can say so myself. Anyone interested?”
            5 There is an elf, breathing heavily, kneeling in a corner of the room. She’s wearing leather armour, a backpack and goggles. She’s smoking, as if she just jumped out of a furnace. She looks up at you with a smile, and speaks, even if with some difficulty “Hey, hi pant, how’s it? Say, do you happen to know what plane this is? huff I believe I’m a bit lost.”
            1 As the players are fighting, a Djinn appears and starts taking notes. He explains he’s gonna buy the location, as soon as the players have cleared it. Don’t mind him, he won’t disturb.
            2 The evil gods gave a blessing to the villains. Too bad it came in the form of a slobbering, stinking, roiling mass of flesh that has been rolling around, plaguing the place. The bad guys don’t even understand what they’re supposed to do with it, so they’ve just locked it up somewhere. If free, it starts going around with no apparent logic.
            3 Aurora borealis appears in the area. A faint song can be heard in the distance, muffled, as if coming from a dream. Horns play, then words, a poem. They talk of great deeds, adventures, heroes of the past. After a while, it dissipates. The players feel refreshed and full of energy. It is an echo from Valhalla: sometimes they can be heard by heroes on a battlefield, echoing in all corners of the universe.
            4 As an opponent is defeated, a look of terror runs across their face. A metallic door appears, it slams open, noxious gasses and sickly green arms pour out, grabbing the poor enemy. As they are dragged inside, screaming and kicking helplessly, laughter echoes in the room, then a voice “time to pay your debt,[insert enemy name here], I hope you enjoyed our gifts, while they lasted.” It closes and disappears, leaving only a terrible smell behind.
            5 A bunch of wet fish drop from the ceiling. They slap the players on the head and flop helplessly on the wet floor. Sometimes, when a lot of magic is used in one place, planar boundaries soften a bit, it happens. It’s probably nothing to worry about.

        town encounters
            [1] An enormous bear stumbles around town wearing human clothing. They’re attempting to order drinks at the local tavern, but so far they haven’t had much luck
            [2] You arrive early morning into a quiet little village. Unfortunately nobody is around to greet you because they have all been turned into candy
            [3] A festival is taking place in the center of town. They seem to be celebrating a historical figure that looks oddly similar to someone in the party
            [4] Dashing through the streets, a bandit has stolen a powerful magic artifact. Anyone they pass by are turned to stone. A hefty reward will be given to anyone who can catch them
            [5] Hm? In your back pocket there’s a piece of paper with directions to somewhere in town. If asked about the location, nobody seems to know where it is
            [6] While walking through the streets a child runs into the party at full speed, falling to the ground. They apologize profusely as they begin to collect their dropped goods. This includes a baby dragon
            [7] Rumor: The guards in this town are not human, they never sleep. Most people speculate they are from another realm
            [8] Enticing smells fill the air, there seems to be a cooking competition in town. And it looks like it’s not too late to sign up. Anybody know how to make a killer quiche?
            [9] Rumor: Beneath the city lies an ancient tunnel leading to a thief’s lost treasure. But everyone is too afraid to look for themselves. When prompted on what is down there, people dance around the question
            [10] Sentient vegetables rebel against the local chef. At first glance it seems to be a harmless prank, but anyone bit by the veggies begin morphing into vicious vegetables themselves
            [11] Magic is outlawed in this district of town. Anyone who casts any spell begins to glow
            [12] Little ducklings follow behind the party, quacking merrily. They are perfectly harmless but without their mother. Did somebody order 8 new beautiful children?
            [13] Ghosts have driven out the living from the town leaving behind a literal Ghost Town. The Ghosts are actually quite friendly, too friendly
            [14] Rumor: Grandma Crabapple, a sweet old lady who lives alone in her cottage up on the hill is actually a Doppelganger. Looks like we’re going to have to eat her famous cherry pie and get to the bottom of this mystery
            [15] The local tavern has been recently reconstructed, a group of rowdy adventurers burned it down a few months back. The locals don’t take kindly to any adventurers now
            [16] Every year in spring a nearby lake floods, threatening the village’s safety. But every year the cobblestone wall surrounding them keeps them safe. But this year, something goes horribly wrong. And it’s probably one of your player’s fault
            [17] Rumor: The local school is teaching children to summon demons and worship the devil
            [18] Rotten tomatoes fly as an Orc Bard attempts to perform in the streets for gold
            [19] A potion brewer has set up shop in town, they have an extra special brew that grants anyone who drinks it invisibility. But the effect happens randomly and without warning
            [20] Perched upon a crumbling building, a gargantuan bird watches the town silently. The villagers claim that wishing upon one of the bird’s feathers can grant a wish. Unfortunately the bird doesn’t shed very often and doesn’t like to be bothered
            [21] Rumor: The alcohol in the bar is watered down with a substitute that creates intense cravings for more alcohol
            [22] Transcending space and time, you cat appears. They are to scale with your figurines and demand your attention
            [23] Goblins have invaded! Oh, looks like they’re just selling baked goods at reasonable prices. You win this time Goblins…
            [24] The water wells have frozen over unexpectedly. A sentient ice elemental is passing through
            [25] You have entered into a town created with sand and dirt, there is a lone tower in the center. A wizard has created their own town by controlling local ants. The wizard smells really bad
            [26] A real life celebrity has a look-alike in your campaign, and they are the bartender at a small tavern with dreams of being famous
            [27] A Magic Shop is selling the most illegitimate looking magic items you’ve ever seen. But for some reason people are flooding to their stand and buying all of their merch. Do they not realize?
            [28] Rumor: In this small farming town, the Scarecrows are said to awaken at night looking to exchange bodies with anyone who loses to them at their game. The game is hopscotch
            [29] You’ve been handed a flyer for a local religious group. It seems they worship an Insect god. Surely they are up to no good! Oooh, look! They have a buffet!
            [30] A horse cart race is under way, are you in?
            [31] Out of the sewers, four turtles emerge. They have varying magical mutations. One can turn invisible, another has super speed, the remaining turtle’s powers are unknown. They are causing quite a ruckus in town
            [32] Rumor: Eerie whistling is heard by the graveyard every night. The townspeople believe it is a restless spirit
            [33]  Tap dancing frogs, followed by synchronized flying ravens appear. A local swamp witch is accomplishing her dream. She expects applause and tips, or else
            [34] A group of local teens are attempting to fundraise a dangerous project. They promise that it will revolutionize the world
            [35] Rumor: The leader of this town is actually a dozen frogs in a trenchcoat
            [36] You are given a free lotion sample at a stand. The lotion has strange side effects including but not limited to, sprouting wings
            [37] A villager appears to the party, they are an obvious caricature of your favorite video game character
            [38] Servants of a local noble rebel. They are protesting outside the castle
            [39] There is a college within the town that holds forgotten history. It’s a favorite among the world’s most powerful magicians. Surely you’ll meet someone interesting inside?
            [40] Many clues lead you to believe that there are witches hiding in the city. The truth is, the entire town is a coven, everyone is a witch. Can you trust this coven?
            [41] There is a flea-market in town with hundreds of vendors selling everything from valuable artisan goods to worthless junk. If you’re lucky you may find a neglected magic item for sale
            [42] A thieves guild takeover is currently underway and somehow you’ve managed to get involved
            [43] An earthquake ravages the city, within the rubble ancient prophetic texts are discovered
            [44] Rumor: Beneath the meat shop there is an illegal underground fighting ring. What will you do? Stop it from getting out of hand, make some bets, or sign up as a fighter yourself?
            [45] Riots in the streets spark as an unjust ruler is appointed into a position of great power
            [46] Taco Bell is real and Baja Blast is now canon
            [47] Rumor: An unknown infant Monster is roaming the streets. It is incredibly dangerous and there is a bounty for its capture. People believe it is a Basilisk
            [48] Twin scientists advertise around town for their Monster business. They buy and sell monster parts and some interesting Monster related goods
            [49] The town drunk happens to know a lot of interesting/important information but nobody seems to be listening
            [50] The world’s first train operates within this bustling city. While visiting a catastrophic event occurs involving a busted engine
            [51] Rumor: Pranksters have animated the children’s toys and stuffed animals at the local General Store causing some traumatic memories for the local kids. People believe the culprits are the store owners themselves. But how true is this claim?
            [52] Rumor: The abandoned castle on the hill is full of tremendous treasure and wealth. But so far nobody has discovered where it is hidden
            [53] Local crime lord strolls around town with their new love interest. Everyone is afraid of this criminal but do nothing to stop them from taking advantage of their town
            [54] An industrialized revolution is happening! Lots of unique goods and services are all over the city. But this massive urban development comes with a steep cost. Nature spirits are planning an attack on the city for invading their homeland
            [55] You are in a town blessed by nature. Colorful fauna is everywhere and on every building. It is a beautiful culmination of nature and society. They also grow rare and exotic crops
            [56] Yup. It finally happened. The most chaotic member of the party has a bounty. Good luck
            [57] This town is inhabited entirely by avian beings. They are friendly, but most places are inaccessible if you can’t fly
            [58] A local Barber is willing to give your party’s pet a cool new haircut. What’s that? They have no hair you say? No problem! Stylish wigs are also an option
            [59] “Welcome! Tonight is the big game! The Bardic and Wizarding colleges are going to face off! Be sure to buy your tickets now!”
            [60] Zelda-esque mini games are all over the place! Smash pots, hit some targets, win some rupees!
            [61] A town of sentient horses. An equestrian experience nobody will forget
            [62] Stone guardians have become animated and are rampaging through the town. First we must stop the guardians. Second we have to figure out who did this
            [63] Rumor: Buildings are falling apart as bricks and stones are disappearing randomly. Some believe the bricks are alive. It’s the curse of the Were-Bricks!
            [64] A special promotion for a local tavern is given to anyone who can catch and dispose of the rats from their basement. Problem is, these rats aren’t just simple street rats
            [65] Did somebody say, Shopping montage? A trendy fashion store has opened up, it’s the perfect to accessorize! Maybe some new outfits for the next campaign arc?
            [66] Just put your players in the town of Whiterun from Skyrim. Perfect
            [67] And while I’m talking Skyrim, instead of stealing Whiterun. Instead you should just quote the Skyrim NPC’s constantly. “Let me guess… someone stole your sweetroll.”
            [68] Rumor: A mad scientist has created life, but the being has escaped and stalks the dark alleyways
            [69] A bird delivers an important letter to a member of the party… That or it’s a 25% off coupon for a local Costume store
            [70] The circus is in town! But something’s not quite right. The attendants of the shows can never recall what happens during the performances but are always dying to go back
            [71] A knock off group of Fantasy Avengers appear and take credit for the party’s heroic deeds. They do this multiple times throughout the campaign. I’d suggest settling this debacle once and for all in battle!
            [72] “Welcome! Have you checked out our main attraction? It’s our pride and joy! People come from all over the world to catch a glimpse of this spectacle!” Examples: House made entirely out of food. A skyscraper that can reach space. A wishing well that supposedly grants one word wishes. A captivating glowing orb of pure hatred and hellfire
            [73] Rumor: During a full moon a store opens up for business selling strange artifacts. Rumors also suggest the owner of this business is the Devil himself
            [74] Giant Snail races are being hosted tonight, care to make a wager?
            [75] Rumor: The local fortune teller has been warning the village of some ominous futures. Surely this is just a ploy to snag some extra profit?
            [76] A carnival you say? Introduce a bunch of sleazy carnies to con your party into massive debt. A debt so large that it can only be repaid with even sleazier side quests
            [77] A FUN carnival you say? Let your players participate in some fun games to show off their strengths and clever skills (AKA cheating)
            [78] Local orphans take a liking to your party, they are very sweet
            [79] Roll initiative! A mugger has attacked- Oh! False alarm. It’s only a knife salesman
            [80] A bored god appears within the city demanding the town’s finest ales and to battle an honorable adversary
            [81] The local Odditorium* is an enticing tourist trap that is offering a questionable new promotion (Think, The Mystery Shack from Gravity Falls or Ripley’s Believe It or Not!)
            [82] The most unlikely individual offers the party an assassin job. Unfortunately, this job is wacky and requires dressing up like members of a circus
            [83] A blessing! Local flower shop gifts a player a lucky daffodil. Good fortune and prosperity is in their future
            [84] A curse! One of your players has been struck with a curse of familiarity. In every town you enter someone will swear they look just like someone else and mistake them for said person
            [85] Rumor: There’s a rumor going around about your party. A bad one. Nobody trusts you
            [86] It is migrating season for Unicorns and this town is in the middle of their migration path. Despite their beauty, these Unicorns are dangerous and untrusting
            [87] The entire town is riddled with traps and wires, be careful where you step
            [88] As your party travels through the town, one member of the party seems to be teleported to another realm. In reality they haven’t moved at all. Stranger things have happened I’m sure. It’s probably nothing (It’s definitely something)
            [89] Rumor: A man known as the Master of Riddles lives in town. He will reward anyone for solving his riddles. But the rewards are unlike anything anyone’s ever seen
            [90] Taxidermied animals rampage through the streets, a Necromancer is to blame
            [91] Your reoccurring “Big Bad Villain” just happens to be in town. They don’t immediately recognize the party and seem to be doing some pretty domestic stuff. Is this their hometown or is this just a pit stop in their travels?
            [92] This river settlement is quite large. They have just begun developing this area, most buildings are still being constructed. The tavern, inn and a few shops are open. Trouble looms in the distance as a large beast’s home is directly below
            [93] Local pants thieves begin messing with the party and it is hilarious
            [94] Rumor: Inside the oldest building in town there is an ancient door that is said to lead to the heavens. Nobody has ever been able to open the door, not even with magic. The key’s location is an unsolved mystery. Some say the key is buried somewhere nearby
            [95] Rumor: Local inventor claims to have created a machine that can fly and is willing to pay anyone to give it a test run
            [96] Dozens of missing person and lost item posters are all around the town (For an extra twist, one of the missing people is someone in the party)
            [97] In the center of town lies a guild of mice adventurers. They protect this town and make sure all outsiders are trustworthy
            [98] Take all the snacks and drinks you and your players brought to today’s session and create a boss fight out of it! It emerges from the earth with little to no warning
            [99] A group of teens run around the city role playing their favorite book characters. Unfortunately these characters are swashbuckling looters. Time to put these kids in time out
            [100] A traveling merchant sells odd wooden closets, drawers, and chests. When opened, these objects lead to portals between dimensions. Suddenly, one of the closets tip over and the doors swing open
            1 You open the door and find yourself into a nearly empty room. No furniture, lamps, tables. There is one person inside, a female human. Blindfolded. She’s kneeling on the floor. In front of her is a small candle. “To a question, an answer, then a toll. But beware, those who beckon secrets often find the roil of time hides only regrets.” She sais, then she remains silent.
            2 You see the ghost of an old woman, sweeping the ground. She wears old-style clothes, her face a translucent web of wrinkles. She smiles and says “Oh, new folks. And such quaint garbs. Does thy yearn for any thing? I can’t help much, dead as I am, but I too much love this little corner of town to leave it behind, always glad to lend a hand if possible.”
            3 There is a rackety stand on the side of the road with an old, scarred man sitting behind it. The items on display are very… peculiar. Weapons, tools and trinkets with strange shapes and colours. Some are moving on their own, others seem very ancient. Many people pass by and check it out, but very few seem to be buying something. The old man sighs. He explains he used to be an adventurer, but now he’s getting married, so he wants to settle down and sell his old stuff for more useful cash. He already sold most of it, what’s left is the bizarre and weird stuff.
            4 You see a young woman walking about. Sixteen at most. She’s wearing simple white robes with the church symbol on them and a brown leather bag filled with herbs and bottles slung over her shoulder.
            5 You hear people arguing loudly, a small crowd is gathering on the side of the road around them. You see two guards screaming at a small, balding dwarf in a dirty white shirt. The dwarf seems very apologetic. After a while, the guards simply push him to the ground and walk away. The dwarf is a private investigator. He messed up a big case and created problems for the guards. He’s not bad at his job, he says. If given an opportunity, and fair pay, he’s eager to prove he’s a capable hound.
            1 The road opens up as if it was a colossal mouth, dozens of meters long. Inside, instead of dirt and rocks, its inside is fleshy and squirmy. A few passersby and a cart with horses fall inside, their screaming doesn’t last long. The road closes, trembles, you hear a brutal crunching and crushing and squishing, then it opens up again.
            2 As you walk through the city at night, you see a wobbling light coming towards you. It’s a lantern bearer, accompanying someone. From a distance, they appear to be regular folks, but as you get close, an unnerving sensation starts crawling up your skin. The one carrying the lantern is hunched forward and dressed in patched-up rags that drag on the ground. The other one seems like a nobleman, his black jacket has golden buttons and trimmings, he’s wearing a top hat and has a walking stick. When they are closer, the two stop, and you hear the well-dressed man tell the other “Wait here, I’ll have a quick snack before we go.” Then he starts walking towards you.
            3 A runaway carriage is rushing towards you, there is no driver, the horses seem in a frenzy, neighing and frothing. As it gets closer, you notice a small, impish creature is attached to one of the horses, sinking its claws in its flesh.
            4 A young gnome lady is pushing a small cart filled with candles, crying “buy a light, buy a light for the night, good sirs.” As she gets close, she looks at you, and you see wax dripping from her eyes. “A candle to light the way,” she says, as she overthrows the cart. Melted wax floods out, streaming around you, boiling, burning your skin, but you feel something else, twisted, deep, burning away at your mind. “A light to find your way in the dim abyss of truth, good sir. A candle for the demented halls of the mortal mind.”
            5 A group of laughing kids rushes through your group, some bumping into you. They don’t steal anything, instead, they put something in your pocket: a shiny, red gem, as large as a chicken egg. A few seconds later, a large minotaur wielding an oversized butcher knife turns the corner, bloodshot eyes, foaming. “I can feel you have it, you swines!” He screams “I will butcher you like the thieving pigs you are and dig my gem out of your carcasses.”
            1 A procession of rats carrying around the town insignia walks through the street. Created by an experiment from the local magical academy, these intelligent rats escaped years ago and have formed an enclave within the city.
            2 Today is a local festivity. Wagons with masked people playing instruments go through the city, while the people in the crowd throw fruit at each other. At the end of the day, sometimes, spirits of the dead appear for a few hours to visit their families and dine with them.
            3 The players pass in front of a ruined building in the middle of town. Broken walls, grass everywhere, cobwebs and graffiti feel really out of place, surrounded by regular, well-kept houses. It’s a desecrated church. Its cult abandoned it a long time ago after some horrible thing happened in it, and the church isn’t allowed to demolish, fix or repurpose it, since it technically belongs to the church, so it lies abandoned despite being prime real estate, left to the weather, the homeless and animals.
            4 The players hear screaming in the distance. They turn a corner, and the street is occupied by two large groups of people, some dressed in green and red, others in blue and yellow. They are beating each other, it’s a huge brawl that occupies most of the street. Around them, more people are cheering, waving flags and throwing flowers. Two families have been rivals for a long time, but over the centuries it has become more tradition than real hate. Now, they have an annual brawl where they pummel each other before going to eat together.
            5 A store owners helped a druid, and in exchange, he was blessed, now animals love him. As a result, the entire street around his house is filled with wild animals just hanging around: barking dogs, scuttling rats, meowing cats, insects, birds. Poop and fur everywhere.
            1 The players notice something peering at them from a rooftop. An enormous humanoid covered in rags and chain, its face a grey, expressionless mask with burning red eyes. It looks at them for a few, extremely uncomfortable seconds, then pulls back and disappears.
            2 A group of kids rushes in front of the players, laughing and kicking a ball of raw leather, they turn a corner and disappear. A few moments later, the same kids pass again. Then a third time, always in the same direction. They aren’t going back and forth, they are repeating. The fourth time, someone that looks identical to the player to the smallest detail is running and playing with the kids.
            3 In the middle of the night, one of the players wakes up. Something warm is dripping on them. There is an eviscerated pig carcass hanging right over their bed, dripping blood. Other severed animal parts covered in fresh blood surround their bed. Everything is warm and slippery.
            4 A player wakes up in the middle of the night, something is crawling on their back. Something tiny, but fast. As they try and fail to grab it, from below the sheets, something grabs their foot.
            5 The players are casually walking through town, when they notice people are staring at them, pointing and laughing. They realize all of their clothes and equipment have, somehow, been switched around. Nobody is wearing their own clothes, and they look ridicolous. Nobody has their own weapon at hand. None of them noticed it happening.

        forest encounters
            [1] A friendly stray dog appears, when asked to speak the dog has a lot to share
            [2] Materializing out of thin air, a magician appears claiming one of the party members is their long lost cousin. Surely this must be a mistake?
            [3] The sky above turns into a strange hue, birds begin flying in strange patterns in response
            [4] Copper sign on a large oak tree warns of a dangerous beast that hunts in the area
            [5] Strange traveling merchant appears selling exotic fish and unique magical spices. They’re desperate for loyal customers, surely this won’t be the last the party sees of them
            [6] There is a shift in the aura, the party have crossed into a large-scale summoning circle
            [7] A faint tune is heard, a pleasant and somewhat familiar whistling. But only half of the party can hear it
            [8] The trees appear to be sickly, covered in an acidic substance. The source of the infection lies deeper within the woods. It is hungry
            [9] Ruins of an abandoned town lie before you, only a few decades old. What awaits within the shadows?
            [10] A strange marketplace is stationed near a spring, all the merchants seem to be friendly but you can’t help but feel like something suspicious is going down…
            [11] The temperature drops to an insanely low degree almost immediately. Destroyed trees and earth lie ahead covered in ice crystals and blood
            [12] A carriage rides toward you in the distance, the driver smiles and waves. As they pass by, a tied up body wriggles and falls out of the carriage
            [13] Pointed plant spurs shower the party attaching to their clothes, they are difficult to remove and grow in size very rapidly
            [14] The aroma of baked goods floods your nose, it’s rich and enticing. A colossal sized monster is baking goods in a makeshift oven near a river
            [15] Goblins camping on a hill loudly argue about a dishonest game of cards. Looks like their betting pool is full of interesting treasure
            [16] Forest spirits glow and awaken as the party enters their domain. The spirits offer a safe way through the forest as long as they promise not to steal any of the enchanted flowers within
            [17] A wounded Minotaur rests against a tree slipping in and out of consciousness
            [18] Blessed by a beautiful night, the party gaze upon a shooting star. It glows brightly, increasing with size as it makes contact with the earth itself not too far away
            [19] Travel is pleasant until the party notices their packs seem to be lessening in weight
            [20] Twin travelers, no more than 6 years of age, approach the party lost and scared. They refuse to let anyone open up their knapsacks
            [21] A band of muggers attack the party, they are completely drunk and can barely hold a dagger
            [22] It seems you’ve stumbled onto the hidden base of an Alchemist, strange abominations infused with Chromatic Orbs guard the premise
            [23] “Huh. That’s weird, did that plant just move or was it just me?”
            [24] While scavenging for food, you stumble upon an adorable but frightened rabbit. Every time it sneezes it changes forms, starting with Owlbear
            [25] An abandoned grain mill provides some convenient shelter for the night. Inside the mill the party discover a complex mechanical endoskeleton, the rusted metal gears creak uneasily
            [26] Nearby, a crowd has gathered around a clay golem without a master. The crowd watches, enchanted as the golem paints masterpieces. The paint has a strange property…
            [27] Two Monsters are locked in combat, bloodied and breathing heavily. It seems their glorious duel is one of honor, maybe bet on a winner?
            [28] A Dragon flies overhead holding onto a hoard of gold and treasures. A sudden change in direction causes a piece of their treasure to fall
            [29] Dozens of fish with human legs crawl out of a lake. This school of peculiar fish seem to be on a mission
            [30] Rock music is heard in the distance followed by bouts of cheering, strange aromas fill the air. It seems you are approaching a Music Festival
            [31] You’ve wandered onto the premises of a camp for young Wizards. A Wizarding tournament is taking place and things get very dangerous, very fast
            [32] A cobblestone bridge stretches across a deep ravine. An Orc guarding the bridge demands you pay the toll, fortunately it is very small. After crossing the bridge you simply cannot remember where you are or where you’re going- Oh, a hey! A bridge! (And repeat)
            [33] A Mage stands in front of an unfinished tower. Upon seeing the party, they ask for assistance
            [34] A few hundred feet ahead, a strange house on wheels attached to two horses is parked on the side of the road. The house is somewhat destroyed but a sign on the roof is visible, “The Legendary Vagabond’s Sensational Creature Exhibit”
            [35] The ground below rumbles as a Monster emerges catching one of the party members in their teeth
            [36] In the center of the forest clearing, an abandoned field of flowers sway. These strange flowers are growing out the decayed body of a Dryad
            [37] A wild chicken jumps out of the bushes, it’s beak covered in blood. Surely this chicken is no threat, right?
            [38] Seated beside the river shore, an ethereal creature weeps. They reveal themselves as a Demigod with daddy issues
            [39] Hungrily, a non-traditional Chimera stalks the party. The beast is stitched together poorly
            [40] Inside the log of a fallen tree lies a poorly concealed treasure chest full of stolen loot. I’m sure nobody will mind if we take it?
            [41] Mysterious beasts occupy a dark hollow inside a hill, they want to play a bizarre game with promise of a grand reward
            [42] A sleeping Cyclops presents an awkward obstacle for the party, sleeping on the path. Nothing seems to be waking them and going around them is dangerous due to the environment
            [43] A nearby earthquake collapses the ground, revealing some glowing ore
            [44] Rotted flora is everywhere, upon further inspection this rot spreads out for miles
            [45] Wonderful! A village! Oh and everyone here is so nice… New mayors? Oh no, you must be mistaken! Oh, you’re certain? Well then
            [46] Lightning strikes the ground creating a dimensional rift. Certain conditions must have been met for this to have happened. Why not investigate?
            [47] Faint, indescribable sounds are heard from every direction. As you leave the dense foliage you discover beasts and Monsters of all types in cages. Welcome to the zoo
            [48] Little miss spider sips on some cider, eating her curds and whey. Along came the party, all powerful and hearty who scared miss spider away… You guys should probably apologize
            [49] A few tattered shacks sit beside the open road, nothing of interest is found within. The only thing to note is that they seem to be breathing…
            [50] Something straight out of Monster Factory is now stalking the party. Are they friend or foe?
            [51] A poet down on their luck bumps into the party. Did I mention they’re a Beholder? Let’s hope somebody can inspire this beast, or else
            [52] Just outside the village a group of angsty Bards are practicing their instruments. Their music is loud and dangerous, they don’t seem to understand a thing about Bardic magic
            [53] The coolest wizard you’ve ever seen dogsleds past your crew, spraying them with glittering ice. Did I mention it’s summer?
            [54] Just ahead, you see a ruined castle covered in moss and vines overlooking a quiet lake
            [55] Looks like a small creature has found its way into someone’s pack. This menace has eaten all of your rations and drank all of their booze!
            [56] YUCK! A swarm of bugs have gotten the best of your party. Fortunately, only one of you was bitten. Unfortunately, it looks like now they’ve developed a new, very unfortunate allergy
            [57] Blistering heat has rendered your whole party sweaty and exhausted, movement is quite difficult. I sure hope some baddies don’t show up right now
            [58] The unluckiest member of your party has their luck turned around, they found a precious jewel lodged in the dirt. They feel inspired
            [59] The unluckiest member of your party continues their trend of haplessness, they find a precious jewel lodged in the dirt. It whispers to them at night, haunting their dreams
            [60] After a hearty sleep the party awaken to find that they’ve been sleeping on top of a buried tomb
            [61] A large scale battle is taking place, bodies everywhere. Wait, this doesn’t seem to be a battlefield but a serious LARP session
            [62] Rusted weapons have been lazily discarded into a sunken pit. As the party approaches they discover this heap of weapons is actually somebody, or something’s collection
            [63] A drunken Necromancer attempts to impress the party by casting hazardous spells
            [64] Arrows fire at the party from behind. Someone’s been hired to take them out
            [65] For the past few hours you’ve felt as if someone has been watching you from afar. A Druid has been tracking your party. Outsiders are rare in this forest
            [66] A group Merchants are completely lost. Neither of them can remember anything from their past
            [67] Religious statues are placed haphazardly around the area, nothing is out of the ordinary until the sun goes down
            [68] Dozens of animated skeletons are exercising and doing some really intense yoga
            [69] Beside a babbling brook, a young cow drinks alone. They’re irresistibly adorable
            [70] An uneventful day of travel, the weather is calm the trees are- THUD! WHAT THE- The party leader has bumped into something invisible
            [71] All metal objects are intensely pulled toward an unknown source. Steel weapons and armor don’t stand a chance
            [72] It appears resting on that rock was quite the mistake. The stone rumbles and animates, grumpy and combative
            [73] Meditating on floating chunks of earth is a powerful looking Monk. They claim to have been awaiting the party’s arrival. The Monk issues a challenge, a test of strength
            [74] You’ve somehow stumbled onto a delightful Toad farm. Do you think a Witch lives around here or is there just a Toad enthusiast in these parts?
            [75] The morning sun stirs you awake to an unexpected scene. You and your friends have been tied up and kidnapped, seated in the back of a caravan. It smells oddly of pickled vegetables
            [76] A fishing contest is being held at the lake. The grand prize is a shockingly large sum of currency
            [77] It is a moonless night, travel is nearly impossible. As the party decide to sleep for the night, glowing is seen in the distance. When investigated the glowing creature is seemingly friendly and it attempts to guide the party through the night
            [78] Forest fairies are holding a festival for their gods, they invite the party to join
            [79] ACHOO! The pollen in the air is really strong… Wait… Are those trees growing or are we shrinking? Of course we’re shrinking! Why wouldn’t we be shrinking!?
            [80] In order to pass through this forest unharmed you must answer the goddess’s riddle. Unfortunately for the party she speaks a dead language, they hear only strange whispers
            [81] A group of Goblins attack! After giving them a good licking you run into them again. And again… And again. Maybe we should just make peace with these dorks
            [82] Introduce the most ridiculous NPC and have them stuck in some quicksand. Really let their character shine through, whether they are stupidly entertaining or horribly unbearable
            [83] A strange light glows in the distance on top of a mountain. Is this a sign of good fortune or something much more sinister?
            [84] A lone child plays the flute in the forest, they appear almost ethereal. It is a haunting melody
            [85] Shattered Gargoyles sit in an overgrown garden, a treasure chest lies among the rubble
            [86] Pick your favorite Cryptid and make them canonical to your world. Have the beast stalk the party for mysterious cryptic reasons. And yes, the Loch Ness Monster is an excellent choice
            [87] The forest clearing leads to a crystal clear freshwater lake. In the depths of the water something terrifying is waiting to be discovered
            [88] Two hyper intelligent, talking rabbits stop the party in their tracks. All they request are some books to read
            [89] A tree, twice as tall as the others appears to be growing… Weapons? (All of those are cursed, of course)
            [90] Next to the road, a group of Archaeologists are taking dirt samples. They’re convinced they will find some buried artifacts in the area. They are willing to pay a ridiculous sum of money if you give them some assistance, just as long as you keep this whole thing to yourselves
            [91] Resting through the night was very pleasant for the party leader. When they attempt to greet their comrades, they have found themselves in a bed a long ways away from their resting point
            [92] Dried up lake beds and decaying trees among a field of animal bones. You have reached the outside of a Necromancer’s circle
            [93] Orcs with a sense of humor attempt to prank the party. Their prank is perfectly harmless, it involves just a little bit of bottled unicorn piss
            [94] Travel is impossible on this moonless night. Unfortunately, sleeping until morning does not solve the situation, nighttime persists indefinitely
            [95] A colorful formation on the side of the mountain piques your interest. Inside lies the abandoned home of a giant and it is full of unique treasure. Let’s just hope something else hasn’t taken residence within the forgotten halls
            [96] Tons of bubblegum covers the roads, it is awful to travel through. The source of this mishap is a young Wizard with a sweet tooth
            [97] Crashed into the side of a plateau, a metallic construct with strange markings and glowing lights. Surely this isn’t an actual extraterrestrial?
            [98] While foraging for food, the party find a path of mushrooms leading into a dense Fungal Forest. Rare and undiscovered fungi grow within
            [99] The most obnoxious bard in the world joins the party at their campfire. They claim to be weak and in need of good company, offering booze to win them over. Did I mention this bard is an infamous necromancer on the run? Yeah, that might be important to know
            1 You hear a low humming coming from somewhere close. In the middle of a clearing is a red maple tree. Below it, over a carpet of red leaves, dozens of animals sleep peacefully: rabbits, wolves, deers, boars and bears, all next to each other. You notice a face in the tree trunk. It’s a treant, and it’s the one singing. One wolf is licking the tree sap from its bark. 2 A troll is standing on a riverbank, it has dragged a rather large fish out of the water, holding its tail with one hand and punching it in the face with the other. Despite the beating, the fish seems quite lively and is fighting back. Suddenly, the fish breaths a torrent of fire over the troll that screams in pain, but doesn’t stop fighting.
            3 You see an elf buried in the ground up to the waist. The visible part of his body, naked, is covered in shrooms and mold. He’s surrounded by luxurious flowers, you recognize some of them: alchemical ingredients, healing plants, some are pretty rare. The elf waves at you with a smile.
            4 The ground quakes violently. You notice trees moving in the distance, birds fly away, and the sound of crushing wood, making everything shake. Then, rhythmical stomps. They are getting close. You see a pipe-smoking giant emerge from the woods. He’s quite big, and the axe hanging from his belt is just as impressive. With one hand, he’s dragging a tree behind him. Looking better, you notice it’s not just a tree: it’s a treant, Its bark is blackened and its branches bare. The tree is shaking and screaming profanities. He notices you, waves a massive hand in your direction, and says “Morin, fellas. Just out doing some gardening, cleaning the weeds. Hope I’m not disturbing.”
            5 Smoke comes from the woods. Something crashed through the canopy. You find a small airship crashed through a tree, destroyed, pieces everywhere. There is a corpse between them, mangled and burnt in the grass. It’s small, a gnome perhaps. There also is a cat person, a Tabaxi, sitting on a rock nearby. She’s looking towards the dead gnome, sighing. She seems lost in thoughts. You notice, next to her, a rather large backpack. Various weapons, tools and animal bones are hanging from it. In the grass, you see a half-carbonized signboard, all you can read is “…&Tom flying sho…”
            1 A sudden gust of wind carries a cloud of dirt, leaves and flower petals. The players start coughing, everything gets in their eyes and mouth. Then, hidden by the dirt and leaves, some figure approach menacingly. Effect equivalent to a Stinking Cloud spell (instead of retching, it makes you coughing) combined with a fog cloud.
            2 The players enter a clearing with a pool in the middle. In it, there is a ring of frogs floating on leaves. The frogs start singing. From the opposite edge of the clearing, a burly, half-naked humanoid wearing a boar skin and wielding two axes appear. From behind the players, a skinny humanoid wearing a fur jacket crawls out of the woods, he’s wielding two scimitars. The two are evil druids that attack travellers, they have trained the frogs to sing and they act as a bard, giving them inspiration.
            3 From the brushes on the side of the road, something crawls out. A humanoid figure, slowly crawling on its knees and legs. It’s completely covered in molds and shrooms, every inch of skin, even its face and mouths are covered. Right after it, a large woman walks out of the woods, her hair and dirty and matted, her skin leathery and grey, and her clothes are patched-up rags. She’s holding a noose, puts it around the first figure neck and starts dragging it back into the wood. The figure weakly flails its arms and legs, helplessly, as the woman murmurs “Naughty naughty, I leave one minute and you all scuttle away.” Then she notices you, she stops, her eyes brighten up and she smiles, a wall of crooked, yellow teeth.
            4 You hear screaming, then a squirrel flies between you, bounces on the ground and scuttles away. An elf woman, completely naked, half covered in mud, jumps out of the woods. She’s holding a straw bag filled with living squirrels. She looks at you, eyes wide open, and starts yelling “Did you steal my mimp? Where is my mimp? Give it baaaack!” Then she grabs a handful of squirrels and throws it at you.
            5 A lot of trees around you are grey, whithered and leafless. It feels like they would crumble to pieces if you touched them. You see other trees wither as you are looking at them, their leaves go black and fall in a matter of seconds. Then, you hear a growling behind you. There is a rather large grey-haired monkey, covered in wounds. On its head is carved a demonic rune. The ape leans against a tree, and it instantly starts drying and dying. Some of the ape wounds close and heal.
            1 A blue-haired wolf appears from the bushes, glimmering in the moonlight. It has five eyes, slowly rotating in a circle, you feel its piercing gaze. “One eye sees what was” says the wolf “one what will be and one what is. One sees all the roads not taken, and one all the roads you will never take. The wheel of fate spins around you, mortals. You stand in the crux of destiny, and the universe awaits. Ask what the eyes see, but only one question. One eye, and no more.” Make up whatever you want, it’s just fairies messing with the players.
            2 There are a hare and a bear playing cards, they sit on two rocks and use a tree stump as a table. The bear is emaciated and bent forward, the hare is losing its fur in some spots. If interrogated, they are two awakened animals, used to go adventuring with a druid. She died years ago, and they’re both quite old, too old to go alone, so they just wait, playing cards together every day. If the players go back there at a later date, they will find the stump empty, covered in dry leaves (or snow, or cobwebs or what’s appropriated for the season.)
            3 The players hear voices from the trees. In a clearing, a group of dryads, centaurs and fairies are gathered around a small group of masked satyrs that are dancing and singing around. It’s a sort of theatrical play. After listening for a bit, they realize the actors are reenacting one of the players earlier adventures.
            4 Eating fermented fruit, animals can get drunk. A group of druids with their animal companions did the same and have trashed the outskirts of town, damaging farms, breaking windows, puking on doors and turning carts. They are currently sleeping, wasted, at the edge of the forest.
            5 A treant accidentally damaged a merchant carriage going through the forest, to repay the damage he’s working as a clerk in the merchant office. His branches scrape the ceiling and his leaves are everywhere, but he’s pretty good at the job thanks to not having to sleep.
            1 Half of a tree has disappeared, the cut is extremely clean, precise to the millimetre. The missing half is just gone with no trace.
            2 Large swats of the forest have died, the trees are grey and dried up, the grass turned into ash, animals whithered and died. The devastated parts are very precise but there don’t seem to be any pattern, at least for now.
            3 There is a burning hollow tree, completely engulfed by roaring flames. Inside its hollow trunk is still visible a chained figure, burned to death.
            4 When the players walk through the forests, dryads pop out of some trees, staring at them in silence. They start humming together a low song, at first very faintly, but soon it becomes a powerful vibration that shakes the whole forest.
            5 There are two moons and two suns in the sky. Nobody else seems to be able to see them. The double shadows create strange visual tricks, causing the players to sometimes see figures hiding between the trees.

        keep/stronghold encounters
            1) An old woman goes around, knocking at people’s doors in the middle of night. If welcomed, she leaves peacefully. If not given hospitality, she curses the homeowners in bizarre ways, such as “you’ll be a beast and your family will be turned into cutlery until someone falls in love with you.” The peasants are scared of this clearly insane witch wandering the land, and beg the players to stop her.
            2) The keep was build on top of an old dwarven cemetery. Every new moon, the dead rise and a bunch of short skeletons and ghosts attack the keep cantina. They break barrels of wine and drink the content, devour every plucked chicken and duck in the kitchen and cause mayhem.
            3) A new group of adventurers has just started their career in town, but they're murderhobos and have been doing a lot of damage.
            4) Two families have been enemies for generations. The youngest members of the two, young and innocent, had fallen in love, but their families didn't allow them to be together. As a result, they committed suicide together. Then, they came back as undeads and now haunt the lands of their families.
            5) Two families have been friends for generations, but two of the youngest members, barely adults, hate each other and challenge each other to violent duels. Sooner or later one of them will kill the other, or they could both die, and nobody wants that to happen
            6) A local mafia has been asking the locals to pay protection money and attacking the people that refuse. Problem is, the mafia actually does protect the people, and their private militia is pretty efficient. A lot of locals support them.
            7) A nearby goblin tribe has been encroaching on the players land. The goblins seem to be running away from something, but the farmers don't care. They just want the monsters out of their land.
            8) A nearby goblin tribe has been encroaching on the players land. The goblins seem to be running towards something, in a violent frenzy, trampling over any obstacle, as if attracted by a siren's call that nobody else hears.
            9) A nearby goblin tribe has been encroaching on the players land. The goblins say they were promised a portion of land by the previous lord, in exchange for 20 barrels of a rare goblin ale.
            10) Local sheep have gained sentience and refuse to be raised like animals. They have organized themselves in a commune and demand more rights and their own land where they can live in peace.
            11) There is a cave below the keep where enormous fungi grow. One day, they start growing outside, covering the keep walls and doors, infecting trees and animals.
            12) A group of devils appears in the backyard, they start taking measurements of the keep. When confronted, they say that the land belongs to them. They have a contract: The land was sold to them ten thousand years before, by the people owning it back then. From their point of view, it’s legally theirs, and the players have ten minutes to fuck off before they get evicted.
            13) A drunken giant walks by, stumbling in confusion. He crawls inside the keep and falls asleep in the courtyard, blocking it.
            14) Three hundred years ago, a great hero was born in the keep, and pilgrims come from all over to visit. They don’t care for locked doors or local laws, and often they will steal things as souvenirs. Sometimes precious things, but often they will take curtains, pieces of furniture, cutlery, shoes, socks.
            15) A ghost haunts the castle. He was the castle owner, centuries before. The ghost spends his days getting drunk and harassing people in the open. Shouldn’t he, like, rattle chains and scream in the night? Well, he didn’t get a how-to-ghost pamphlet when he died, so excuse him if he’s not haunting in the “proper” way. In the end, he’s a friendly guy, just kind of an asshole.
            16) A summoning went wrong, and the demon spirit got stuck in the piano in the music room. You can play it normally if you’re good, but If you hit the wrong note, the keys will bite your fingers. On a positive note, it never needs tuning. Just to be fed twice a week.
            17) A summoning went wrong, and a celestial spirit got stuck in a door. Now, it won’t let anyone through unless they prove to be worthy. The door takes its position very seriously and is pretty obnoxious.
            18) A powerful vampire lived in the castle, centuries ago, but it got destroyed by hunters. Or, nearly destroyed. The vampire is still alive, but it’s only a head, too weak to regenerate. It’s now kept inside a glass casing as decoration on a desk. You can talk with it, it’s a pretty intelligent head. It could, potentially, get its powers back by drinking blood, and tries to trick people into feeding it.
            19) There is an imposing statue in the courtyard, a hero fighting various monsters. On every full moon night, they animate, the monsters spread around the keep and the hero chases them down.
            20) There is a deep well in the back of the keep. It’s ancient, and nobody knows how deep it goes. The water in it causes hallucinations
            21) There is an empty room in the keep. If you try to put furniture in it, as soon as the room is empty, the doors will slam close, then, a terrible grinding sound will come out of it for a few minutes. When it’s done, the doors will open and the room will be empty again.
            22) There is a tower in the keep that is much older than the rest. The servants are scared of it, they talk of a cloaked figure with a lantern walking around it at night, and strange noises.
            23) A druid keeps intruding in the garden. He has very strong opinions on how the rest of the garden should be cultivated, the right way to prune, colour-coordination of flowers etc. and will harass and even attack the gardener if they disagree.
            24) A tree in the garden is inhabited by a dryad. She is extremely charismatic and a lot of peasants are friend with her, she gives advice, healing herbs and concoctions and farming tips. Some are starting to think she would be a pretty good town leader, even better than the players…
            25) Filth and garbage fall from the sky and over the keep. Half-eaten bones, poop, rotten fruit, it’s gross. Nobody knows where exactly they come from.
            26) At night, terrifying figures wander the village. They wear animals heads, or maybe they are half-animals, nobody knows but the peasants are terrified.
            27) A farmer’s field is become sentient and are attacking people. Humanoids made of tangled tomatoes, pumpkins ogres, zucchini knights, cabbage rangers and rice warlocks.
            28) A bizarre creature appears in the castle, a tangle of feathers and claws, beaks and tails and eggs and horns. It flies around for a while, breaking things and hurting people, then it blinks away and appears in another room, then again and again.
            29) A section of the castle is on fire, but it doesn’t seem to be spreading.
            30) There is a door that leads nowhere, it simply has a wall behind it. Sometimes, it opens and people walk out of it, confused foreigners from distant lands. Nobody has ever been able to use it to go back.
            31) A gang of kids and fairies is going around the village breaking windows, turning carts, liftings skirts and generally being annoying. Nobody has been able to catch them, thanks to the fairies magic.
            32) A priestess wants to open a chapel in the keep. She is extremely aggressive and self-righteous, but pretty good at divine magic.
            33) A wizard wants a laboratory in the keep, where nobody’s gonna annoy him about safety regulations or so-called “crimes against nature”, but he can pay very well.
            34) A neighbouring lord is visiting the keep. The man is wealthy and well-connected. He’s accompanied his daughter, who is independent and rebellious, and wants to become a ranger. The lord would be grateful to anyone that changed his daughter’s mind, and the daughter would be grateful to anyone that helped her escape.
            35) A neighbouring lord is visiting the keep. The man is too old to care, hates etiquette and loves parties. He’s accompanied his daughter, who hates poor people and fun and wants to uphold traditions. The lord will be grateful to anyone able to make his daughter loosen up, and the daughter will reward anyone that will allow her to replace her dad.
            36) A neighbouring lord is visiting the keep with his daughter. They are both raging assholes that look at every other person like filth, but they are part of a powerful and connected family.
            37) A neighbouring lord is visiting the keep with his daughter, they are both party animals with a habit of going too far and causing serious damages and starting fires, but they’re a lot of fun.
            38) No neighbouring lord is visiting the keep. That is bad for diplomacy, the players need to make their land more appealing, or they won’t be taken seriously and remain isolated.
            39) A hole opens in the middle of town, and a bunch of drow flood out. They’re refugees, running away from mind flayer slavers. They were forced to escape to the surface or die, and are out of options. If the players don’t shelter them, they will all die. Most of them are civilians. Many peasants are against it, and think its’ a trap, or that they deserve to die. The mind flayers are coming.
            40) A hole opens in the middle of town, and a bunch of slugs flood out. They crawl over people and bury in their brains. There is panic, but the “infected” people seem fine, more or less. There is no immediate effect, and nobody is sure who or how many were infected.
            41) A hole opens in the middle of town and a blinding light floods out. Some people, as in a trance, start walking inside it and never come out. Every day more people go in the hole.
            42) An artist has settled in the village. Her art pieces are very, very good, but also disturbing, and seem to reveal people’s secret. They cause fights, start feuds and break up families.
            43) An artist has settled in the village. His art pieces are terrible beyond all comprehension and cause people to get sick and physical pain. After just a few days, some of them animate and turn into hideous monsters. Nobody knows where exactly the artist is hiding.
            44) A storyteller has arrived in town. He’s extremely charming, even too much: people stop working to listen to his tales, and some become unable to distinguish fiction from reality. Others lock themselves in their rooms, daydreaming, only coming out when a new tale is being told.
            45) There is a well in the keep, and sometimes coins fly out of it, followed by a voice making a wish. If the wish isn’t fulfilled, more coins arrive, but the voice is angry. Then pebbles start to fly out followed by cursing, eventually it’s rocks, knives and axes, then deadly spells.
            46) A metallic globe has appeared over the keep. It floats roughly a hundred meters in the air, immobile. Sometimes, it exudes blood that then rains over the keep.
            47) A couple of tailors arrive in town, they sell an incredibly rare material: an invisible cloth that only smart people can see. It is true, and people with Intelligence over 16 see it. It is very beautiful and comfortable and resilient.
            48) A woman arrives in town. She appears to be a regular peasant, but she’s very charismatic and starts rallying people to go to a holy war. She is very convinced of herself, and many are ready to follow. If they do, the town will lose a lot of its population and be unable to function, but she’s on a mission for God.
            49) A group of people that looks identical to the players arrives in town, pretending to be let into their keep. Who are these fools impersonating them, they ask? What trick is this? They demand the players get kicked out. The issue is, these fakes are all smarter and more likeable than the real ones, so many peasants are on their side.
            50) A servant rushes to the players, covered in sweat. A woman is dying. She overdosed on some weird drugs that a gnome sold them that they were doing together. They’re secretly in a relationship, but she’s the daughter of a nearby nobleman. If she dies or their relationship is revealed, it will be a mess. Her father could very well start a war. He fucked up dude, but they gotta help him, or they’ll all be in troubles.
    moral dillemas
        You finally have the villain at your mercy, but their child is with them. Are you willing to kill an innocent child's parent in front of their very eyes?
        The village is going to be culled to prevent the spread of a terrible plague. Do you spare the villagers by preventing the cull at risk of millions of lives dying to plague?
        The villain has framed you for a crime you didn't commit, but to resist arrest would make it more likely that your reputation as an outlaw sticks with you permanantly. Do you turn yourself in?
        The wizard sent you on a simple errand: decomission his malfunctioning golem, but when you find the golem it is exhibiting obvious signs of sentience, and self awareness. Does it deserve the freedom of other sentient beings?
        The villain shares a common goal/enemy with the party and suggests declaring a truce to deal with the situation. Do you work together with your sworn enemy?
        You captured some enemy soldiers for information and have them at your mercy. Do you let them go and risk them giving away your position or slaughter the unarmed troops? (u/BiD3sign)
        Your party is guilty of a crime (aren’t they all at some point?) and the local law enforcement has arrested someone else for it. Do you turn yourself in and save the person, or do you let them try him so you can remain out of prison?
        Your party is contracted to deal with a group of bandits that has been waylaying merchants on the road, miles outside of town. It turns out that the spoils of these robberies are being redistributed to the poor citizens. (u/McLellanCM)
        The villain is currently holding a hostage that the party hates but the public loves. (u//MojoDragon365)
        The king, who has proven himself to be a great ally and a terrifying enemy, has charged you to escort a caravan of people to be sold into slavery (u/StromTheHammer)
        A bottle of stolen mead has been found by the party after a merchant warns them to be on the lookout for it. However, the rare mead is unattended and probably worth a nice chunk of change. The party can either steal it, sell it, and tell the merchant what they did, lie about stealing it, return it to the merchant, or do nothing. If the party ends up stealing or returning the mead, a later quest will reveal it was honestly bought and that the merchant, now gone, is something of a scammer. (u/SelfDefibrillation)
        You come to a crossroads and suddenly from the north a girl comes running down saying "please help....they are about to sacrifice my sister" And then a boy comes running up from the other direction "please help...my village is under attack" Helping the girl stop the sacrifice summons a demon but the sister is saved and the other village is slaughtered. Saving the village means the sister is sacrificed and the girl stalks the party waiting for her moment to strike to get revenge (u/whitecloud197)
        You see a bear following a child who was yelling in another language, if the party kill the bear, the girl runs backs to his werebear father while he is dying. (u/alejo1905)
        Your sibling wants to ask hags/fiends for a cure to save your sick mother, but may have to commit some evil deeds in the process. (u/solidfang)
        A mad queen made a pact with a demon lord to always return from the dead, so long as her bloodline remains, some of her descendants may be some people you know... (u/ElZoof)
        The party comes cross an infant gnoll, crying over the corpse of its dead parent. It may be an inherently chaotic and evil creature, but it is still young—do they leave it, kill it, or try to help it? (u/insanityscribe)
        A local mimic wants to stop being used as furniture. Does the party kill it, or take pity and relocate the poor creature (u/iSquirrelyy)
        The party were the only witnesses to a child stealing something from a stall, but the city punishes stealing with death. If the party doesn't describe (and thus likely condemn) the child to death, the blame will fall on the only other possible thieves: themselves. (u/shirking_my_studies)
        A local lord and his knights have recently killed an adult dragon which had been terrorizing the surrounding lands for years. There's one last job: go to the dragons lair and exterminate it's clutch of eggs and the remaining wyrmlings. None can survive or the lairs effects on the region will never go away. (u/DisparateNoise)
        There's a deadly and neigh-unbreakable curse that jumps from parent to biological child when the parent dies. The current curse bearer is a powerful wizard who keeps it at bay with ritual sacrifice of humanoids, using their souls to empower his resistance. The wizard has many children and dozens of grandchildren, and if he's killed, they'll quickly die from the inherited curse, them lacking his ability to resist it. (u/shirking_my_studies)
        A senile old wizard has been secluded in the mountains, summoning mass amounts of monsters to keep himself from being lonely. The monsters run away from him out of fear but savagely kill innocents. Does the party kill him to stop the killings or go to the trouble of trying to find help for him. (u/Elilacky)
        There's a prophecy that a young child, descendant of a great hero, will be the gateway for a great demon to come back into this world by bursting out of the kid's chest. An evil wizard can get the demon out without harming the child, but the demon will be under the wizard's control. Do the heroes wait to see if the prophecy is false (it's not), enlist the help of the wizard and have to deal with that problem later, or murder the great-great-great-great grandchild of the man who saved the entire kingdom? (u/ksgt69)
        Your party gets hired by a wealthy collector to transport an artifact purchased from the town over. When they arrive in the other town, they find out the artifact they are to transport is a little girl. (u/sKoutXII)
        A quest to go slay a nearby ogre is posted in a tavern. The ogre has no interest in hurting anyone but doesn't want to leave either. Gemstones poking out of the walls of the caves hint at why the bounty was placed. (u/Pinstar)
        You are fighting your way to a dragon's lair through some surprisingly smart owl bears, shambling mounds, treants, and other typically dumb creatures. You learn that to destroy the dragon's (or other BBEG) power will be to rob all these creatures of their intelligence that they now prize so dearly. (u/micahaphone partially based on a post by u/SageSilinous)
        A level in the dungeon is filled with monsters and deadly traps, but also cages filled with innocents in the way. If the party isn't careful they are likely to be killed. (u/jediboogie)
        The local village is holding a firbolg named Thorbyrn prisoner, saying he killed one of the local guardsmen. The firbolgs have always been peaceful and all evidence suggests he’s not the culprit. He’s to be executed in the morning and the party must decide if they will save him. (u/datgingerr)
        A village is under the influence of a long forgotten goddess of Fertility who requires blood sacrifices to work her magic. Without the sacrifices, the crops are eaten by pests, die to diseases from the soil, or don't even make enough food for a small child. (u/NotActuallyEvil)
        You've been called to kill a bunch of 'evil' creatures (goblins, orcs, whatever) but find that while they're not the best ever they're also the victims of discrimination and being kept out of 'honest' ways to make a living (u/_Lusus)
        You receive a powerful magic item that perfectly fits in with your character's abilities, but are warned soon after earning it that the more you use it, the more that your morality will be corrupted. Will you use it or destroy it? (u/_Lusus)
        You've come across a group of revolutionary inventors, they've created things that will change the path of history for the better. You find out they've invented everything sacrificing innocent, unwilling, lives in the testing process. Do you stop them? (u/slaptac)
        You come across a prisoner and a guard. The prisoner claims to be a person of good who is being held unjustly while the guard claims the prisoner is evil. (u/gvblake22 inspired by u/slaptac)
        There's a secret group of werewolves among the people in a small village. They've been feeding on livestock; however, they are also responsible for keeping the monsters in the surrounding area at bay. The villagers want their livestock safeguarded, but the werewolves are desperate to remain a secret so they can be with their families. (u/AstralMarmot)
        The party has slain the evil tyrant, and freed the kingdom, but discovered that the reason the tyrant ruled so harshly was to prepare the kingdom to fight against an even greater threat. (u/fwimmygoat)
        The liches phylactery is a small puppy (u/vmos)
        the antichrist has just been born into the body of a human child, but the mother knows nothing about her child's special abilities (u/vmos)
        You're in a cave, a rockslide has blocked the flow of an underground river, a huge beastie is coming down the tunnel and suddenly unleashing a river in it's face is the best way to deal with it, but a gnome has built a house in the way and his wife is sick in bed (u/vmos)
        a magic mcguffin is very important to the survival of a town, you learn that a criminal gang are planning to steal it and they're recruiting new members to assist. A perfect opportunity to infiltrate and save the town, except the mcguffin would be really useful to your master quest. (u/vmos)
